Vol. II.A
GUY RIVERS.
VOL. II.
CHAPTER I.
Dread souls that so devise
Such rugged deed, such dark amount of crime.
Oh, fly!I do imploreif you would live
The murderers set upon you. Hark! they come!
There's but a moment left you for escape;
That lost, all's over; and these eyes shall see
Your heart's blood streamingseeing nothing more.
The
night began to wane, and still did Lucy
Munro keep lonely vigil in her chamber. How
could she sleep? Threatened herself with a
connexion
so dreadful as to her mind was that
proposed
with Guy Riversdeeply interested as
she now felt herself in the fortunes of the young
stranger, for whose fate and safety, knowing the
unfavourable position in which he stood with the
outlaws, she had every thing to apprehendit can
cause no wonder when we say sleep grew a
stranger
to her eyes, and without retiring to her couch,
though extinguishing her light, she sat musing by
the window of her chamber upon the thousand
conflicting and sad thoughts that were at strife in
her spirit. She had not been long in this position
when the sound of approaching horsemen reached
her ears, and after a brief interval, during which
she could perceive that they had alighted, she heard
the door of the hall gently unclosed, and footsteps,
as if set down with a nice caution, passing through
the passage. A light danced for a moment fitfully
along the chamber, as if borne from the sleeping
apartment of Munro to that adjoining the hall in
which the family were accustomed to pursue their
domestic avocations. Then came an occasional
murmur of speech to her ears, and then silence.
Perplexed with these circumstances, and
wondering
at the return of Munro at an hour something
unusualprompted too by a presentiment of
something
wrong, and apprehensive on the score of
Ralph's safetya curiosity, not surely under these
circumstances discreditable, to know what was
going on, determined her to ascertain something
more of the character of the nocturnal visitation.
She felt assured from the strangeness of the
occurrence
that evil was afoot, and solicitous for its
prevention
,
she was persuaded to the measure solely
with the view to good. Hastily, yet cautiously, but
with trembling hands, undoing the door of her
apartment, she made her way into the long and
dark gallery, with which she was perfectly familiar,
and soon gained the apartment already referred to.
The door fortunately stood nearly closed, and she
was therefore enabled to pass it by and gain the
hall, which immediately adjoined, and lay in
perfect
darkness; without herself being seen, she was
enabled, through a crevice in the partition dividing
the two rooms, to survey its inmates, and to hear
distinctly at the same time every thing that was
uttered. As she expected, there were the two
conspirators
,
Rivers and Munro, earnestly engaged in
discourse; to which, as it concerns materially our
progress, we may well be permitted to lend our
attention. They spoke on a variety of topics
entirely
foreign to the understanding of the
half-affrighted
and nervously-susceptible, but still
resolute
young girl who heard them; and nothing but
her deep anxieties for one, whose own importance
in her eyes at that moment she did not conjecture,
could have sustained her while listening to a
dialogue
full of atrocious intention and development,
and larded throughout with a familiar and
sometimes
foul phraseology that certainly was not
altogether
unseemly in such association.
Well, Blundell's gone too, they say. He's
heartily frightened. A few more will follow, and
we must both be out of the way. The rest could
not well be identified, and whether they are or not
does not concern me, except that they may blab
of their confederates. Such as seem likely to
suffer
detection must be frightened off; and this,
by-the-way
,
is not so difficult a matter. Pippin knows
nothing of himself. Forrester is too much involved
to be forward. It was in this way I aroused and
set him on. His hot blood took fire at some
little hints that I threw out, and the fool became a
leader in the mischief. There's no danger from
himbesides, they say, he's off too. Old Walton
has broken off the match between him and his
daughter on this very score, and the fellow's almost
mad on the strength of it. So Raymond tells me,
and, I take it, truly. There's but one left who might
trouble us, and it is now understood that a single
mode only offers for his silence. We are
perfectly
agreed as to this, and no more scruples.
The quick sense of the maiden readily taught
her who the one meant was; and her heart
trembled
convulsively within her, as with a word,
Munro, replying to Rivers, gave his assent.
Why, yesit must be done, I suppose, though
somehow or other I would it could be got rid of in
any other way.
You see for yourself, Wat, there can be no
other way; for as long as he lives, there is no
security
.
The few surviving guard will be seen to,
and they saw too little to be dangerous. They
were like stunned and stupified men. This boy
alone was cool and collected, and is so obstinate in
what he knows and thinks, that he troubles neither
himself nor his neighbours with doubt or difficulty.
I knew him a few years ago, when something more
of a boy than now; and even then he was the
same character.
But why not let him start, and take the woods
for it? How easy to settle the matter on the
road-side
,
in a thousand different ways. The
accumulation
of these occurrences in the village, as much
as any thing else, will break us up. I don't care
for myself, for I expect to be off for a time, but I
want to see the old woman and Lucy keep quiet
possession here; but
You are becoming an old woman yourself,
Wat, and should be under guardianship. All these
scruples are late; and indeed, even were they not,
they would be still useless. We have determined
on the thing, and the sooner we set about it the
better. The night wanes; and I have much to see
to before daylight. To-morrow I must sleep
sleep and for a moment Rivers seemed to muse
upon the word sleep, which he thrice repeated,
then suddenly proceeding, as if no pause had taken
place, he abruptly placed his hand upon the
shoulder
of Munro, and asked
You will bear the lanternthis is all you
need perform. I am resolute for the rest.
What will you usedirk?
Yesit is silent in its office, and not less sure.
Are all asleep, think youyour wife?
Quite sosound when I entered the chamber.
Well, the sooner to business the better. Is
there water in that pitcher? I am strangely thirsty
to-nightbrandy were not amiss at such a time.
And speaking this to himself, as it were, Rivers
approached the side-table, where stood the
commodities
he sought. In this approach the maiden
had a more perfect view of the malignities of his
savage face; and as he left the table, and again
commenced a brief conversation in an under-tone
with Munro, no longer doubting the dreadful
object
which they had in view, she seized the
opportunity
with as much speed as was consistent with
caution and her trembling nerves, to leave the
place of espionage, and seek her chamber. But to
what purpose had she heard all this, if she suffered
the fearful deed to proceed to execution. The
thought was momentary, but carried to her heart, in
that moment, the fullest conviction of her duty.
She rushed hurriedly again into the passageand
though apprehending momentarily that her knees
would sink from under hertook her way up the
narrow flight of steps leading into the second story,
and to the youth's chamber. As she reached the
door, a feminine scruple came over her. A young
girl seeking the apartment of a man at midnight
she shrunk back with a new feeling. But the
dread necessity drove her on, and with cautious
hand undoing the latch which secured the door by
thrusting her hand through an interstice between
the logswondering at the same time at the
incautious
manner in which, at such a period and place,
the youth had provided for his sleeping hoursshe
stood tremblingly within the chamber.
Wrapped in unconscious slumbers, Ralph
Colleton
lay dreaming upon his rude couch of a thousand
strange influences and associations. His roving
fancies had gone to and fro, between his uncle and
his bewitching cousin, until his heart grew softened
and satisfied, not less with the native pleasures
which they revived in his memory, than of the
sweet oblivion which they brought of the many
painful and perilous prospects with which he had
more recently become familiar. He had no thought
of the present, and the pictures of the past were
all rich and ravishing. To his wandering sense at
that moment there came a sweet vision of beauty
and loveof an affection warmly cherished
green as the summer leavesfresh as its flowers
flinging odours about his spirit, and reawakening in
its fullest extent the partially slumbering passion
reviving many a hope, and provoking with many
a delicious anticipation. The form of the one,
lovely beyond comparison, flitted before him, while
her name, murmured with words of passion by
his parted lips, carried with its utterance a sweet
promise of a pure faith, and an unforgetting
affection
.
Never once, since the hour of his departure
from home, had he, in his waking moments,
permitted
that name to find a place upon his lips, and
now syllabled into sound by them in his unconscious
dreams, it fell with a stunning influence upon an
auditor, whose heart grew colder in due
proportion
with the unconscious but warm tenderness of
epithet with which his tongue coupled its
utterance
.
The now completely unhappy Lucy stood
sad and statue-like. She heard enough to teach
her the true character of her own feelings for one,
whose articulated dreams had revealed the secret
of his passion for another; and almost forgetting
for a while the office upon which she had come, she
continued to give ear to those sounds which brought
to her heart only additional misery. How long
Ralph, in his mental wanderings, would have gone
on, as we have seen, incoherently developing his
heart's history, may not be said. Gathering courage
at last, with a noble energy the maiden proceeded
to her proposed duty, and his slumbers were broken.
With a half-awakened consciousness he raised
himself
partially up in his couch, and sought to listen.
He was not deceived; a whispered sentence came
to his ears, addressed to himself, and succeeded by
a pause of several moments' continuance. Again
his name was uttered. Half doubting his senses,
he passed his hand repeatedly over his eyes, and
again listened for the repetition of that voice, the
identity of which he had as yet failed utterly to
distinguish. The sounds were repeated, and the
words grew more and more distinct. He now
caught in part the tenor of the sentence, though
imperfectly
heard. It seemed to convey some
warning
of danger, and the person who spoke appeared,
from the tremulous accents, to labour under many
apprehensions. The voice proceeded with
increased
emphasis, advising his instant departure
from the housespeaking of nameless dangers
of murderous intrigue and conspiracy, and
warning
against even the delay of a single instant.
The character of Ralph was finely marked, and
firmness of purpose and a ready decision were
among its most prominent attributes. Hastily
leaping
from his couch, therefore, with a single bound
he reached the door of his chamber, which, to his
astonishment, he found entirely unfastened. The
movement was so sudden and so entirely unlooked
for, that the intruder was taken by surprise; and
beheld, while the youth closed securely the
entrance
,
the hope of escape entirely cut off. Ralph
advanced towards his visiter, the dim outline of
whose person was visible upon the wall. Lifting
his arm as he approached, what was his
astonishment
to perceive the object of his assault sink
before
him upon the floor, while the pleading voice of
a woman called upon him for mercy.
Spare me, Mr. Colletonspare meshe
exclaimed
,
in undisguised terror.
You here, Miss Munro, and at this hour of the
night? was the wondering inquiry, as he lifted her
from the ground, her limbs, trembling with
agitation
,
scarcely able to support even her slender form.
Forgive me, sir, forgive me. Think not ill of
me, I pray you. I come to save you,indeed, Mr.
Colleton, I doand nothing, believe me, would
have brought me here but the knowledge of your
immediate danger.
She felt the delicacy of her situation, and
recognising
her motive readily, we will do him the
justice
to say, Ralph felt it too in the assurance of her
lips. A respectful delicacy pervaded his manner
as he inquired earnestly
What is this danger, Miss Munro? I believe
you fear for me, but may you not have
exaggerated
the cause of alarm to yourself. What have
I to fearfrom what would you save me?
Nay, ask me not, sir, but fly. There is but little
time for explanation, believe me. I know and do
not imagine the danger. I cannot tell you all, nor
can you with safety bestow the time to hear.
Your murderers are awakethey are in this very
house, and nothing but instant flight can save you
from their hands.
But from whom, Miss Munro, am I to fear all
this. What has given you this alarm, which, until
you can give me some clue to this mystery, I must
regard as unadvised and without foundation. I
feel the kindness and interest of your solicitude
Vol. II.B
deeply feel, and greatly respect it; but, unless you
can give me some reasonable instance for your
fears, I must be stubborn in resisting a conviction
which would have me fly, like a midnight felon,
without having even seen the face of my foe.
Oh, heed not these false scruples. There is no
shame in such a flight, and believe me, sir, I speak
not unadvisedly. Nothing, sir, but the most urgent
and immediate danger would have prompted me,
at this hour, to come here. If you would survive
this night, take advantage of the moment and fly.
This moment you must determineI know not,
indeed, if it be not too late even now for your
extrication. The murderers, by this time, are
upon the way to your chamber, and they will not
heed your prayers, and they will scorn any defence
which you might offer.
But who are they of whom you speak, Miss
Munro? If I must fly, let me at least know from
what and whom. What are my offences, and who
are they whom I have offended?
That is soon told, though I fear me, sir, we waste
the time in doing so. You have offended Rivers,
and you know but little of him if you think it possible
for him to forget or forgive where once injured,
however slightly. The miners generally have been
taught to regard you as one whose destruction
alone can ensure their safety from punishment for
their late aggressions. My uncle too, I grieve to
say it, is too much under the influence of Rivers,
and does indeed just what his suggestions prescribe.
They have plotted your death, and will not
scruple
at its performance. They are even now
below
,
meditating its execution. By the merest good
fortune I overheard their design, from which I feel
persuaded nothing now can make them recede.
Rely nothing on their fear of human punishment.
They care perhaps just as little for the laws of
man as of God, both of which they violate hourly
with impunity, and from both of which they
have always hitherto contrived to secure
themselves
.
Let me entreat, therefore, that you will
take no heed of that manful courage which would
be honourable and proper with a fair enemy. Do
not think that I am a victim to unmeasured and
womanly fears. I have seen too much of the
doings of these men, not to feel that no fancies of
mine can do them injustice. They would murder
you in your bed, and walk from the scene of their
crime with confidence into the very courts of
justice
.
I believe you, Miss Munro, and nothing doubt
the correctness of your opinion with regard to the
character of these men. Indeed, I have reason
to know that what you say of Rivers, I have
already
realized in my own person. This attempt,
if he makes it, will be the second in which he has
put my life in hazard, and I believe him, therefore,
not too good for any attempt of this evil nature.
But why may I not defend myself from the
assassins
?
I can make these logs tenable till daylight
from all their assaults, and then I should receive
succour from the villagers without question. You
see, too, I have arms which may prove troublesome
to an enemy.
Trust not these chances: let me entreat that
you rely not upon them. Were you able, as you
say, to sustain yourself for the rest of the night in
this apartment, there would be no relief in the
morning, for how would you make your situation
understood? Many of the villagers will have
flown before to-morrow into the nation, until the
pursuit is well over, which will most certainly be
commenced before long. Some of them have
already gone, having heard of the approach of
the residue of the Georgia Guard, to which the
survivors at the late affair bore the particulars.
Those who venture to remain will not come
nigh this house, dreading to be involved in the
difficulties which now threaten its occupants.
Their caution would only be the more increased on
hearing of any commotion. Wait not, therefore, I
implore you, for the dawning of the day: it could
never dawn to you. Rivers I know too well: he
would overreach you by some subtlety or other;
and how easy, even while we speak, to shoot you
down through these distorted logs. Trust not,
trust not, I entreat you; there is a sure way of
escape, and you still have time, if at once you
avail yourself of it.
The maid spoke with earnestness and warmth,
for the terrors of her mind had given animation to
her anxiety, while she sought to persuade the
somewhat
stubborn youth into the proposed and
certainly
judicious flight she contemplated for him.
Her trepidation had made her part with much of
that retreating timidity which had usually
distinguished
her manner; and perfectly assured herself
of the causes of her present apprehension, she did
not scruple to exhibitindeed she did not seem
altogether conscious ofthe deep interest which
she took in the fate and fortunes of him who stood
beside her. Flattered as he must have been by the
marked feeling, which she could neither disguise nor
he mistake, the youth did not, however, for a moment
seek to abuse it; but with a habit at once gentle
and respectful, combated the various arguments and
suggestions which, with a single eye to his safety,
she urged for his departure. In so doing, he
obtained
from her all the particulars of her discovery,
and was at length convinced that her
apprehensions
were by no means groundless. She had
accidentally come upon the conspirators at an
interesting
moment in their deliberations, which at
once revealed their object and its aim; and he at
length saw that, except in flight, according to her
proposition, the chances were numerous against
his safety. While they thus deliberated, the
distant
sound of a chair falling below, occurring at
an hour so unusual, gave an added force to her
suggestions, and while it prompted anew her
entreaties
,
greatly diminished his reluctance to the
flight.
I will do just as you advise. I know not, Miss
Munro, why my fate and fortune should have
provoked
in you such an interest, unless it be that
yours being a less selfish sex than ours, you are
not apt to enter into calculations as to the loss of
quiet or of personal risk, which, in so doing, you may
incur. Whatever be the motive, however, I am
grateful for its effects, and shall not readily forget
the gentleness of that spirit which has done so
much for the solace and the safety of one so sad
in its aspect and so much a stranger in all
respects
.
The youth spoke with emphasis; and coupled
as was his language with a tone and manner the
most tender yet respectful, it necessarily relieved
from all perplexity that feeling of propriety and
maiden delicacy, which otherwise must have made
her situation an awkward one. Ralph was not so
dull, however, as not to perceive, that, to a livelier
emotion, he might in justice attribute the conduct
of his companion; but with a highly honourable
fastidiousness, he himself suggested a motive for
her proceeding, which her own delicacy rendered
improper for her utterance. Still the youth was
not marble exactly; and, as he spoke, his arm
B 2
gently encircled her waist: and her form, as if
incapable of its own support, hung for a moment,
with apathetic lifelessness, upon his bosom; while
her head, with an impulse not difficult to define,
drooped like a bending and dewy lily upon his
arm. But the passive emotion, if we may so style
it, was soon over; and, with an effort, in which
firmness and feebleness strongly encountered, she
freed herself from his hold with an erect pride of
manner, which gave a sweet finish to the
momentary
display which she had made of womanly
weakness. Her voice, as she called upon him to
follow her into the passage, was again firm in a
moment, and pervaded by a cold ease which
seemed to him artificial.
There is but little time left you now, sir, for
escape: it were criminal not to use it. Follow me
boldly, but cautiouslyI will lead the waythe
house is familiar to me, in night and day, and there
must be no waste of time.
He would have resisted this conduct, and himself
taken the lead in the advance; but placing her small
and trembling hand upon his arm, she insisted upon
the course she had prescribed, and in a manner which
he did not venture to resist. Their steps were
slow into the open space which, seeming as an
introduction
to, at the same time separated the
various
chambers of the dwelling, and terminated in
the large and cumbrous stairway which conducted
to the lower story, and to which their course was
now directed. The passage was of some length,
but with cautious tread they proceeded in safety
and without noise to the head of the stairway,
when the maiden, who still preserved the lead,
motioned him back, retreating herself, as she did
so, into the cover of a small recess, formed by the
stairs, which it partially overhung, and presenting
a doubtful apology for a closet. Its door hung
upon a broken and single hinge, unclosed, leaving
however so small an aperture that it might be
difficult
to account for their entrance. There, amid
the dust and mystery of time-worn household
trumpery
,
old saddles, broken bridles, and more than
one dismembered harness, they came to a pause,
and were enabled now to perceive the realization
in part of her apprehensions. A small lantern,
the rays of light from which feebly made their way
through a single square in front, disclosed to the
sight the dim forms of the two assassins, moving
upward to the contemplated deed of blood. The
terrors of Lucy, as she surveyed their approach,
were great; but with a mind and spirit beyond
those commonly in the possession of her sex, she
was enabled to conquer and rise above them; and
though her heart beat with a thick and hurried
apprehension
,
her soul grew calmer the more closely
approached the danger. Her alarm to the mind
of Ralph was now sufficiently justified, as, looking
through a crevice in the narrow apartment in
which he stood, he surveyed the malignant and
hell-branded
visage of Rivers, peering like a dim and
baleful light in advance of his companion; in whose
face a partial glimmer of the lamp revealed a
something
of reluctance, which rendered it doubtful how
far Munro had in reality gone willingly on the task.
It was, under all the circumstances, a curious
survey
for the youth. He was a man of high
passions
,
sudden of action, impetuous and unhesitating.
In a fair field, he would not have been at a loss for a
single moment; but here, the situation was so new,
that he was more and more undetermined in his
spirit. He saw them commissioned with his
murder
,
treading, one by one, the several steps below
himapproaching momently nigher and nigher
and his heart beat audibly with conflicting
emotions
,
while with one hand he grasped convulsively
and desperately the handle of his dirkthe other
being fully employed in sustaining the almost
fainting
form of his high-souled but delicate companion.
He felt that, if discovered, he could do little in his
defence and against assault; and though without
a thought but that of fierce struggle to the last,
his reason taught him to perceive with how little
hope of success. As they continued to advance,
he could distinctly trace every change of
expression
in their several countenances. In that of
Rivers, linked with the hideousness that his wound
conferred upon it, he noted the more wicked
workings
of a spirit, the fell character of whose
features
received no moderate exaggeration from the
dim and flickering glare of the lamp which his
hand unsteadily carried. The whole face had in
it something awfully fearful. He seemed, in its
expression, already striking the blow at the breast
of his victim, or rioting with a fiendish revenge in
his groaned agonies. A brief dialogue between his
companion and himself more fully describes the
character of the monster.
Stayyou hurry too much in this matter
said Munro, putting his hand on that of Rivers,
and restraining his steps for a moment as he
paused, seemingly to listen. He continued,
Your hand trembles, Rivers, and you let your
lamp dance about too much to find it useful.
Your footstep is hurried, and but now the stairs
creaked heavily beneath you. You must proceed
with more caution, or we shall be overheard.
These are sleepless times, and this youth, who
appears
to trouble you more than man ever troubled
you before, may be just as much awake as ourselves.
If you are determined in this thing, be not
imprudent
.
Rivers, who on reaching the head of the flight
had been about to hurry forward precipitately, now
paused, though with much reluctance; and to the
speech of his companion, with a fearful expression
of the lips, which, as they parted, disclosed the teeth
white and closely clenched beneath them, replied,
though without directly referring to its import
If I am determineddo you say!But is not
that the chamber where he sleeps?
No; old Barton sleeps therehe sleeps at the
end of the gallery. Be calmwhy do you work
your fingers in that manner?
See you not my knife is in them? I thought at
that moment that it was between his ribs and
working
about in his heart. It was a sweet fancy,
and, though I could not hear his groans as I stooped
over him to listen, I almost thought I felt them.
The hand of the maiden grasped that of Ralph
convulsively as these muttered words came to their
ears, and her respiration grew more difficult and
painful. He shuddered at the vindictive spirit
which the wretch exhibited, while his own, putting
on a feller and a fiercer temper, could scarcely
resist
the impulse which would have prompted him
at once to rush forth and stab him where he stood.
But the counsels of prudence had their influence,
and he remained quiet and firm. The companion of
the ruffian felt no less than his other hearers the
savage nature of this mood, as thus, in his way, he
partially rebuked it:
These are horrid fancies, Riversmore like
those which we should look to find in a panther than
in a man, and you delight in them quite too much.
Can you not kill your enemy without drinking his
blood?
And where then would be the pleasure of
revenge
?he
muttered, between his closed teeth.
The soldier who in battle slays his opponent, hates
him nothe has no personal animosity to indulge.
The man has never crossed his path in love or in
ambitionyet he shoots him down, ruthlessly and
relentlessly. Shall he do no more who hates
who fearswho sickens at the sight of the man
who has crossed his path in love and in ambition?
I tell you, Munro, I hate this boythis beardless,
this overweening and insolent boy. He has
overthrown
,
he has mortified me, where I alone should
have stood supreme and supereminent. He has
wronged meit may be without intention; but,
what care I for that qualification. Shall it be less
an evil because he by whom it is perpetrated has
neither the soul nor the sense to be conscious of his
error. The child who trifles with the powder
match is lessoned by the explosion which destroys
him. It must be so with him. I never yet forgave
a wrong, however slight and unimportantI never
will. It is not in my nature to do so; and as long
as this boy can sleep at night, I cannot. I will not
seek to sleep until he is laid in the long and
unbroken
slumber.
The whole of this brief dialogue, which had
passed directly beside the recess in which the
maiden and youth had taken shelter, was distinctly
audible to them both. The blood of Ralph boiled
within him at this latter speech of the ruffian, in
which he avowed a spirit of such dire malignity,
as, in its utter disproportionateness to the supposed
offence of the youth, could only have been
sanctioned
by the nature which he had declared to
have always been his prompter; and, at its close,
the arm of the youth, grasping his weapon, was
involuntarily stretched forth, and an instant more
would have found it buried in the bosom of the
wretchbut the action did not escape the quick
eye of his companion, who, though trembling with
undiminished terror, was yet mistress of all her
senses, and perceived the ill-advised nature of his
design. With a motion equally involuntary and
sudden with his own, her taper fingers grasped his
wrist, and her eyes bright with dewy lustres, were
directed upwards, sweetly and appealingly to those
which now bent themselves down upon her. In
that moment of excitement and impending terror,
a consciousness of her situation and a sense of
shame which more than ever agitated her, rushed
through her mind, and she leaned against the side
of the closet for that support for which her now
revived and awakened scruples forbade any
reference
to him from whom she had so recently
received
it. Still, there was nothing abrupt or
unkind
in her manner, and the youth did not
hesitate
again to place his arm around and in support of
the form which, in reality, needed his services. In
doing so, however, a slight noise was the
consequence
,
which the quick sense of Rivers readily
discerned.
Hark!heard you nothing, Munrono sound?
Hear you no breathing?It seems near at hand,
in that closet.
Thou hast a quick ear to-night, Guy, as well
as a quick step. I heard, and hear nothing, save
the snorings of old Barton, whose chamber is just
beside you to the left. He has always had a
reputation
for the wild music which his nose contrives,
during his sleep, to keep up in his neighbourhood.
It came from the opposite quarter, Munro, and
was not unlike the suppressed respiration of one
who listens.
Pshaw! that cannot be. There is no chamber
there. That is but the old closet in which we store
away lumber. You are quite too regardful of
your senses. They will keep us here all night, and
the fact is, I wish the business well over.
Where does Lucy sleep?
In the off shed-room below. What of her?
Of heroh nothing! and Rivers paused
musingly
in the utterance of this reply, which fell
syllable by syllable from his lips. The landlord
proceeded:
Pass on, Rivers; pass on: or have you
determined
better about this matter? Shall the
youngster live? Indeed, I see not that his evidence,
even if he gives it, which I very much doubt, can
do us much harm, seeing that a few days more
will put us out of the reach of judge and jury
alike.
You would have made a prime counsellor and
subtle disputant, Munro, worthy of the
Philadelphia
lawyers, returned the other, in a sneer, which
has, from what cause we know not, become a
proverb
in the southern country. You think only of
one part of this subject, and have no passions, no
emotions: you can talk all day long on matters of
feeling, without showing any. Did I not say but
now, that while that boy slept I could not?
Are you sure that when he ceases to sleep the
case will be any better!
The answer to this inquiry was unheard, as the
goodly pair passed on to the tenantless chamber.
Watching their progress, and under the guidance
of the young maiden, who seemed endued with a
courage and conduct worthy of more experience
and a stronger sex, our hero emerged from his place
of precarious and uncomfortable concealment, and
descended to the lower floor. A few moments
sufficed
to throw the saddle upon his steed, without
arousing the sable groom; and having brought
him under the shadow of a tree at some little
distance
from the house, he found no further
obstruction
in the way of his safe and sudden flight. He
had fastened the door of his chamber on leaving
it with much more caution than upon retiring for
the night; and having withdrawn the key, which
he now hurled into the woods, he felt assured that,
unless the assassins had other than the common
modes of entry, he should gain a little time from the
delay they would experience from this interruption;
and this interval, returning to the doorway, he
employed
in acknowledgments which were well due
to the young and trembling woman who stood
beside
him.
Take this little token, sweet Lucy, said he,
throwing about her neck the chain and casket
which he had unbound from his owntake this
little token of Ralph Colleton's gratitude for this
night's good service. I shall redeem it, if I live, at
a more pleasant season, but you must keep it for
me now. I will not soon forget the devotedness
with which, on this occasion, you have perilled so
much for a stranger. Should we never again meet,
I pray you to remember me in your prayers, as I
shall always remember you in mine.
He little knew, while thus he spoke, in a manner,
so humbly of himself, of the deep interest which
his uniform gentleness of manner and respectful
deference, so different to what she had been
accustomed
in that region to encounter, had inspired in her
bosom; and so small at this period was his vanity,
that he did not trust himself for a moment to
regard
the conjecturewhich ever and anon thrust
itself upon himthat the fearless devotion of the
maiden in his behalf and for his safety, had in reality
a far more selfish origin than the mere general
humanity
of her sex and spirit. We will not say that
Vol. II.C
she would not have done the same by any other
member of the human family in like circumstances;
but it is not uncharitable to believe that she would
have been less anxiously interested, less warm
in her interest, and less pained in the event of an
unfortunate result. Clasping the gorgeous chain
about her neck, his arm again gently encircled her
waisther head drooped upon her bosomshe did
not speakshe appeared scarcely to feel. For a
moment, life and all its pulses seemed resolutely at a
stand; and with some apprehensions, the youth
drew her to his bosom, and spoke with words full
of tenderness. She made no answer to his
immediate
speech; but her hands, as if unconsciously,
struck the spring which locked the casket which
hung upon the chain,and the miniature lay open
before
her, the dim light of the moon shining down
upon it. She reclosed it suddenly, and undoing it
from the chain, placed it with a trembling hand in
his own; and with an effort of calm and quiet
playfulness
,
reminded him of the unintended gift. He
received it, but only to place it again in her hand,
reuniting it to the chain.
Keep it, said he, Miss Munrokeep it until
I return to reclaim it. It will be as safe in your
handsmuch safer indeed, than in mine. She
whose features it describes will not chide, that, at
a moment of peril, I place it in the care of one as
gentle as herself. Her eyes were downcast, as,
again receiving it, she inquired with a girlish
simplicity
,
Is her name Edith, Mr. Colleton, of
whom these features are the likeness?
The youth, surprised by the question, met the
inquiry with another.
How know you?wherefore do you ask?
She saw his astonishment, and with a calm
which had not, during the whole scene between
them, marked her voice or demeanour, she replied
instantly:
No matterno matter, sir. I know not well
why I put the questioncertainly with no object;
and am now more than answered.
The youth pondered over the affair in silence
for a few moments, but desirous of satisfying the
curiosity of the maiden, though on a subject and
in relation to one of whom he had sworn himself
to silencewondering, at the same time, not less at
the inquiry than the knowledge, in part at least,
which it conveyed, of that which he had locked up,
as he thought, in the recesses of his own bosom,
was about to reply, when a hurried step, and a
sudden noise from the upper apartment of the
house, warned them of the dangers of further
delay. The maiden interrupted with rapid tones
the speech he was about to commence:
Fly, sir,fly. There is no time to be lost.
You have lingered too long already. Do not
hesitate
longeryou have heard the determination of
Riversthis disappointment will only make him
more furious. Fly, then, and speak not. Take the
left road at the fork: it leads to the river. It is
the dullest, and if they pursue, they will be most
likely to fall into the other.
Farewell, then, my good, my protecting angel
I shall not forget youhave no apprehensions
for meI have now but few for myself. Yet, ere
I go and he bent down, and before she was
conscious
of his design, his lips were pressed warmly
to her pale and beautiful forehead. Be not vexed
chide me not, he murmuredregard me as a
brotherif I live I shall certainly become one,
Farewell!
Leaping with a single bound to his saddle, he
stood erect for a moment, then vigorously applying
his spurs, he had vanished in an instant from the
sight. She paused until the steps of his steed
ceased to fall upon her ears; then, with a mournful
spirit and a heavy step, she slowly re-entered the
apartment.
CHAPTER II.
Where goes he, on what route!
If thou deny'st me, by the gods, I swear,
The wrath I've kept for him, with treasured hate,
That sought no other game, I'll wreak on thee
I'll stab thee on the instantspeak, or die!
Lucy Munro
re-entered the dwelling at a
moment
most inopportune. It was not less her
obvious policy than desireprompted as well by
the necessity of escaping the notice and consequent
suspicions of those whom she had defrauded of
their prey, as by a due sense of that delicate
propriety
which belonged to her sex, and which her
education, as the reader will have conjectured, had
taught her properly to estimatethat made her now
seek to avoid scrutiny or observation at the moment
of her return. Though the niece, and now under
the sole direction and authority of Munro, she was
the child of one as little like that personage in spirit
and pursuit as may well be imagined. It is not
necessary that we should more particularly dwell
upon this difference. It happened with the two
brothers, as many of us have discovered in other
cases, that their mental and moral make, though
seemingly under the same tutorship, was widely
dissimilar. The elder Munro, at an early period
in life, broke through all restraintsdefied all
responsibilities
scorned
all human consequences,
took no pride or pleasure in any of its domestic
associations, and was only known as a vicious
profligate
,
with whom nothing might be done in the way
of restraint or reformation. When grown to
manhood
,
he suddenly left his parental home, and went,
for a time, no one could say whither. When heard
of, it appeared from all accounts that his
licentiousness
of habit had not deserted him,still, however,
it had not, as had been anticipated, led to any
fearful
or very pernicious results. Years passed on,
the parents died, and the brothers grew more than
ever separate; when, in different and remote
communities
,
they each took wives to themselves. The
younger, Edgar Munro, the father of Lucy, grew
prosperous in businessfor a season at leastand,
until borne down by a rush of unfavourable and
conflicting circumstances, he spared neither pains
nor expense in the culture of the young mind of
that daughter whose fortunes are now somewhat
before us. Nothing which might tend in the
slightest to her personal improvement had been
withheld; and the due feminine grace and
accomplishment
which followed these cares, fitted the
maiden for the most refined intellectual converse,
and for every gentle association. She was familiar
with books; had acquired a large taste for letters;
and a vein of romantic enthusiasm, not uncommon
to the southern temperament, and which she
possessed
in a considerable degree, was not a little
sharpened and exaggerated by the works which
fell into her hands. It was, possibly, the influence
of such an education which impelled her to the
risk which she had taken for the safety of Ralph
Colleton. Tenderly loved and gently nurtured by
her parents, it was at that period in her life in
which their presence and guardianship were most
seriously needed, that she became an orphan; and
her future charge necessarily devolved upon an
C 2
uncle, between whom and her father, since their
early manhood, but little commerce or association
of any kind had taken place. The one looked upon
the other as too licentious, if not criminally so, in
his habits and pursuitshe did not know their
extent
,
or dream of their character, or he had never
doubted for an instant; while he, in turn, so
estimated
,
did not fail to consider and to style his more
sedate brother an inveterate and tedious proser; a
dull sermonizer on feelings which he knew nothing
about, and could never understandone who
prosed on to the end of the chapter, without charm
or change, worrying all about him with
exhortations
to which they yielded no regard. The
parties
were fairly quits, and there was no love lost
between them. They saw each other but seldom,
and when the surviving brother took up his abode
in the
new purchase
, as the Indian acquisitions of
modern times have been usually styled, he was
lost sight of, for a time, entirely, by his more staid
and worthy kinsman. Still, Edgar Munro did not
look upon his brother as utterly bad. A wild
indifference
to social forms, and those staid customs
which in the estimation of society become
virtues
,
was, in his idea, the most serious error of
which Walter had been guiltyin this thought he
persisted to the last, and did not so much feel the
privations to which his death must subject his child,
in the belief and hope that his brother would not
only be able but willing to supply the loss. In one
respect he was not mistaken. The afflictions
which threw the niece of Walter a dependant
upon his bounty, and a charge upon his attention,
revived, in some measure, his almost smothered,
and in part forgotten regards of kindred; and
with a tolerably good grace he came forward to
the duty, and took the orphan to the asylum, such
as it was, to which his brother's deathbed prayer
had recommended her. At first, there was
something
to her young mind savouring of the romance
to which she had rather given herself up, in the
notion
of a woodland cottage, and rural sports, and
wild vines gadding fantastically around secluded
bowers; but the realitythe sad reality of such
a home and its associationspressed too soon and
heavily upon her to permit her much longer to
entertain or encourage the dream of that glad
fancy in which she originally set out. The sphere
of her transfer, it was soon evident, was neither
grateful to the heart nor suited to the mind whose
education had been such as hers; and the spirit of
the young maiden, at all times given rather to a
quiet aspect of melancholy than to any very
animated
impulses, put on, in its new abiding place, a
garb of increased severity, which at certain
moments
indicated more of deep and settled
misanthropy
than any mere constitutionality of habit.
Munro was not at all times rude of speech and
manner; and, when he pleased, knew well how so
to direct himself as to soothe such a disposition.
He saw, and in a little while well understood, the
temper of his niece; and with a consideration
under all circumstances rather creditable, he would
most usually defer, with a ready
accommodation
of his own, to her peculiarities. He was
pleased and proud of her accomplishments; and
from being thus proud, so far as such an emotion
could consistently comport with a life and a
licentiousness
such as his, he had learned, in reality,
to love the object who could thus awaken a
sentiment
so much beyond those inculcated by all
his other habits. To her, he exhibited none of
the harsh manner which marked his intercourse
with all other persons; and, in his heart, sincerely
regretted, and sought to avoid the necessity, which,
as we have elsewhere seen, had made him pledge
her hand to Riversa disposition of it which he
knew was no less galling and painful to her than it
was irksome yet unavoidable to himself.
Unhappily
,
however, for these sentiments, he was
too much under the control and at the mercy of
his colleague to resist or refuse his application for
her person; and though for a long time baffling,
under vain pretences, the pursuit of that ferocious
ruffian, he felt that the time was at hand, unless
some providential interference willed it otherwise,
when the sacrifice would be insisted on and must
be made; or, probably, her safety, as well as his
own, might necessarily be compromised. He
knew too well the character of Rivers, and was
too much in his power to risk much in opposition
to his will and desires: and, as we have already
heard him declare, from having been at one time, and
in some respects, the tutor, he had now become, from
the operation of circumstances, the mere creature
and instrument of that unprincipled wretch.
Whatever
may have been the crimes of Munro beyond
those already developedknown to, and in the
possession of Riversand whatever the nature of
those ties, as well of league as of mutual risk,
which bound the parties together in such close
affinity, it is not necessary that we should state,
nor, indeed, might it be altogether within our
compass
or capacity to do so. Their connexion had,
we doubt not, many ramifications; and was
strengthened, there is little question, by a thousand
mutual necessities, resulting from their joint and
frequently repeated violations of the laws of the
land. They were both members of an irregular
club, known by its constituents in Georgia as the
most atrocious criminal that ever offended society
or defied its punishments; and the almost masonic
mysteries and bond which distinguished the
members
provided them with a pledge of security,
which gave an added impetus to their already
reckless vindictiveness against man and humanity.
In a country, the population of which, few and far
between, is spread over a wide, wild, and little
cultivated territory, the chances of punishment for
crime, rarely realized, scarcely occasioned a thought
among offenders; and invited, by the impunity
which marked their atrocities, their reiterated
commission
.
We have digressed, however, somewhat
from our narrative, but thus much was necessary
to the proper understanding of the portions
immediately
before us, and to the consideration of which
we now return.
The moment was inopportune, as we have
already
remarked, at which Lucy Munro
endeavoured
to effect her return to her own apartment.
She was compelled, for the attainment of this
object
,
to cross directly over the great hall, from the
room adjoining and back of which the little
shed-room
projected in which she lodged. This hall
was immediately entered upon from the passage
way, leading into the court in front, and but a few
steps were necessary for its attainment. The hall
had but a single outlet besides that through which
she now entered, and this led at once into the
adjoining apartment, through which only could
she make her way to her own. Unhappily, this
passage also contained the stairway flight which
led into the upper story of the building; and, in
her haste to accomplish her return, she had
penetrated
too far to effect her retreat, when a sudden
change of direction in the light which Rivers
carried, sufficed to develop the form of that person,
at the foot of the stairs, followed by Munro, just
returning from the attempt which she had rendered
fruitless, and now approaching directly towards
her. Conscious of the awkwardness of her
situation
,
and with a degree of apprehension which
now for the first time seemed to paralyze altogether
her faculties, she endeavoured, but with some
uncertainty
and hesitation of manner, to gain the
shelter of the wall which stretched dimly beside
her; a hope not entirely vain, had she pursued it
decisively, since the lamp which Rivers carried
gave forth but a feeble ray, barely adequate to the
task of guiding the footsteps of those who employed
it. But the glance of the outlaw, rendered, it
would seem, more malignantly penetrating from
his recent disappointment, detected the movement;
and though, from the imperfectness of the light,
uncertain of the object, with a ready activity, the
result of a conviction that the long sought-for
victim
was now before him, he sprung forward,
flinging
aside the lamp as he did so, and grasping with
one hand and with rigid gripe the almost fainting
girl, the other brandishing a bared knife, was
uplifted
to strike, when her shrieks arrested the blow.
Disappointed in not finding the object he sought,
the fury of the outlaw was rather heightened than
diminished when he discovered that his arm only
encircled a young and terrified female; and his
teeth were gnashed in token of the bitter wrath
in his bosom, and angry curses came from his lips
in the undisguised vexation of his spirit. In the
meantime, Munro advanced, and the lamp having
been dashed out in the onset of Rivers, they were
still ignorant of the character of their prisoner,
until having somewhat recovered from her first
alarm, and struggling at her deliverance from the
painful gripe which secured her arm, she
exclaimed
:
Unhand me, sirunhand me, on the instant.
What mean you by this violence?
Ha! it is you then, fair mistress, that have done
this work. It is you that have intermeddled in
matters so far beyond your accustomed province,
interfering in the concerns of men, prying into their
plans, and arresting their execution. By my soul,
I had not thought you so ready or so apt; but how
do you reconcile it to your notions of propriety to
be abroad at an hour which is something late for a
coy damsel? Munroyou must look to these rare
doings, or they will work you some difficulty in
time to come.
Munro advanced and addressed her with some
sternnessWhy are you abroad, Lucy, and at
this hour? why this seeming disquietude, and what
has alarmed you? why have you left your
chamber
?
The uncle did not obtain, nor indeed did he
appear to expect any answer to his inquiries; they
seemed merely to have been put for form sake. In
the mean while, Rivers still held possession of her
arm, and she continued fruitlessly struggling for
some moments in his grasp, referring at length to
the speaker for that interference which he now
appeared slow to manifest.
Oh, sirwill you suffer me to be treated thus
will you not make this man undo his hold, and
let me retire to my chamber?
You should have been there long before this,
Lucy, was the reply, in a grave, stern accent.
You must not complain if, found thus, at
midnight
,
in a part of the building remote from your
chamber, you should be liable to suspicions of
meddling with things which should not concern
you.
Come, mistresspray answer to this. Where
have you been to-nightwhat doingwhy abroad.
Have you been eaves-droppingtelling tales
hatching plots?
The natural ferocity of Rivers's manner was
rather heightened by the tone which he assumed.
The maiden, struggling still for the release for
which her spirit would not suffer her to implore
exclaimed:
Insolent! By what right ask you these or any
questions of me? Unhand me, cowardunhand
me. You are strong and brave only where the
feeble are your opponents.
But he maintained his grasp with even more
rigidity than before; and she turned towards the
spot at which stood her uncle, but he had left the
apartment for a light.
Your speech is bold, fair mistress, and ill suits
my temper. You must be more chary of your
language, or you will provoke me beyond my own
strength of restraint. You are my property
my slave, if I so please it, and all your appeals to
your uncle will be of no effect. Hark youyou
have done that to-night for which I am almost
tempted to put this dagger into your heart, woman
as you are. You have come between me and my
victimbetween me and my enemy. I had summed
up all my wrongs, intending their settlement
to-night
.
You have thwarted all my hopesyou
have defrauded me of all my anticipations. What
is it prevents me from putting you to death on the
spot? NothingI have no fears, no loves to
withhold
and keep me back. I live but for revenge,
and that which stays and would prevent me from
its enjoyment must also become its victim. At
this moment Munro returned with a lamp. The
affrighted girl again appealed to him, but he heeded
her not. He soon left the passage, and the
outlaw
proceeded:You love this youthnay,
shrink not back; let not your head droop in
shame; he is worthy of your love, and for this
among other things I hate him. He is worthy of
the love of others, and for this too I hate him.
Fool that you are, he cares not for you; spite of all
your aid to-night, he will not remember you
to-morrow
he
has no thought of youhis hope is
built uponhe is wedded to another.
Hear me, thenyour life is in my hands, and
at my mercy. There are none present who could
interfere and arrest the blow. My dagger is even
now upon your bosomdo you not feel it? At a
worda single suggestion of my thoughtit
performs
its office, and for this night's defeat I am half
revenged. You may arrest my armyou may
procure your releaseeven moreyou may
escape
from the bondage of that union with me for
which your uncle stands pledged, if you please.
Speaksayhow! was the eager
exclamation
of the maiden when this last suggestion met
her ears.
Put me on the scentsay on what route have
you sent this boy, that I may realize the revenge I
so often dream of.
Never, never, as I hope to live. I would rather
you should strike me dead on the spot.
Why, so I will, he exclaimed, furiously, and
his arm rose and the weapon descended, but he
arrested the stroke as it approached her.
Nonot yet. There will be time enough for
this, and you will perhaps be more ready and
resigned when I have got rid of this youth in whom
you are so much interested. I need not disguise
my purpose to youyou must have known it,
when conspiring for its defeat; and now, Lucy, be
assured, I shall not slumber in pursuit of him. I
Vol. II.D
may be delayed, my revenge may be protracted,
but I shall close with him at last. Withholding the
clue which you may unfold cannot serve him very
greatly; and having it in your hands, you may
serve yourself and me. Take my offerput me
on his route, so that he shall not escape me, and be
free henceforward from pursuit, or, as you phrase
it, from persecution of mine.
You offer highly, very highly, Guy Rivers, and
I should be tempted to any thing save this. But I
have not taken this step to undo it. I shall give
you no clue, no assistance which may lead to
crime and to the murder of the innocent. Release
my hand, sir, and suffer me to retire.
You have the means of safety and release in
your own handsa single condition complied with,
and, so far as I am concerned, they are yours.
Where is he gonewhere secreted? What is the
route which you have advised him to take. Speak,
and to the point, Lucy Munro, for I may not longer
be trifled with.
He is safe, and by this time, I hope, beyond
your reach. I tell you thus much, because I feel
that it cannot yield you more satisfaction than it
yields to me.
It is in vain, woman, that you would trifle with
and delay me: he cannot escape me in the end.
All these woods are familiar to me, in night as in
day, as the apartment in which we stand; and
towards this boy I entertain a feeling which will
endue me with an activity and energy as
unshrinking
in the pursuit as the appetite for revenge is
keen which gives them birth and impulse. I hate
him with a sleepless, an unforgiving hate, that cannot
be quieted. He has dishonoured me in the presence
of these menhe has been the instrument through
which I bear this badge, this brand-stamp on my
cheekhe has come between my passion and its
objectnay, droop notI have no reference now
to you, though you, too, have been won by his
insidious
attractions, while he gives you no thought
in returnhe has done more than this, occasioned
more than this, and wonder not that I had it in my
heart at one moment to-night to put my dagger
into your bosom, since through you it had been
defrauded of its object. But why trembledo you
not tell me he is safe?
I doand for this reason I tremble. I tremble
with joy, not fear. I rejoice that through my poor
help he is safe. I did it all. I sought himhear
me, Guy Rivers, for in his safety I feel strong to
speakI sought him even in his chamber, and felt
no shameI led the wayI guided him through all
the avenues of the housewhen you ascended the
stairs we stood over it in the closet which stands
at its head. We beheld your progresssaw, and
counted every step you took; heard every word
you uttered; and, more than once, when your
fiend soul spoke through your lips, in horrible
threatenings, my hand arrested the weapon with
which the youth whom you now seek would have
sent you to your long account, with all your sins
upon your head. I saved you from his blow; not
because you deserved to live, but because, at that
moment, you were too little prepared to die.
It would be difficult to imaginecertainly
impossible
to describe, the rage of Rivers, as, with an
excited spirit, the young girl, still trembling, as she
expressed it, from joy, not fear, avowed all the
particulars
of Colleton's escape. She proceeded with
much of the fervour and manner of one roused
into all the inspiration of a holy defiance of danger:
Wonder not, therefore, that I tremblemy soul
is full of joy at his escape. I heed not the sneer
and the sarcasm which is upon your lips and in
your eyes. I went boldly and confidently even
into the chamber of the youthI aroused him
from his slumbersI defied, at that moment of
peril, what were far worse to me than your
suspicions
I
defied such as might have been his. I
was conscious of no sinno improper thought
and I called upon God to protect and to sanction
me in what I had undertaken. He has done so,
and I bless him for the sanction.
She sank upon her knees as she spoke, and her
lips murmured and parted as if in prayer, while
the tearstears of gladnessstreamed warmly
and abundantly from her eyes. The rage of the
outlaw
grew momently darker and less governable.
The white foam collected about his mouthwhile
his hands, though still retaining their gripe upon
hers, trembled almost as much as her own. He
spoke in broken and bitter words. And may
God curse you for it. You have dared much, Lucy
Munro, this hour. You have bearded a worse fury
than the tiger thirsting after blood. What madness
prompts you to this folly? You have heard me
avow my utter, uncontrollable hatred of this man
my determination, if possible, to destroy him, and
yet you interpose. You dare to save him in my
defiance. You teach him our designs, and labour
to thwart them yourself. Hear me, girlyou
know me wellyou know I never threaten without
execution. I can understand how it is that a spirit,
feeling at this moment as does your own, should
defy death. But bethink youis there nothing in
your thought which is worse than deathfrom the
terrors of which, the pure mind, however fortified
by heroic resolution, must still shrink and tremble?
Beware, then, how you chafe me. Say where the
youth has gone, and in this way retrieve, if you can,
the error which taught you to connive at his
escape.
I know not what you mean, and have no fears
of any thing you can do. On this point I feel
secure, and bid you defiance. To think now, that,
having chiefly effected the escape of the youth, I
would place him again within your power, argues
a degree of stupidity in me that is wantonly
insulting
.
I tell you he has fledby this timebeyond
your reach. I say no more. It is enough that he
is in safety: before a word of mine puts him in
danger, I'll perish by your hands or any hands.
Then shall you perish, fool! cried the ruffian,
and his hand, hurried by the ferocious impulse of
his rage, was again uplifted, when, in her struggles
at freedom, a new object met his sight in the chain
and portrait which Ralph had flung about her neck,
and which, now falling from her bosom, arrested
his attention, and seemed to awaken some
recognition
in his mind. His hold relaxed upon her arm,
and with eager haste he seized the portrait, tearing
it away with a single wrench from the rich chain
to which it was appended, and which now in broken
fragments was strewn upon the floor. Lucy
sprang towards him convulsively, and vainly
endeavoured
at its recovery. Rivers broke the
spring, and his eyes gazed with serpent-like
fixedness
upon the exquisitely beautiful features which
it developed. His whole appearance underwent a
change. The sternness had departed from his
face, which now put on an air of abstraction and
wandering not usually a habit with it. He gazed
long and fixedly upon the portrait, unheeding the
efforts of the girl to obtain it, and muttering at
frequent intervals detached sentences, having little
dependence upon one another:
Ayit is she, he exclaimedtrue to the
D 2
lifebright, beautiful, young, innocentand I
But let me not think!
Then turning to the maid
Fond foolsee you the object of adoration with
him whom you so unprofitably adore. He loves her,
girl
her
she, whom Ibut why should I tell it
youis it not enough that we have both loved and
loved in vain; and, in my revenge, you too shall
acquire yours.
I have nothing to revenge, Guy Rivers
nothing for you, above all others, to revenge. Give
me the miniature; I have it in trust, and it must not
go out of my possession.
She clung to him as she spoke, fruitlessly
endeavouring
at the recovery of that which he
studiously
kept from her reach. He parried her efforts
for a while with something of forbearance; but ere
long his original temper returned, and he exclaimed,
with all the air of the demon
Why will you tempt me, and why longer
should I trifle? You cannot have the pictureit
belongs, or should belong, as well as its original, to
me. My concern is now with the robber from whom
you obtained it. Will you not say upon what
route he went? Will you not guide meand,
remember
wellthere are some terrors greater to
your mind than any threat of death. Declare, for
the last timewhat road he took.
The maiden was still, and showed no sign of
reply. Her eye wanderedher spirit was in
prayer. She was alone with a ruffian,
irresponsible
and reckless, and she had many fears.
Will you not speak? he criedthen you
must hear. Disclose the fact, Lucysay, what is
the road, or what the course you have directed for
this youth's escape, or and stooping down he
finished the sentence in the ears of the stunned and
suffering girl. She started at the threat, for such
it was, with undisguised horror.
Monster as you arefoul and ferocious you
do but threaten, Guy Riversyou would not dare
such a thing!
The creeping terror of her voice, as she spoke,
fully contradicted the confidence which her words
expressed.
Ay, but by hell, and I dare even more! was
the instant response of the ruffian.
Then heaven be merciful to thee and me,
was all that she said, when she sank senselessly at
his feet, just as his arms, with audacious grasp,
were encircling her waist.
CHAPTER III.
Oh, rate me as you willI do not care
For I am stern and savage like yourself;
But let your words to her fall on her ear
Smoothly, as do young lovers' sentences,
And yet be coy in this.
At
this moment Munro re-entered the
apartment
,
and his presence served to restrain the
lawlessness
of that fiercer passion which had no other
restraint at that moment. The attention of the
landlord was immediately called to the condition
of his prostrate and much-abused niece; and
reproving
his companion for his violence, without
comprehending or conjecturing its extent, he raised
her carefully from the floor and seated her in a
chair that stood in a corner of the apartment. But
she seemed utterly unconscious all the while. Her
nerves had received a shock which threatened to
impair her senses. Her cheeks were cold and
ashyher lips were livid, and parted frequently as
her teeth opened and shut with all the spasmodic
energy of one suffering from ague. Once or twice
her eyes brightened with the intelligence of
returning
consciousness; which, as Munro saw, he
hurried
his companion for the pursuit. It had now
become a matter of stern necessity with himself
to put on some degree of activity in the affair,
since the flight of the youth indicated a knowledge
of the design entertained against him, and,
doubtless
,
of all the parties. Rivers, during all this time,
seemed wrapped in thought; so much so, indeed,
as now most strangely to need the promptings,
rather than, as heretofore, the restraints of his
companion, in the pursuit of blood.
Come, Guydelay no longer. You little know
Lucy if you think we shall get any thing out of
her. You may strike, but you cannot make her
speak where her mind's fixed. Where she's bent
on a course, nothing can move her from it'twas
a trick of her father'sand I smack something of
it myself. Nay, let go her handshe must not be
used roughly; for though she has stood in our way,
she's a noble creaturetoo noble for us, by far,
Guyand must not be ill-treated.
A plague on her nobility. Think you not she
knows all our design, and has told it all to this boy.
Would you believe it of her nobleness, that she
has sought him this night in his chamberled him
forthtaught him our secret; and, sheltered in
the closet above the stairway as we ascended,
watched all our movements, and heard every thing
we said. I told you that something was stirring,
but you are duller than the owl.
Well, it's too late now for talk. I've been out
to the stable, and find his horse gone, saddle and
bridleat its entrance I found this dirk, which
looks something like the one which he drew on you.
He must have dropped it in bringing forth his
horse.
It is not too lateI know the woods well, and
he does not. We must pursue. He will doubtless
take one or other of the two traces at the fork,
and his hoofs will soon tell us which. Our horses
are refreshed by this, and are in readiness. You
have pistols: see to the flints and priming. There
must be no scruples now. The matter has gone
quite too far for quiet, and though the affair was all
mine at first, it is now as perfectly yours.
As Rivers spoke, Munro drew forth his pistols
and looked carefuly at the priming. The sharp
click of the springing steel, as the pan was thrown
open, now fully aroused Lucy to that consciousness
which had been only partial in the greater part of
this dialogue. Springing to her feet, she rushed
forward to her uncle, and looked appealingly into
his face, though she did not speak, while her hand
grasped tenaciously his arm.
What means the girl? exclaimed Munro,
now apprehensive of some mental derangement.
She spoke, with a solemn emphasis, but a single
sentence:
It is writtenthou shalt do no murder!
The solemn tonethe sudden, the almost fierce
action, the peculiar abruptness of the apostrophe
the whitely robed, the almost spiritual elevation of
figureall so dramaticcombined necessarily to
startle and surprise; and, for a few moments, no
answer was returned to the unlooked-for speech.
But the effect could not be permanent upon minds
made familiar with the thousand forms of human
and strong energies. Munro, after a brief pause,
replied
Who speaks of murder, girl? Why this wild,
this uncalled-for exhortation?
Not wild, not uncalled-for, uncle, but most
necessary. Wherefore would you pursue the youth
arms in your hands, hatred in your heart, and
horrible threatenings upon your lips. Why put
yourself into the hands of this fierce monster, as
the sharp instrument, to do his vengeance and
gratify his savage malignity against the young and
the gentle. If you would do no murdernot so
he. He will do ithe will make you do itbut
he will have it done. Approach me notapproach
me notlet me die, rather, Oh Godmy uncle, let
him come not near me if you would not see me
die upon the spot she exclaimed, in the most
terrified
manner, and with a shuddering horror as
Rivers, towards the conclusion of her speech, had
advanced towards her with the view to an
answer
.
To her uncle she again addressed herself,
with an energy which gave additional emphasis to
her language:
Uncleyou are my father nowyou will not
forget the dying prayer of a brother. My prayer
is his. Keep that man from melet me not see
himlet him come not near me with his polluted
and polluting breath. You know not what he is
you know him but as a stabberas a hateras a
thief! But were my knowledge yourscould I
utter in your ears the foul languagethe
fiend-threatenings
which his accursed lips uttered in
mine,but nosave me from him is all I ask
protect the poor orphanthe feeble, the trampled
child of your brother. Keep me from the presence
of that bad man!
As she spoke, she sank at the feet of the person
she addressedher hands were clasped about his
knees, and she lay there shuddering and shrinking,
until he lifted her up in his arms. Somewhat
softened by his kindness of manner, the pressure
upon her brain of that ague-agony was
immediately
relieved, and a succession of tears and sobs
marked the diminished influence of her terrors.
But, as Rivers attempted something in reply, she
started
Let me golet me not hear him speak. His
breath is pollutionhis words are full of foul
threats and dreadful thoughts. If you knew all
that I knowif you feared what I fear, uncle
you would nigh slay him on the spot.
This mental suffering of his niece was not
without
its influence upon her uncle; who, as we have
said before, had a certain kind and degree of pride
pride of character, we may almost call itnot
inconsistent with pursuits and a condition of life
wild and wicked even as his. His eye sternly
settled upon that of his companion, as, without a
word, he bore the almost lifeless girl into the
chamber of his wife, who, aroused by the clamour,
now and then looked forth upon the scene, but was
too much the creature of timidity to venture
entirely
amid the disputants. Placing her under the
charge of the old lady, he uttered a few consolatory
words in her ear, but she heard him not. Her
thoughts evidently wandered to other than selfish
considerations at that moment, and as he left the
chamber, she raised her finger impressivelyDo
no murder, unclelet him not persuade you into
crimebreak off from a league which compels you
to brook a foul insult to those you are bound in
duty to protect.
Would I could! was his muttered sentence
as he left the chamber. He felt the justice of the
counsel, but wore the bewildered expression of
countenance of one conscious of what is right,
but wanting courage for its adoption.
She has told you no foolish story of me? was
the somewhat anxious speech of Rivers upon the
reappearance of the landlord.
She has said nothing in words, Guy Rivers
but much in look, that made me doubt whether you,
and not this boy we pursue, should not have my
weapon in your throat. But, beware! The honour
of that child of Edgar Munro is to me what would
have been my own; and let me find that you have
gone a little beyond the permitted point in speech
or action, and we cut asunder. I shall then make
as little bones of putting a bullet through your
ribs as into those of the wild bullock of the hills.
I am what I ammy hope is that she may always
be the pure creature which she now is, if it were
only that she might pray for me.
She has mistaken me, Munro
Say no more, Guy. She has not much mistaken
you, or I have. Let us say no more on this
subject
you
know my mind, and will be advisedlet
us now be off. The horses are in readiness and
waiting, and a good spur will bring us with the
game. The youth, you say, has money about him,
a gold watch, and
Yesallbut what of that? Are there more
scruples now?
No, no! and the fierce superiority of Rivers
in all matters of crime over his companion, was
manifested in this single sentencebut, to strike,
and strike for nothing, you know, is scarcely
wisdom.
We do not strike for nothing, even though no
money come of it. I do not, at least was the
half-muttered reply of Rivers, as the two proceeded
into the court in the rear of the building, where
their horses were in waiting. In a few moments
they were in full speed over the hard and stony
road, with different emotions in their bosoms, yet
both with the same object.
CHAPTER IV.
Wretch! what art thou about?
* * * * * 'tis now upon the stroke
A hand is stretch'd out, and another too!
As though it were a grasping. Look, look, look!
His black branching horns have received the death stroke,
He sprawls and falls headlong.
Symmons' Eschylus
Cassandra
.
We
have witnessed the departure of our friend
Forrester from the place of his trysting. He went
forth with renewed confidence in the future, and
with a strong sentiment of hope enkindled in his
bosom. His course lay for the deep westthe
unopened forests and mighty waters of the
Mississippi
valley. The sting was somewhat taken from
his conscience, and with a renewed desire of life,
and warmly anticipating its enjoyments, he began
to find, as he rode quietly along under the light
of the moon and through the bending foliage,
numberless apologies for his offences. The
condition
of things generally underwent a change
strictly corresponding with that in the favour of
his affections. But who shall ride from his
destiny
?
saith the proverb. The wing of the bird
is no security against the shaft of the fowler, and
the helmet and the shield keep not away the
Vol. II.E
draught that is poisoned. He who wears the
greaves, the gorget and the coat of mail, holds
defiance
to the storm of battle; but he drinks and
dies in the hall of banqueting. What matters it,
too, though the eagle soars and screams among
the clouds, half way up to heavenflaunting his
proud pinions, and glaring with audacious glance
in the very eye of the sundeath waits for him in
the quiet of his own aerie, nestling with his brood.
These are the goodly texts of that Arabian sage,
in whose garden-tree, so much was he the beloved
of heaven, the birds came and nightly sang for him
those solemn truthsthose lessons of a perfect
wisdom
which
none but the favoured of the Deity are
ever permitted to hear. They will find a sufficient
commentary in the fortune of the rider whom we
have just beheld setting out from his parting with
his mistress, on his way of new adventurehis
heart comparatively light, and his spirit made
buoyant with the throng of pleasant fancies which
continually gathered about his thoughts.
The interview between Forrester and his
mistress
had been somewhat protracted, and his route
from her residence to the road in which we find
him, being somewhat circuitous, the night had
waned considerably in advance of his progress.
He now rode carelessly, as one who musedhis
horse, not urged by its rider, became somewhat
careful of his vigour, and his gait was moderated
much from that which had marked his outset. He
had not long entered upon the trace through the thick
wood, when the sound of other hoofs came down
upon the wind; not to his ears, for, swallowed up
in his own meditations, his senses had lost much of
their wonted acuteness. He had not been long
gone from the point of road in which we have
thought proper to find him, when his place upon
the same route was supplied by the pursuing
party, Rivers and Munro. They were both
admirably
mounted, but seemed little to regard, in
their manner of using them, the value of the good
beasts which they bestrodedriving them as they
did, resolutely over fallen trees and jutting rocks,
their sides already dashed with foam, and the flanks
bloody with the repeated application of the rowel.
It was soon evident that farther pursuit at such a
rate would be impossible; and Munro, as well for
the protection of the horses, as with the knowledge
of this necessity, insisted upon a more moderated
and measured pace. Much against his own will,
Rivers assented, though his impatience frequently
found utterance in words querulously sarcastic.
The love of gain was a besetting sin of the
landlord
,
and it was by this passion that his accomplice
found it easy, on most occasions, to defeat the
suggestions
of his better judgment. The tauntings of
the former, therefore, were particularly bestowed
upon this feature in his character, as he found
himself
compelled to yield to the requisition of the
latter
,
with whom the value of the horses was no small
consideration.
Well, well, said Rivers, if you say so, it
must be so; though I am sure, if we push briskly
ahead, we shall find our bargain in it. You too
will find the horse of the youth, upon which you
had long since set your eyes and heart, a full
equivalent, even if we entirely ruin the miserable
beasts we ride.
The horse you ride is no miserable beast,
retorted the landlord, who had some of the pride
of a southron in this particular, and seemed
solicitous
for the honour of his studyou have
jaded him by your furious gait, and seem entirely
insensible to the fact that our progress for the last
half hour, continued much longer, would knock up
any animal. I'm not so sure, too, Guy, that we
shall find the youngester, or that we shall be able
to get our own bargain out of him when found.
He's a tough colt, I take it, and will show fight
unless you surprise him.
Stayhear you nothing now, as the wind sets
up from below? Was not that the tramping of a
horse?
They drew up cautiously as the inquiry was
put by Rivers, and pausing for a few minutes,
listened
attentively. Munro dismounted, and laying
his ear to the ground, endeavoured to detect and
distinguish the distant sounds, which, in that way,
may be heard with far greater readiness; but he
arose without being satisfied.
You hear nothing?
Not a sound but that which we make
ourselves
.
Your ears to-night are marvellous quick,
but they catch nothing. This is the third time
to-night
you have fancied sounds, and heard what I
could not; and I claim to have senses in quite as
high perfection as your own.
And without doubt you have; but, know you
not, Munro, that wherever the passions are
concerned
,
the senses become so much more acute;
and, indeed, are so many sentinels and spies
scouring about perpetually, and with this
advantage
over all other sentinels, that they then never
slumber. So, whether one hates or loves, the ear
and the eye take heed of all that is going onthey
minister to the prevailing passion, and seem, in
their own exercise, to acquire some of the motive
and impulse which belongs to it.
I believe this in most respects to be the case.
I have observed it on more than one occasion
myself
,
and in my own person. But, Guy, in all that
you have said, and all that I have seen, I do not
yet understand why it is that you entertain such
a mortal antipathy to this young man, more than
to many others who have at times crossed your
path. I now understand the necessity for putting
him out of the way; but this is another matter.
Before we thought it possible that he could injure
us, you had the same violent hatred, and would
have destroyed him at the first glance. There is
more in this, Guy, than you have been willing to
let out; and I look upon it as strange, to say
nothing
more, that I should be kept so much in the
dark upon the subject.
Rivers smiled grimly at the inquiry, and replied
at once, though with evident insincerity,
Perhaps my desire to get rid of him then, arose
from a presentiment that we should have to do it
in the end. You know I have a gift of foreseeing
and foretelling.
This won't do for me, Guy; I know you too
well to regard you as one likely to be influenced
by notions of this natureyou must put me on
some other scent.
Why, so I would, Wat, if I were assured that
I myself knew the precise impulse which sets me
on this work. But the fact is, my hate to the boy
springs from certain influences which may not be
defined by namewhich grow out of those moral
mysteries of our nature, for which we can scarcely
account to ourselves; and, by the operation of
which, we are led to the performance of things
without seemingly any adequate cause or necessity.
A few reflections might give you the full force
of this. Why do some men shrink from a cat?
There is an instance now in John Bremer; a fellow,
you know, who would make no more ado about
exchanging rifle shots with his enemy at twenty
E 2
paces, than at taking dinner; yet a black cat throws
him into fits, from which for two days he never
perfectly recovers. Againthere are some persons
to whom the perfume of flowers brings sickness,
and the song of a bird sadness. How are we to
account for all these things, unless you do so by a
reference to the peculiar make of the man? In
this way you may understand why it is that I hate
this boy, and would destroy him. He is my black
cat, and his presence for ever throws me into fits.
I have heard of the things of which you speak,
and have known some of them myself; but I never
could believe that nature had been the occasion.
I was always inclined to think that circumstances
in childhood, of which the recollection is
forgotten
such
as great and sudden fright to the
infant
,
or a blow which affected the brain, were the
operating influences. All these things, however,
only affect the fanciesthey beget fears and
notions
never
deep and abiding hatredunquiet
passion, and long-treasured malignity, such as I
find in you on this occasion.
Upon this point, Munro, you may be correct.
I do not mean to say that hatred and a desire to
destroy are consequent to antipathies such as you
describe; but still, something may be said in favour
of such a notion. It appears to me but natural to
seek the destruction of that which is odious or
irksome to any of our senses. Why do you crush
the crawling spider with your heel?You fear
not its venominspect it, and the mechanism of
its make, the architecture of its own fabrication,
are, to the full, as wonderful as any thing within
your comprehension; but yet, without knowing
why, with an impulse given you, as it would seem,
from infancy, you seek its destruction with a
persevering
industry, which might lead one to
suppose
you had in view your direst enemy.
This is all very trueand from infancy up we
do this thing, but the cause cannot be in any
loathsomeness
which its presence occasions in your
mind, for we perceive the same boy destroying
with measured tortures the gaudiest butterfly
which his hat can encompass.
Non sequitur, said Rivers.
What's that? some of your dd law
gibberish
,
I suppose. If you want me to talk with you
at all, Guy, you must speak in a language I
understand
.
Why, so I will, Wat. I only meant to say, in
a phrase common to the law, and which your friend
Pippin makes use of a dozen times a day, that it
did not follow, from what you said, that the causes
which led to the death of the spider and the
butterfly
were the same. This we may know by the
manner in which they are respectively destroyed.
The boy, with much precaution and an aversion
he does not seek to disguise, in his attempts on the
spider, employs his shoe or a stick for the purpose
of slaughter. But, with the butterfly, the case is
altogether different. He first catches, and does
not fear to hold it in his hand. He inspects it
closely, and proceeds to analyze that which his
young thought has already taught him is a
beautiful
creation of the insect world. He strips it, wing
by wing, of its gaudy covering; and then, with a
feeling of ineffable scorn, that so wealthy a noble
should go unarmed and unprotected, he dashes him
to the ground, and terminates his sufferings
without
farther scruple. The spider, having a sting,
he is compelled to fear, and consequently taught
to respect. The feelings are all perfectly natural,
however, which prompt his proceedings. The
curiosity is common and innate which impels him
to the inspection of the inspection of the insect; and that feeling is
equally a natural impulse which prompts him to
the death of the spider without hesitation. So
with meit is enough that I hate this boy, though
possessed of numberless attractions of mind and
person. Shall I do him the kindness to inquire
whether there be reason for the mood which
prompts me to destroy him?
You were always too much for me, Guy, at this
sort of argument, and you talk the matter over
ingeniously enough, I grant; but still I am not
satisfied, that a mere antipathy, without show of
reason, originally induced your dislike to this young
man. When you first sought to do him up, you
were conscious of this, and gave, as a reason for
the desire, the cut upon your face, which so much
disfigured your loveliness.
Rivers did not appear very much to relish or
regard this speech, which had something of satire
in it; but he was wise enough to restrain his
feelings
,
as, reverting back to their original topic, he
spoke in the following manner:
You are unusually earnest after reasons and
motives
for action, to-night: is it not strange, Munro,
that it has never occasioned surprise in your mind,
that one like myself, so far superior in numerous
respects to the men I have consented to lead and
herd with, should have made such my profession?
Not at all, was the immediate and ready
response of his companion. Not at all. This
was no mystery to me, for I very well knew that
you had no choice, no alternative. What else
could you have done? Outlawed and under
sentence
,
I knew that you could never return, in any
safety or security, whatever might be your disguise,
to the society which had driven you outand I'm
sure that your chance would be but a bad one
were you to seek a return to the old practice at
Gwinnett court-house. Any attempt there to argue
a fellow out of the halter would be only to argue
yourself into it.
Pshaw, Munrothat is the case nowthat is
the necessity and difficulty of to-day. But where,
and what was the necessity, think you, when, in
the midst of good practice at Gwinnett bar, where
I ruled without competitor, riding roughshod over
bench, bar, and jury, dreaded alike by all, I threw
myself into the ranks of these men, and put on their
habits? I speak not now in praise of myself, more
than the facts, as you yourself know them, will
sufficiently warrant. I am now above those idle
vanities which would make me deceive myself as
to my own mental merits; but, that such was my
standing there and then, I hold indisputable.
It is true. I sometimes look back at the manner
in which you used to bully the old judge and the
gaping jury and your own brother lawyers, while
the foam would run through your clenched teeth
and from your lips in very passion; and then I
wondered, when you were doing so well, that you
ever gave up there, to undertake a business the
very first job in which put your neck in danger.
You may well wonder, MunroI could not
well explain the mystery to myself, were I to try;
and it is this which made the question and doubt
which we set out to explain. To those who knew
me well from the first, it is not matter of surprise
that I should be for ever in excitements of one kind
or another. From my childhood up, my temper
was of a restless and unquiet characterI was
always a peevish, a fretful and discontented person,
I looked with scorn and contempt upon the
humdrum
ways of those about me, and longed for
perpetual
change, and wild and fruitful circumstance.
My passions, always fretful and excitable, were
never satisfied except when I was employed in
some way which enabled me to feed and keep
alive the irritation which was their and my very
breath of life. With such a spirit, how could I be
what men style and consider a good man? What
folly to expect it. Virtue is but a sleepy, indoor,
domestic qualityinconsistent with enterprise or
great activity. There are no drones so perfect in
the world as the true orthodox. It is for this reason,
and from this cause, that a great man is seldom, if
ever, a good one. It is inconsistent with the very
nature of things to expect it, unless it be from a
co-operation of singular circumstances, whose
return is with the comets. Vice, on the contrary,
is endowed with strong passionsa feverish thirst
after forbidden fruits and watersa bird-nesting
propensity, that carries it away from the haunts of
the crowded city, into strange wilds and
interminable
forests. It lives upon adventureit counts
its years by incidents, and has no other mode of
computing time or of enjoying life. This fact
and it is undeniable with respect to both the
parties
will
furnish a sufficient reason why the best
heroes of the best poets are always great criminals.
Were this not the case, from what would the
interest
be drawn?where would be the incident, if all
men, pursuing the quiet paths of non-interference
with the rights, the lives, or the liberties of one
another, spilt no blood, invaded no territory, robbed
no lord of his lady, enslaved and made no captives
in war? A virtuous hero would be a useless
personage
both in play and poemand the spectator
or reader would fall asleep over the utterance of
stale apothegms. What writer of sense, for
instance
,
would dream of bringing up George
Washington
to figure in either of these forms before the
worldand how, if he did so, would he prevent
reader or auditor from getting excessively tired,
and perhaps disgusted, with one, whom all men are
now agreed to regard as the hero of civilization?
Nor do I utter sentiments which are subjects either
of doubt or disputation. I could put the question
in such a form as would bring the million to agree
with me. Look, for instance, at the execution of a
criminal. See the thousands that will assemble,
day after day, after travelling miles for that single
object, to gape and gaze upon the last agonizing
pangs and paroxysms of a fellow-creaturenot
regarding for an instant the fatigue of their
position
,
the press of the crowd, or the loss of a dinner
totally unsusceptible, it would seem, of the several
influences of heat and cold, wind and rain, which
at any other time would have driven them to their
beds or firesides. The same motive which
provokes
this desire in the spectator, is the parent, to
a certain extent, of the very crime which has led
to the exhibition. It is the morbid appetite, which
sometimes grows to madnessthe creature of
unregulated
passions, ill judged direction, and
sometimes
,
even of the laws and usages of society itself,
which is so much interested in the promotion of
characteristics the very reverse. It may be that
I have more of this perilous stuff about me than
the generality of mankind; but I am satisfied there
are few of them, taught as I have been, and the
prey of like influences, whose temper had been
very different from mine. The early and operating
circumstances under which I grew up, all tended
to the rank growth and encouragement of the more
violent and vexing passions. I was the victim of
a tyranny, which, in the end, made me too a tyrant.
To feel myself and exercise the temper thus taught
me, I had to acquire power in order to secure
victims
;
and all my aims in life, all my desires, tended
to this one pursuit. Indifferent to me, alike, the
spider who could sting, or the harmless butterfly
whose only offensiveness is in the folly of his
wearing
a glitter which he cannot take care of. I was
a merciless enemy, giving no quarter; and with an
Ishmaelitish spirit, lifting my hand against all the
tribes that were buzzing around me.
I believe you have spoken the truth, Guy, so
far as your particular qualities of temper are
concerned
;
for, had I undertaken to have spoken for
you in relation to this subject, I should probably
have said, though not to the same degree, the same
thing; but the wonder with me is, how, with such
feelings, you should have so long remained in quiet,
and in some respects, perfectly harmless.
There is as little mystery in the one as in the
other. You may judge that my sphere of action
speaking of
action
in a literal sensewas rather
circumscribed at Gwinnett court-house: but, the
fact is, I was then but acquiring my education. I
was, for the first time, studying men, and the study
of rogues is not unaptly fitted to make one take up
the business. I found it to have that effect. But,
even at Gwinnett court-houselearning, as I did,
and what I did, there was one passion, or perhaps
a modified form of the ruling passion, which might
have swallowed up all the rest had time been
allowed it. I was young, and not free from
vanityparticularly as, for the first time, my ears
had been won with praise and gentle flatteries.
The possession of early, and afterwards undisputed
talents, acquired for me deference and respect;
and I was soon tempted to desire the applauses of
the swinish multitude, and to feel a thirsting after
public distinction. In short, I grew ambitious. I
soon became sick and tired of the applauses, the
fame, of my own ten-mile horizon: its origin
seemed equivocalits worth and quality
questionable
,
at the best. My spirit grew troubled with
a wholesale discontent, and roved in search of a
wider fielda more elevated and extensive empire.
But how could Ithe petty lawyer of a county
court, in the midst of a wilderness, appropriate
time, find means and opportunities even for travel?
I was poor, and profits are few to a small lawyer,
whose best cases are paid for by a bale of cotton
or a negro, when both of them are down in the
market. In vain, and repeatedly, did I struggle
with circumstances that for ever foiled me in my
desires; until, in a rash and accursed hour, when
chance, and you, and the devil, threw the
opportunity
for crime in my path! It did not escape
me, andbut you know the rest.
I dobut would rather hear you tell it. When
you speak thus, you put me in mind of some of the
stump speeches you used to make, when you ran
for the Legislature.
Ay,that was another, and not the least of
the many reverses which my ambition was doomed
to meet with. You knew the man who opposed
meyou know that a more shallow and
insignificant
fop and fool never yet dared to thrust his
head into a deliberative assembly. But, he was
rich, and I poor. He a potato, the growth of
the soil;I, though generally admitted a plant
of more promise and pretension,I was an exotic!
He was a patricianone of the small nobilitya
growth,
sui generis
, of the place
Damn your Latin;stop with that, if you
please.
Well, well!he was one of the great men, I
was a poor plebeian, whose chief misfortune, at
Vol. II.F
that time, consisted in my not having a father or a
great grandfather a better man than myself! His
money did the work, and I was bought and beat
out of my election, which I considered certain.
I then acquired a knowledge of two things. I
learned duly to estimate the value of the democratic
principle, when I beheld the vile slaves, whose
votes his money had commanded, laughing in scorn
at the miserable creature they had themselves put
over them. They felt notnot theythe double
shame of their doings. They felt that he was
King Log, but never dreamt that they were his
subjects. This taught me, too, the value of money
its wonderful magic and mystery. In the mood
occasioned by all these things, you found me, for
the first time, and in a ready temper for any
villany
.
You attempted to console me for my
defeats
,
but I heard you not until you spoke of
revenge! I was not then to learn how to be
vindictive
:I
had always been so. I knew, by
instinct
,
how to lap bloodyou only taught me how
to scent it! My first great crime proved my
nature. Performed under your direction, though
without your aid, it was wantonly cruel in its
execution
,
since the prize desired might readily have
been obtained without the life of its possessor.
You, more merciful than myself, would have held
me back, and arrested my stroke; but that would
have been taking from the repast its finishthe
pleasure, for it was such to me in my condition of
mind, would have been lost entirely. It may
sound strangely even in your ears when I say
so, but I could no more have kept my knife from
that man's throat, than I could have taken wing
for the heavens. He was a poor coward,made
no struggle, and begged most piteously for his life
had the audacity to talk of his great possessions,
his rank in society, his wife and childrenthese
were enjoyments all withheld from methese were
the very things the want of which had made me
what I waswhat I amand furiously I struck
my weapon into his mouth, silencing his insulting
speech. Should such a mean spirit as his have
joys which were denied to me?I spurned his
quivering carcass with my foot. At that moment,
I felt myself:I had something to live for. I knew
my appetite, and felt that it was native. I had
acquired a knowledge of a new luxury, and ceased
to wonder at the crimes of a Nero and a Caligula.
Think you, Munro, that the thousands who
assemble
at the execution of a criminal trouble
themselves
to inquire into the merits of his caseinto
the justice of his death and punishment? Ask they
whether he is the victim of justice or of tyranny?
No!they go to see a showthey love blood, and
in this way have the enjoyment furnished to their
hands, without the risk which must follow the
shedding of it for themselves.
There is one thing, Guy, upon which I never
thought to ask you. What became of that
beautiful
young girl from Carolina, on a visit to the
village, when you lost your election? You were
then cavorting about her in great style, and I could
see that you were well-nigh as much mad after
her as upon the loss of the seat.
Rivers started at the inquiry in astonishment or
anger, and for a few moments gave no reply. He
soon recovered himself, however; for, though at
times exhibiting the passions of a demoniac, he
was too much of a proficient not to be able, in the
end, to command the coolness of the villain.
I had thought to have said nothing on this
subject
,
Munro, but there are few things which escape
your observation. In replying to you on this
point, you will now have all the mystery explained
of my rancorous pursuit of this boy. That girl
then a mere girlrefused me, as perhaps you
know; and when, heated with wine and irritated
with rejection, I pressed the point rather too
warmly, she treated me with contempt and
withdrew
from the apartment. This youth is the
favouredthe successful rival:he was but a
boy thenbut I knew him, and saw then, what
neither of them saw, that they loved each other.
Look upon this picture, Walternow, while the
moon streams through these branches upon it, and
wonder not that it maddened, and still maddens me,
to think, that for his smooth face, and stern
affectation
of superiority, I was to be sacrificed and
despised
.
She was probably a year older than
himself
:
but I saw at the time, though both of them
appeared unconscious of the fact, that she loved
him then. What with her rejection and scorn,
coming at the same time with my election defeat, I
am what I am. These defeats were wormwood to
my soul; and, if I am criminal, the parties
concerned
in them have been the cause of the crime.
How do you make that out? I do not
understand
you.
Very likelyyou are not alone. The million
would say with yourself. But hear the case as I
put it, and not as it is put by the majority.
Providence
endowed me with a certain superiority of
mind over my fellows. I had capacities which they
had nottalents to which they did not aspire, and
the possession of which they readily conceded to
me. These talents fitted me for certain stations in
society, to which, as I had the talents pre-eminently
for such stations, the inference is fair that
Providence
intended me for some such station. But I
was denied my place. Society, guilty of
favouritism
and prejudice, gave to others, not so well
fitted as myself for its purposes or necessities, the
station in all particulars designed for me. I was
denied my birthright, and rebelled. Can society
complain, when prostituting herself and depriving
me of my rights, that I resisted her usurpation and
denied her authority. Shall she, doing wrong
herself
in the first instance, undertake to punish?
Surely not. My rights were admittedmy
superior
capacity;but the people were rotten to the
corethey had not even the virtue of truth to
themselves. They made their own governors of
the vilest and the worst. They willingly became
slaves, and are punished in more ways than one.
They first create the tyrantsfor tyrants are the
creatures of the people they sway, and never make
themselvesthey next drive into banishment their
more legitimate rulers; and the consequence, in
the third place, is, that they make enemies of those
whom they exile. Such is the case with me, and such
But hark! That surely is the tread of a horse.
Do you hear it? there is no mistake now and as
he spoke, the measured trampings were heard
resounding
at some distance seemingly in advance of
them.
We must now use the spur, Munroyour
horses have had indulgence enough for the last
hour, and we may tax them a little now.
Well, push on as you pleasebut do you know
any thing of this route, and what course will you
pursue in doing him up?
Leave all that to meas for the route, it is an old
acquaintance, and the blaze on this tree reminds me
that we can here have a short cut which will carry
us at a good sweep round this hill, bringing us
upon the main trace, about two miles further down.
We must take this course, and spur on, that we may
F 2
get ahead of him, and be quietly stationed when he
comes. We shall gain it, I am confident, before
our man, who seems to be taking it easily. He
will have three miles at the least to go, and over
a road that will keep him in a walk half the way.
We shall be there in time.
They reached the point proposed in due season;
their victim had not yet made his appearance, and
they had sufficient time for all their arrangements.
The place was one well calculated for the
successful
accomplishment of a deed of darkness. The
road at the foot of the hill narrowed into a path
scarcely wide enough for the passage of a single
horseman. The shrubbery and copse on either
side overhung it; and in many places were so
thickly interwoven, that when, as at intervals of
the night, the moon shone out among the thick and
broken clouds, which hung upon and mostly
obscured
her course, her scattered rays scarcely
penetrated
the dense enclosure. At length the horseman
approached and in silence. Descending the hill,
his motion was slow and tedioushe entered the
fatal avenue, and, when in the midst of it, Rivers
started from the side of his comrade, and
advancing
under the shelter of a tree, a waited his
progress
.
He cameno word was spokena single
stroke was given, and the horseman, throwing up
his hands, grasped the limb which projected over,
while his horse passed from under him. He held
on for a moment to the branch, while a groan of
deepest agony, mental as well as physical, broke
from his lips, when he fell supine to the ground. At
that moment, the moon shone forth unimpeded
and unobscured by a single cloud. The person of
the wounded man was fully apparent to the sight.
He struggled, but spoke not; and the hand of
Rivers was again uplifted, when Munro rushed
forward.
Stayaway, Guywe are mistakenthis is
not our man.
The victim heard the words, and, with something
like an effort at a laugh, though seemingly in great
pain, exclaimed
Ah, Munro, is that you?I am so glad; but
I'm afraid you come too late. This is a sad jest!
It was Forrester who spoke, and Munro would
have saved him; but Rivers, who had done
himself
no injustice in the narrative which we have
already heard, rejected the more merciful
suggestion
.
The wounded man saw his action and heard
the controversy, and the few words he was enabled
to utter were those of prayer and entreaty.
Save me, Wathe will strike againI have
done you no harmI will do you noneand
would live, Watwould livehappyKate.
He threw up his hands with fearful energy as he
beheld his murdererfrom whom Munro had
wrested the weapon originally usedaiming a
second blow with the small hatchet which he always
wore. The interposition of Munro was without
avail; the sharp steel drove through, separating the
extended fingers of the fallen man as he threw
them up, and crushing and crunching deeply into
the scull. The unhappy woodman sank back,
without groan or further word, even as an ox
beneath
the stunning stroke of the butcher.
CHAPTER V.
A rash and ruinous deed. Thou art too quick;
Thy madness blinds thee, and thy rude stroke falls
Wide of the victim.
There
was the pause of a moment, after the
deed, in which no word was spoken. The
murderer
at length, with the utmost composure, wiping
his bloody weapon upon the long grass on the road
side, interrupted a silence which was certainly
painful to the landlord, if not to himself, by
exclaiming
Well, Munro, so far our ride has been for
nothing
,
and so much time has been lost already, that
I fear it is now hopeless to attempt further pursuit
of the boy, at least for to-night. What say you?
The person addressed did not reply to the
interrogatory
,
but in a language the result of a
different
course of thought, he returned,
It will be no wonder, Guy, if the whole
country
turns out upon us. You are too wanton in
your doings. Wherefore, when I told you of your
error, did you strike the poor wretch again.
The landlord, it will be seen, spoke simply with
reference to policy and expediency, and deserves
as little credit for humanity as the individual he
rebuked. In this particular lay the difference
between
them. Both were equally ruffianly, but the
one had less of passion, less of feeling, and more
of profession in the matter. With the other, the
trade of crime was adopted strictly in
subservience
to the dictates of ill-regulated desires and
emotions, suffering defeat in their hope of
indulgence
,
and stimulating to a morbid action which
became
a disease. The references of Munro were
always
addressed to the petty gains; and the miserly
nature, thus perpetually exhibiting itself, at the
expense of all other emotions, was, in fact, the true
influence which subjected him almost to the sole
dictation of his accomplicein whom a somewhat
lofty distaste for such a peculiarity had occasioned
a manner and habit of mind, the superiority of
which was readily felt by the other.
Why strike again? was the response of
Rivers
.
You talk like a child. Would you have
him live to blab? Saw you not that he knew us
both? Are you so green as to think, if suffered to
escape, his tongue or hands would have been idle?
You should know better. But the fact is, he could
not have lived. The first blow was fatal; and, if
I had deliberated for an instant, I should have
followed
the suggestions of your humanityI should
have withheld the second, which merely terminated
his agony.
It was a rash deed, and I would we had made
sure of your man before blindly rushing into these
unnecessary risks.
Your scruples and complainings, Wat, remind
me of that farm-yard philosopher, who always
locked the door of his stable after the steed had
been stolen. You have your sermon ready in
time for the funeral, but not during the life for
whose benefit you make it. But whose fault was
it that we followed the wrong game. Did you not
make certain of the fresh track at the fork, so that
there was no doubting you?
I didthere was a fresh track, and our
coming
upon Forrester proves it. There may have
been another on the other prong of the fork, and
doubtless the youth we pursue has taken it; but
you were in such an infernal hurry that I had
scarce time to find out what I did.
Well, you will preach no more on the subject.
We have failed, and accounting for won't mend
the failure. As for this bull-headed fellow, he
deserves
his fate for his old insolence. He was for
ever putting himself in my way, and may not
complain that I have at last put him out of it. But
come, we have no further need to remain here,
though just as little to pursue further in the
present
condition of our horses.
What shall we do with the body? we cannot
leave it here.
Why not?What should we do with it, I
pray? The wolves may want a dinner
to-morrow
,
and I would be charitable. Yet staywhere
is the youth's dirk which you found at the stable?
Give it me.
What would you do?
You shall see. Forrester's horse is offfairly
frightened, and will take the route back to the old
range. He will doubtless go to old Walton's
clearing, and carry the first news. There will be
a search, and when they find the body, they will
not overlook the weapon, which I shall place
beside
it. There will then be other pursuers than
meand if it brings the boy to the gallows, I shall
not regret our mistake to-night.
As he spoke, he received the dagger, the sheath
of which he threw at some distance in advance
upon the road, while he smeared the blade with
the blood, now fast coagulating, of the murdered
man, which still, however, continued to trickle from
the body.
You are well taught in the profession, Guy,
and, if you would let me, I would leave it off, if
for no other reason than the very shame of being
so much outdone in it. But we may as well strip
him. If his gold is in his pouch, it will be a spoil
worth the taking, for he has been melting and
running
for several days past at Murkey's furnace.
Rivers turned away, and the feeling which his
countenance exhibited might have been that of
disdainful
contempt as he replied
Take it, if you pleaseI am in no want of his
money. My object was not his robbery.
The scorn was seemingly understood; for,
without
proceeding to do as he proposed, Munro
retained
his position for a few moments, appearing
to busy himself with the bridle of his horse,
having
adjusted which he returned to his companion.
Well, are you ready for a start. We have a
good piece to ride, and should be in motion. We
have both of us much to do in the next three days,
or rather nights; and need not hesitate what to
take hold of first. The court will sit on Monday,
and if you are determined to stand and see it out
a plan I don't altogether likewhy, we must
prepare to get rid of such witnesses as we may
think likely to become troublesome.
That matter will be seen to. I have ordered
Dillon to have ten men in readiness, if need be for
so many, to carry off Pippin, and a few others, till
the adjournment. It will be a dear jest to the
lawyer
,
and one not less novel than terrifying to him,
to miss a court under such circumstances. I take
it, he has never been absent from a session for
twenty years; for, if sick before, he is certain to
get well in time for business, spite of his
physician
.
The grim smile which disfigured still more the
visage of Rivers at the ludicrous association which
the proposed abduction of the lawyer awakened in
his mind, was reflected fully back from that of his
companion, whose habit, however, in this respect,
was more notorious for gravity than any other less
stable expression. He carried out in words the
fancied occurrence, described the lawyer as raving
over his undocketed and unargued cases, and the
numberless embryos lying composedly in his
pigeon-holes, awaiting, with praiseworthy patience,
the moment when they should take upon them a
local habitation and a name; while he, upon whom
they so much depended, was fretting with
unassuaged
fury in the constraints of his prison, and
the absence from that scene of his repeated
triumphs
which before had never been at a loss for
his presence.
But, comelet us mount, said the landlord,
who did not feel much disposed to lose much, if
any time for a jest. There is much more than
this to be done yet in the village; and, I take it,
you feel in no disposition to waste more time
to-night
.
Let us be off.
So say I, but I go not back with you to-night,
Wat. I strike across the woods into the other
road, where I have much to see to; besides going
down the branch to Dixon's Ford, and Wolf's Neck,
where I must see our men and have them ready.
I shall not be in the village, therefore, until late
to-morrow
night, if then.
Whatyou are for the cross-roads, again,
said Munro. I tell you what, Guy, you must
have done with that girl before Lucy shall be
yours. It's bad enoughbad enough that she
should be compelled to look to you for love. It
were a sad thing if the little she might expect were
to be divided between two or more.
Pshawyou are growing Puritan because of
the dark. I tell you I have done with her. I
cannot
altogether forget what she was, nor what I have
made her; and just at this time she is in need of my
assistance. Good-night! I shall see Dillon and the
rest of them by morning, and prepare for the
difficulty
.
My disguise shall be complete, and if you
are wise you will see to your own. I would not
think of flight, for much may be made out of the
country, and I know of none better for our
purposes
.
Good-night!
Thus saying, the outlaw struck into the forest,
and Munro, lingering until he was fairly out of
sight and hearing, proceeded to rifle the person of
Forresteran act which the disdainful manner and
language of his companion had made him hitherto
forbear. The speech of Rivers on this subject had
been felt; and, taken in connexion with the air of
authority which the natural mental superiority of
the latter had necessarily imparted to his address,
there was much in it highly offensive to the less
adventurous ruffian. A few moments sufficed to
effect the lightening of the woodman's purse of the
earnings which had been so essential a feature in
his dreams of cottage happiness; and while
engaged
in this transfer, the discontent of the
landlord
occasionally broke out into words
He carries himself highly, indeed; and we
who are his agents and aids must stand reproved
whenever it pleases his humour. Well! I am in
for it now, and there is no chance of my getting
safely out of the scrape just at this moment; but the
day will come, and, by God, I will have a
settlement
that'll go near draining his heart of all the
blood in it.
As he spoke in bitterness, he approached his
horse, and flinging the bridle over his neck, was in
a little while a good distance on his way from the
scene of blood, over which Silence now folded her
Vol. II.G
wings, brooding undisturbed, as if nothing had
taken place below; so little is the sympathy which
the transient and inanimate nature at any time
exhibits
,
with that, to the enjoyment of which it yields
the bloom and odour of leaf and flower, soft
zephyrs and refreshing waters.
CHAPTER VI.
Ye may not slay him now. The hour's adverse,
His star is in the zenith, and it burns
Brighter and brighter now. Ye arm in vain.
Let
us now return to our young traveller, whose
escape we have already narrated. Utterly
unconscious
of the melancholy circumstance which had
diverted his enemies from the pursuit of himself, he
had followed studiously the parting directions of
the young maiden, to whose noble feeling and
fearless
courage he was indebted for his present safety;
and taken the almost
blind
path which she had
hastily described to him. On this route he had for
some time proceeded, with a motion not
extravagantly
free, but sufficiently so, having the start, and
with the several delays to which his pursuers had
been subjected, to have escaped the dangerwhile
the vigour of his steed lastedeven had they fallen
on the proper route. He had proceeded in this
way for several miles, when at length he came
upon a place whence several roads diverged into
opposite sections of the country. Ignorant of the
localities, he reined in his horse, and deliberated
with himself for a few moments as to the path he
should pursue. While thus engaged, a broad
bright glare of flame suddenly illumined the woods
on his left hand, followed with the shrieks, equally
sudden, seemingly of a woman. There was no
hesitation in the action of the youth. With
unscrupulous
and fearless precipitation, he gave his horse
the necessary direction, and with a smart
application
of the rowel, plunged down the narrow path
towards the spot from whence the alarm had
arisen. As he approached, the light grew more
intense
,
and he at length discovered a little
cottage-like
dwelling, completely embowered in thick
foliage
,
through the crevices of which the flame
proceeded
,
revealing the cause of terror, and
illuminating
for some distance the dense woods around.
The shrieks still continued; and throwing himself
from his horse, Ralph darted forward, and with a
single and sudden application of his foot, struck the
door from its hinges, and entered the dwelling just
in time to save its inmates from the worst of all
manner of death. The apartment was in a light
blazethe drapery of a couch which stood in one
corner partially consumed, and, at the first glance,
the whole prospect indicating but little hope of a
successful struggle with the conflagration. There
was no time to be lost, yet the scene was enough to
have paralyzed the nerves of the most heroic action.
On the couch thus circumstanced lay an ancient
lady, seemingly in the very last stages of disease,
and progressing rapidly to dissolution. She seemed
only at intervals conscious of the fire. At her
side, in a situation almost as helpless as her own,
was the young female whose screams had first
awakened the attention of the traveller. She lay
moaning beside the couch, shrieking at intervals,
and though in momentary danger from the flames,
which continued to increase, taking no steps for
their arrest or avoidance. Ralph went manfully
to work, and had the satisfaction of finding partial
success attend his efforts. With a fearless hand he
grasped and tore down the inflammable and
burning
drapery which curtained the windows and the
couch; and which, made of light cotton stuffs,
presented
a ready auxiliar to the progress of the
destructive
element. Striking down the burning
shutter with a single and strong blow, he admitted
the fresh air, without which suffocation must soon
have followed, and throwing from the apartment
such of the furniture as had been seized upon by
the flames, he found little difficulty in arresting
their farther advance. All this was the work of a
few moments. There had been no word of
intercourse
between the parties, and the youth now
surveyed
them with looks of curious inquiry, for the
first time. The invalid, as we have said, was
evidently
struggling with the last stages of natural
decay
.
Her companion was evidently youthful, in
spite of those marks which even the unstudied eye
might have discerned in her features, of a temper
and a spirit subdued and put to rest by the world's
strife and trial, and by afflictions which are not
often found to crowd and to make up the history
and being of the young. Their position was
peculiarly
insulated, and Ralph wondered much at the
singularity of a scene to which his own experience
could furnish no parallel. Here were two lone
womenliving on the borders of a savage nation,
and forming the frontier of a class of whites little
less savage, without any protection, and, to his
mind, without any motive for making such their
abiding place. His wonder might possibly have
taken the shape of inquiry, but that there was
something of oppressive reserve and shrinking
timidity in the air of the young woman, who alone
could have replied to his inquiries. At this time
an old female negro entered, now for the first time
alarmed by the outcry, who assisted in removing
such traces of the fire as still lingered about the
room. She seemed to occupy a neighbouring
outhouse
,
to which, having done what seemed
absolutely
necessary, she immediately retired.
Colleton, with a sentiment of the deepest
commiseration
,
proceeded to reinstate things as they
might have been before the conflagration, and
having
done so, and having soothed, as far as he well
might, the excited apprehensions of the young girl,
who made her acknowledgments in a not
unbecoming
style, he ventured to ask a few questions
as to the condition of the old lady and of herself;
but finding from the answers that the subject
was not an agreeable one, and having no pretence
further to delay, he prepared to depart. He
inquired
,
however, his farther route to the
Chestatee
river, and thus obtained a solution of the
difficulty which beset him in the choice of roads at
the fork.
While thus employed, however, and just at the
conclusion of his labours, there came another
personage
upon the scene, to whom it is necessary that
we should direct some of our attention. It will be
remembered that Rivers and Munro, after the
murder
of Forrester, had separatedthe latter on his
return to the villagethe other in a direction which
seemed to occasion some little dissatisfaction in the
mind of his companion. After thus separating,
Rivers, to whom the whole country was familiar,
taking a shorter route across the forest, by which
the sinuosities of the main road were generally
avoided, entered, after the progress of a few miles,
into the very path taken by Ralph Colleton, and
which, had it been chosen by his pursuers in the
first instance, must have entirely changed the
features
G 2
of the whole transaction. In taking this
course it was not the thought of the outlaw to
overtake
the individual whose blood he so much desired;
but with an object which will have its development
as we continue, he came to the cottage at the very
time when, having succeeded in overcoming the
flames, Ralph was employed in a task almost as
difficultthat of assuring the affrighted inmates of
the absence of any farther danger. With a
caution
which old custom had made almost natural in
such cases, Rivers, as he approached the
cross-roads
,
concealed his horse in the cover of the
woods, advanced noiselessly, and with not a little
surprise to the cottage, whose externals had
undergone
no little alteration from the loss of the shutter;
the blackened marks, visible enough in the
moonlight
,
around the window-frame, and the general
look of confusion which hung about it. A second
glance made out the steed of our traveller, which
he approached and examined. The survey
awakened
all those emotions which operated upon his
spirit when referring to his successful rival; and
approaching the cottage with extreme caution, he
took post for awhile at one of the windows, the
shutter of which, partially unclosed, enabled him to
take in at a glance each particular of the entire
apartment. He saw, at once, the occasion which
had induced the presence, in this situation, of
his most hateful enemy; and the thoughts were
strangely discordant which thronged and possessed
his bosom. At one moment he had drawn his
pistol
to his eyehis finger rested upon the trigger,
and the doubt which interposed between the youth
and eternity, though it sufficed for his safety then,
was of the most slight and shadowy description.
Again came a thought savagely sanguinary to his
soul, and the weapon's muzzle fell point blank
upon the devoted bosom of Ralph, when the slight
figure of the young woman passing between, again
arrested the design of the outlaw, who, with
muttered
curses, uncocking, returned the weapon to
his belt. Whatever might have been the
relationship
between him and these females, there was an
evident reluctance on the part of Rivers to exhibit
his ferocious hatred of the youth before those to
whom he had just rendered a great and
unquestioned
service; and though untroubled by any
feeling
of gratitude for them and for their escape, he
was yet unwilling, believing, as he did, that his
victim was now perfectly secure, that they should
undergo any further shock, at a moment too of
such severe suffering and trial as must follow with
the one, from those fatal pangs which were
destroying
the other. Ralph now prepared to depart; and
taking leave of the young woman, who alone
seemed conscious of his services, and warmly
acknowledged them, he proceeded to the door.
Rivers, who had watched his motions attentively,
and heard the directions given him by the girl for
his progress, at the same moment proceeded from
the window, and placed himself under the shelter
of a huge tree, at a little distance on the path
which his enemy was directed to pursue. Here
he waited like the tiger, ready to take the fatal
leap, and plunge his fangs into the bosom of his
victim. Nor did he wait long. Ralph was soon
upon his steed, and on the road; but the
Providence
that watches over and protects the innocent
was with him, and it happened, most fortunately,
that just before he reached the point at which his
enemy stood in watch, the badness of the road had
occasioned those who travelled it to diverge for a
few paces into a little sinuosity, which, at a little
distance on, and after the difficulty had been
rounded, brought them into it again. Upon this
turn-out (as it is technically called), Ralph
entered
,
and the tread of his horse warned the
outlaw
of the change in his enemy's position. This
change did not at the moment trouble him much,
though, such was his temper, every thing which
had the effect of thwarting or restraining, though
for an instant, his desires, irritated him to madness.
He set about to retrieve the lost ground by passing
at once across the little copse which interposed
between
the two paths. He had just gained a
position
in it commanding the path, when the traveller
approached, moving on unconscious of all danger,
and happy with the pleasing excitement natural to
one who, solicitous of human happiness, has just
performed a good action. The pace of the youth
was slow and inattentive. The outlaw coolly
prepared
his pistol as he approachedthe huge tree,
under the shelter of which he lurked, effectually
concealed him, and his respiration grew restrained
at every step in Ralph's advance. At length the
form of man and horse grew fairly perceptibleit
was almost beside himthe deadly aim was taken
the hand on the trigger, when suddenly, as the
horseman passed beneath the fatal tree, a huge pair
of wings, with a wild and flapping noise, rushed
from among its branches. The steed took flight,
and went headlong forward; while the outlaw,
seized upon for the first time in his life with a
nameless
terror, in which his excited imagination took
an active part, dropped the fatal weapon, and for a
moment stood paralyzed. In a moment he was
reassured
,
when the cause of his affright was
explained
in the uncouth hootings of the owl, whom
the tread of the horse's hoofs had expelled from the
quiet perch of his tree, and compelled to take
shelter
in another. Cursing the youth's good fortune,
not less than his own weakness, the fierce passions
of Rivers were such that he gnashed his teeth in
something like delirium. Colleton, meanwhile,
unconscious
of the danger which had awaited him,
was now fairly beyond all present pursuit, and so
frequently and completely had his enemy been
baffled in the brief progress of a single night, that
he was almost led to believefor, like most
criminals
,
he too was not without his superstition
that his foe was under some special guardianship.
With ill-concealed anger, and a stern impatience, he
turned away from the spot in which he had been
just foiled, and entered the dwelling, where we
propose
also to return.
CHAPTER VII.
She had a song of willow
willowwillow.
Shakspeare
.
His
entrance awakened no emotion among the
inmates of the dwelling; indeed, at the moment,
it was almost unperceived. The young woman
happened to be in close attendance upon her parent,
for such the person was, and did not observe his
approach, while he stood at some little distance
from the couch surveying the scene. The old lady
was endeavouring, though with a feebleness that
grew more apparent with every breath, to
articulate
something, to which she appeared to attach
much importance, in the ears of the kneeling girl,
who with breathless attention seemed desirous of
making it out, but in vain; and signifying by her
countenance the disappointment which she felt,
the speaker, with something like anger, shook
her skinny finger feebly in her face, and the broken
and incoherent words, with rapid effort but like
success, endeavoured to find their way through
the half closed aperture between her teeth. The
tears fell fast and full from the eyes of the
kneeling
girl, who neither sobbed nor spoke, but, with
continued and yet despairing attention,
endeavoured
earnestly to catch the few words of one
who was on the eve of departure, and the words of
whom, at such a moment, almost invariably acquire
a value never attached to them before; as the
sound of a harp, when the chords are breaking, are
said to articulate a sweet sorrow, as if in
mourning
for their own fate. The outlaw, all this while,
stood apart and in silence. Although perhaps but
little impressed with the native solemnity of the
scene before him, he was not so ignorant of what
was due to humanity, and not so unfeeling in
reference
to the parties here interested, as to seek to
disturb
its progress or propriety with tone, look, or
gesture, which might make either of them regret
his presence. Becoming impatient, however, of a
colloquy, which, as he saw that it had not its use, and
was only productive of mortification to one of the
parties, he thought only prudent to terminate; he
advanced towards them, and his tread, for the first
time, warned the parties of his presence. With an
effort which seemed supernatural, the dying woman
raised herself with a sudden start in the bed, and
her eyes glared upon him with a threatening
horror
,
and her lips parting, disclosed the broken and
decayed teeth beneath, ineffectually gnashing, while
her long skinny fingers warned him away. All
this time she appeared to speak, but the words
were unarticulated, though from the expression of
every feature, it was evident that indignation and
reproach made up the entire amount of every thing
she had to express. The outlaw was not easily
influenced by anger so impotent as this; and from
his manner of receiving it, it appeared that he had
been for some time accustomed to a reception of a
like kind from the same origin. He approached the
young girl, who had now risen from her knees, and
spoke to her in words of comparative kindness.
Well, Ellen, you have had an alarm, but I am
glad to see you have suffered no injury. How
happened the fire, which I see has been nigh
burning
you all up?
The young woman explained the cause of
conflagration
,
and narrated in brief the assistance
which had been received from the stranger.
But I was so terrified, Guy, she added that
I had not presence of mind enough to thank him.
And what should be the value of your spoken
thanks, Ellen. The stranger, if he have sense,
must feel that he has them, and the utterance of
such things had better be let alone. But, how is
the old lady now? I see she loves me no better
than formerly.
She is sinking fast, Guy, and is now incapable
of speech. Before you came, she seemed desirous
of saying something to me, but she tried in vain to
speak, and now I scarcely think her conscious.
Believe it not, Ellenshe is conscious of all
that is going on, though her voice may fail her.
Her eye is even now fixed upon me, and with the
old expression. She would tear me if she could.
Oh, think not thus of the dying, Guy; of her
who has never harmed, and would never harm
you, if she had the power. And yet, heaven
knows, and we both know she has had reason
enough to hate, and if she could, to destroy you.
But she has no such feeling now.
You mistake, Ellen, or would keep the truth
from me. You know she has always hated me
and, indeed, as you say, she has had cause enough
to hate and destroy me. Had another done to me
as I have done to her, I should not sleep till my
hand was in his heart.
She forgives you all, Guy, I know she does,
and God knows I forgive you; I, who, above all
others, have most reason to curse you for ever.
Think not that she can hate, upon the brink of the
grave. Her mind wanders, and no wonder that
the wrongs of earth press upon her memory, her
reason being gone. She knows not herself of the
mood which her features express. Look not upon
her, Guy, I pray you, or let me turn away my
eyes.
Your spirit, Ellen, is more gentle and shrinking
than hers. Had you felt like her, I verily believe
that many a night when I have been at rest within
your arms, you would have driven a knife into my
heart.
Horrible, Guy! how can you imagine such a
thing. Base and worthless as you have made me,
I am too much in your power; I fearI love you
too much; though like a poison or a firebrand you
have clung to my bosom, I could not have felt for
you a single thought of resentment. You say
well when you call me shrinking. I am a
creature
of a thousand fearsI am all weakness and
worthlessness.
Well, welllet us not talk further of this.
When was the doctor here last?
In the evening he came, and left some
directions
,
but told us plainly what we had to expect.
He said she could not survive longer than the night;
and she looks like it, for within the last few hours
she has sunk surprisingly. But have you brought
the medicine?
I have, and some drops which are said to
stimulate and strengthen.
I fear me they are now of little use, and may
only serve to keep up life in misery. But they
may enable her to speak, and I should like to hear
what she seems so desirous to impart.
Ellen took the cordial, and hastily preparing a
portion in a wineglass according to the directions,
proceeded to administer it to the gasping patient;
but while the glass was at her lips, the last
paroxysm
of death came on, and with it something more
of that consciousness now fleeting for ever.
Dashing
aside the nostrum with one hand, with the other
she drew the shrinking and half-fainting girl to
her side, and pressing her down beside her,
appeared
to give utterance to that, which, from the
action, and the few and audible words she made
out to articulate, would seem to have been a
benediction
.
Rivers, seeing the motion, and remarking
the almost supernatural strength with which the
last spasms had endued her, would have taken the
girl from her embrace; but his design was
anticipated
by the dying woman, whose eyes glared
upon him with an expression rather demoniac than
human, while her paralytic hand, shaking with
ineffectual
effort, waved him off. A broken word
escaped her lips here and there, andsin
forgiveness
was
all that reached the ears of her
grandchild, when her head sank back upon the
pillow, and she expired without a groan.
A dead silence followed this event. The girl
had no uttered anguishshe spoke not her sorrows
aloud; yet there was that in the wo-begone
countenance
,
and the dumb grief, that left no doubt of
the deep, though suppressed and half-subdued
agony of soul within. She seemed one to whom
the worst of life had been long since familiar, and
Vol. II.H
where one we might readily suppose who would
not find it difficult herself to die. She had
certainly
outlived pride and hope, if not love; and if
the latter feeling had its place in her bosom, as
without doubt it had, then was it a hopeless
lingerer
,
long after the sunshine and zephyr had gone
which first awakened it into bloom and flower. She
knelt beside the inanimate form of her old parent,
shedding no tear, and uttering no sigh. Tears
would have poorly expressed the wo which at that
moment she felt; and the outlaw, growing impatient
of the dumb spectacle, now ventured to approach
and interrupt her. She rose, meekly, and without
reluctance as he spoke; with a manner which said
as plainly as words could have said`command,
and I obey. Bid me go, even now, at midnight, on a
perilous journey, over and into foreign lands, and I
go without murmur and repining.' She was a
heart-stricken
a
heart-broken and abused womanand
yet she loved still, and loved her destroyer.
Ellen said he, taking her handyour
mother was a Christiana strict worshipperone
who, for the last few years of her life, seldom put
the Bible out of her handsand yet, she cursed
me in her very soul as she went out of the world.
Guy, Guy, speak not so, I pray you. Spare
me this cruelty, and say not for the departed spirit
what it surely never would have said of itself.
But it did so say, Ellen, and of this I am
satisfied
.
Hark ye, girl. I know something of
mankind
,
and womankind too, and I am not often
mistaken in the expression of human faces, and
certainly was not mistaken in hers. When, in the
last paroxysm, you knelt beside her with your head
down upon her hand and in her grasp, and as I
approached her, her eyes, which feebly threw up
the film then rapidly closing over them, shot out a
most angry glare of hatred and reproof, while her
lips partedI could see, though she could articulate
no wordwith involutions which indicated the
curse that she could not speak.
Think not so, I pray you. She had much
cause to curse, and often would she have done so,
but for my sake she did not. She would call me a
poor fool, that so loved the one who had brought
misery and shame to all of us; but her malediction
was arrested, and she said it not. Oh, no! she
forgave
you, I know she didheard you not the
words which she uttered at the last?
Yes, yesbut no matter. We must now talk
of other things, Ellen, and first of all, you must
know, then, I am about to be married.
Had a bolt from the crossbow at that moment
penetrated into her heart, the person he addressed
could not have been more transfixed at this speech.
She startedan inquiring and tearful doubt rose
into her eyes, as they settled piercingly upon his
own; but the information they met with there
needed no further word of assurance from his lips.
He was a stern tyrant,one, however, who did not
trifle.
I feared as much, GuyI have had thoughts
which as good as told me this long before. The
silent form before me has said to me over and
over again, he will never wed her whom he has
dishonoured. Oh, fool that I wasspite of her
forebodings and my own, I thoughtI still think,
and oh, Guy, let me not think in vainthat there
would be a time when you would take away the
reproach from my name and the sin from my soul,
by making me your wife, as you have so often
promised.
You have indeed thought like a child, Ellen,
if you supposed that, situated as I am, I could ever
marry simply because I loved.
And will you not love her whom you are now
about to wed?
Not as much as I have loved younot half so
much as I love you nowif it be that I have such
a feeling at this moment in my bosom.
And wherefore then would you wed, Guy,
with one whom you do not, whom you cannot love?
In what have I offendedhave I ever reproached
or looked unkindly on you, Guy, even when you
came to me, stern and full of reproaches, chafed
with all things and with everybody?
There are motives, Ellen, governing my
actions
into which you must not inquire
What, not inquire, when on these actions
depend
all my hopeall my life! Now indeed you
are the tyrant which my old mother said, and all
people say, you are.
The girl for a moment forgot her submissiveness,
and her words were tremulous, less with sorrow
than the somewhat strange spirit which her wrongs
had impressed upon her. But she soon felt the
sinking of the momentary inspiration, and quickly
sought to remove the angry scowl which she
perceived
coming over the brow of her companion.
Nay, nayforgive me, Guylet me not
reproach
let
me not accuse you. I have not done
so before; I would not do so now. Do with me
as you please; and yet, if you are bent to wed
with another, and forget and overlook your wrongs
to me, there is one kindness which would become
your hands, and which I would joy to receive from
them. Will you do for me this kindness, Guy?
nay, now be not harsh, but say that you will do it.
She seized his hand appealingly as she spoke,
and her moist but untearful eyes were fixed
pleadingly
upon his own. The outlaw hesitated for a
moment before he replied.
I propose, Ellen, to do for you all that may be
necessaryto provide you with additional
comforts
,
and carry you to a place of additional security,
where you shall live to yourself, and have good
attendance.
This is kindthis is much, Guy; but not much
more than you have been accustomed to do for me.
That which I seek from you now is something more
than thispromise me that it shall be as I say.
If it breaks not into my arrangementsif it
makes me not go aside from my path, I will
certainly
do it, Ellen. Speak therefore; what is it I
can do for you.
It will interfere with none of your
arrangements
,
Guy, I am sure; it cannot take you from
your path, for you could not have provided for
that of which you knew not. I have your pledge,
thereforehave I not.
You have, was the reply, while the manner of
Rivers was tinctured with something like curiosity.
That is kindthat is as you ought to be. Hear
me now, then, and her voice sunk into a whisper,
as if she feared the utterance of her own words
take your knife, Guypause not, do it quickly,
lest I fear and tremblestrike it deep into the
bosom of the poor Ellen, and lay her beside the
cold parent, whose counsels she despised, and all
of whose predictions are now come true. Strike
strike quickly, Guy RiversI have your promise
you cannot recedeif you have honour, if you have
truth, you must do as I ask. Give me death
give me peace.
Foolish girl, would you trifle with mewould
you have me spurn and hate you? Beware!
The outlaw well knew the yielding and sensitive
H 2
material out of which his victim had been made.
His stern rebuke was well calculated to effect in
her bosom that revulsion of feeling which he knew
would follow any threat of a withdrawal, even of
the lingering and frail fibres of that affection, few
and feeble as they were, which he might have once
persuaded her to believe had bound him to her.
The consequence was immediate, and her subdued
tone and resigned action evinced the now entire
supremacy of her natural temperament.
Oh, forgive me, Guy, I know not what I ask or
what I do. I am so worn and weary, and my head
is so heavy, that I think it were far better if I were
in my grave, with the cold frame whom we shall
soon put there. Heed not what I sayI am sad
and sick, and have not the spirit of reason, or a
healthy will to direct me. Do with me as you
willI will obey yougo anywhere, and, worst
of all, behold you wed anotheray, stand by, if
you desire it, and look on the ceremony, and try
to forget that you once promised me that I should
be a party to it, along with you.
You speak more wisely, Ellenand you will
think more calmly upon it when the present grief
of your mother's death passes off.
Oh, that is no grief, now, Guy, was the rather
hasty reply. That is no grief now;should I
regret that she has escaped these tidingsshould
I regret that she has ceased to feel trouble, and to
see and shed tearsshould I mourn, Guy, that she
who loved me to the last, in spite of my follies and
vices, has ceased now to mourn over them? Oh,
no! this is no grief, now; it was grief but a little
while ago, but now you have made it matter of
rejoicing.
Think not of it,speak no more in this strain,
Ellen, lest you anger me.
I will notchide me notI have no farther
reproaches. Yet, Guy, is she, the lady you are
about to wedis she beautiful,is she younghas
she long raven tresses, as I had once, when your
fingers used to play in them? and with a sickly
smile, which had in it something of an old vanity,
she unbound the string which confined her own
hair, and let it roll down upon her back in thick
and beautiful volumes, black, glossy, and delicately
soft as silk.
The outlaw was moved. For a moment his
iron muscles relaxeda gentler expression
overspread
his countenance, and he took her in his
arms. That single, half-reluctant embrace was a
boon not much bestowed in the latter days of his
victim, and it awakened a thousand tender
recollections
in her heart, and unsealed a warm spring
of gushing waters. An infantine smile was in her
eyes, while the tears were flowing down her
cheeks.
But, shrinking or yieldingat least to any great
extentmade up very little of the character of
the dark man on whom she depended, and the
more than feminine weakness of the young girl
who hung upon his bosom like a dying flower,
received its rebuke, after a few moments of
unwonted
tenderness, when coldly resuming his stern
habit, he put her from his arms, and announced to
her his intention of immediately taking his
departure
.
What, she askedwill you not stay with
me through the night, and situated as I am?
It is impossibleeven now I am waited for,
and should have been some hours on my way to
an appointment which I must not break. It is not
with me as with youI have obligations to others
who depend on me, and who might suffer injury
were I to deceive them.
But this night, Guythere is little of it left,
and I am sure you will not be expected before the
daylight. I feel a new terror when I think I shall
be left by all, and here, too, alone with the dead.
You will not be alone, and if you were, Ellen,
you have been thus lonely for many months past,
and should be now accustomed to it.
Why, so I should, for it has been a fearful and
a weary time, and I went not to my bed one night
without dreading that I should never behold another
day.
Why, what had you to alarm youyou suffered
no affrightno injury? I had taken care that
throughout the forest your cottage should be
respected.
So I had your assurance, and when I thought,
I believed it. I knew you had the power to do as
you assured me you would, but still there were
moments when our own desolation came across
my mind; and what with my sorrows and my fears,
I was sometimes persuaded, in my madness, to
pray that I might be relieved of them, were it
even by the hands of death.
You were ever thus foolish, Ellen, and you
have as little reason now to apprehend as then.
Besides, it is only for the one night, and in the
morning
I shall send those to you who will attend to
your own removal to another spot, and to the
interment
of the body.
And where am I to go?
What matters it where, Ellen? You have my
assurance that it shall be a place of security, and
good attendance to which I shall send you.
Truewhat matters it where I gowhether
among the savage or the civilized. They are to
me all alike, since I may not look them in the face,
or take them by the hand, or hold communion with
them either at the house of God or at the family
fireside.
The gloomy despondence of her spirit was
uppermost; and she went on, in a series of bitter
musings, denouncing herself as an outcasta
worthless something, and, in the language of the
sacred text, calling on the rocks and mountains
cover her. The outlaw, who had none of those
fine feelings which permitted of even momentary
sympathy with that desolation of heart, the sublime
agonies of which are so well calculated to enlist
and awaken it, cut short the string of sorrow
and complaint by a fierce exclamation, which
seemed to stun every sense of her spirit.
Will you never have done? he demanded.
Am I for ever to listen to this weaknessthis
unavailing
reproach of yourself and every thing
around you? Do I not know that all your
complaints
and reproaches, though you address them
in so many words to yourself, are intended only
for my use and ear? Can I not see through the
poor hypocrisy of such a lamentation? Know I
not that when you curse and deplore the sin, you
only withhold the malediction from him who
tempted and partook of it, in the hope that his
own spirit will apply it all to himself? Away, girl
I thought you had a nobler spiritI thought you
felt the love that I now find existed only in
expression
.
I do feel that loveI would, Guy, that I felt it
notthat it did exist only in my words. I were
far happier then than I am now, since stern look and
language from you would then utterly fail to vex
and wound my spirit as it does now. I cannot
bear your reproacheslook not thus upon me and
speak not in those harsh sentencesnot nownot
now, at least, and in this melancholy presence.
Her looks turned upon the dead body of her
parent as she spoke, and with convulsive effort she
rushed towards and clasped it round. She threw
herself beside the corpse and remained inanimate,
while the outlaw, leaving the house for an instant,
called the negro servant and commanded her
attendance
.
He now approached the girl, and
taking
up her hand, which lay supine upon the bosom
of the dead body, would have soothed her grief,
but though she did not repulse, she yet did not
regard
him.
Be calm, Ellen, he said, recover and be firm.
In the morning you shall have early and good
attention
,
and with this object, in part, am I disposed
to hurry now. Think not, girl, that I forget you.
Whatever may be my fortune, I shall always have
an eye to yours. I leave you now, but shall see
you before long, when I shall settle you
permanently
and comfortably. Farewell.
He left her in seeming unconsciousness of the
words whispered in her ears, yet she heard them
all, and duly estimated their value. To her, to
whom he had once pledged himself entirely, the
cold boon of his attention and sometime care was
painfully mortifying. She exhibited nothing,
however, beyond what we have already seen, of
the effect of this cold consolation upon her heart.
There is a period in human emotions, when
feeling
itself becomes imperceptiblewhen the heart
(as it were) receives the
coup de grace
, and days,
and months, and years, before the body expires,
grows unconscious of the fire which is consuming
it. We would not have it understood to be
altogether
the case with the young destitute before us;
but, at least, if she still continued to feel these still
occurring influences, there was little or no
outward
indication of their power upon the hidden
spirit. She said nothing to him on his departure,
but with a half-wandering sense, that may
perhaps
have described something of the ruling
passion
of an earlier day, she rose, shortly after he had
left the house, and placing herself before the small
mirror which surmounted the toilet in the
apartment
,
re-arranged with studious care, and with an
eye to its most attractive appearance, the long and
flowing tresses of that hair, which, as we have
already
remarked, was of the most silky and
ravenlike
description. Every ringlet was adjusted to
its place, as if nothing of sorrow was about
hernone of the badges and evidences of death
and decay in her thought. She next proceeded to
the re-adjustment of the dress she wore, taking care
that a string of pearl, probably the gift of her now
indifferent lover, should leave its place in the little
cabinet, where, with other trinkets of the kind, it
had been locked up carefully for a long season, and
once more adorned with it the neck which it failed
utterly to surpass in delicacy or in whiteness.
Having
done this, she again took her place on the couch,
along with the corpse; and with a manner which
did not appear to indicate a doubt of the still
lingering spirit, she raised the lifeless head, with
the gentlest effort placing her arm beneath, then
laid her own quietly on the pillow beside it.
CHAPTER VIII.
The rogues came down the hill,
In a formidable band
And the sable captain call'd aloud,
But he could'nt make us stand.
The First Fight
.
Ignorant
, as we have already said, of his late
most providential escape from the weapon of his
implacable enemy, Ralph Colleton was borne
forward
by his affrighted steed with a degree of
rapidity which entirely prevented his rider from
remarking any of the objects around him, or,
indeed
,
as the moon began to wane amid a clustering
body of clouds, of determining positively whether
he was still in the road or not. The
trace
(as
public
roads are called in that region) had been
rudely cut out by some of the earlier travellers
through the Indian country, merely
traced
out
and hence, perhaps, the termby a
blaze
, or white
spot, made upon the trees by hewing from them the
bark; which badge, repeated in succession upon
those growing immediately upon the line chosen
for the destined road, indicated its route to the
wayfarer
.
It had never been much travelled, and from
the free use at the present time of other and more
direct courses, it was left almost totally
unemployed
,
save by those living immediately in its
neighbourhood. It had therefore become, at the
time of which we speak, what, in backwood phrase,
is known as a
blind-path
. Such being the case, it is
not difficult to imagine that, when able to restrain
his horse, Ralph, as he feared, found himself
entirely
out of its guidancewandering without
direction among the old trees of the forest. Still, as
for the night now nearly over, he could have no
distinct point in view, and saw just as little reason
to go back as forward, he gave himself but little
time for scruple or hesitation. Resolutely, though
with a cautious and gentle motion, he pricked his
steed forward through the woods, accommodating
his philosophy, as well as he could, to the various
interruptions which the future, as if to rival the
past, seemed to have treasured up in store for him.
He had not proceeded far in this manner when he
caught the dim rays of a distant fire, flickering and
ascending among the trees to the left of the
direction he was taking. The blaze had
something
in it excessively cheering, and, changing his
course, he went forward under its guidance. In
this effort, he stumbled upon something like a path,
which, pursuing, brought him at length to a small
and turbid creek, into which he plunged fearlessly,
and soon found himself in swimming water. The
ford had been little used, and the banks were steep,
so that he got out with difficulty upon the opposite
side. Having done so, his eye was enabled to
take a full view of the friendly fire which had just
attracted his regard, and which he soon made out
to proceed from the encampment of a wagoner,
such as may be seen every day, or every night, in
the wild woods of the southern country. He was
emigrating, with all his goods and gods, to that
wonderfully winning region, in the estimation of this
people, the valley of the Mississippi. The
emigrant
was a stout, burly, bluff old fellow, with full
round cheeks, a quick, twinkling eye, and limbs
rather Herculean than human. He might have
been fifty-five years or so; and his two sons, one of
Vol. II.I
them a man grown, the other a tall and goodly youth
of eighteen, promised well to be just such vigorous
and healthy looking personages as their father.
The old woman, by whom we meanin the
manner
of speech common to the same class and region
to indicate the spouse of the wayfarer, and
mother of the two youths, was busied about the
fire, boiling a pot of coffee, and preparing the family
repast for the night. A somewhat late hour for
supper and such employment, thought our
wanderer
;
but the difficulty soon explained itself in the
condition of their wagon, and the conversation
which ensued among the travellers. There was
yet another personage in the assembly, who must
be left to introduce himself to the reader. The
force
of the travellerfor such is the term by
which the number of his slaves are understood
was small; consisting of some six
workers
, and
three or four little negro children asleep under the
wagon. The workers were occupied at a little
distance
,
in replacing boxes, beds, and some household
trumpery, which had been taken out of the wagon,
to enable them to effect its release from the slough
in which it had cast one of its wheels, and broken
its axle, and the restoration of which had made
their supper so late in the night. The heavier
difficulties of their labour had been got over, and
with limbs warmed and chafed by the extra
exercise
they had undergone, the whites had thrown
themselves under a tree, at a little distance from
the fire at which the supper was in preparation,
while a few pine torches, thrown together, gave
them sufficient light to read and remark the several
countenances of their group.
Well, by dogs, we've had a tough 'bout of it,
boys; and, hark'ye, strannger, give us your hand. I
don't know what we should have done without you,
for I never seed man handle a little pole-axe as you
did that same affair of your'n. You must have
spent, I reckon, a pretty smart time at the use of
it, now, didn't ye?
To this speech of the old farmer, a ready reply
was given by the stranger, in the identical voice
and language of our old acquaintance, the pedler,
Jared Bunce, of whom, and of whose stock in
trade, the reader will probably have some
recollection
.
Well, now, I guess, friend, you an't far wide of
your reckoning. I've been a matter of some
fifteen
or twenty years knocking about, off and on,
in one way or another, with this same instrument,
and pretty's the service now, I tell ye, that it's done
me in that bit of time.
No doubt, no doubtbut what's your trade,
if I may be so bold, that made you larn the use of
it so nicely.
Oh, whatmy tradewhy, to say the truth,
now, I never was brought up to any trade in
particular
,
but I play a pretty slick hand, now, I tell
you, at all of them. I've been in my time a little
of a farmer, a little of a merchant, a little of a
sailor, and somehow or other, a little of every
thing, and all sort of things. My father was jest
like myself, and swore, before I was born, that I
should be born jest like himand so I was. Never
were two black peas more alike. He was a 'cute
old fellow, and swore he'd make me so tooand
so he did. You know how he did that?now, I'll
go a York shilling 'gainst a Louisiana bit, that you
can't tell to save you.
Why no, I can'tlet's hear, was the response
of the wagoner, somewhat astounded by the
volubility
of his new acquaintance.
Well, then, I'll tell you. He sent me away, to
make my fortune and git my edication 'mongst
them who wasn't cute themselves, and maybe that
an't the best school for larning, a simple boy ever
went to. It was the very making of me, so far as
I was made.
Well, now, that is a smart way, I should
reckon, to get one's edication. And in this way
I suppose you larned how to chop with your little
pole-axedogs!but you've made me as smart a
looking axle as I ever tacked to my team.
I tell you, friend, there's nothing like sich an
edication. It does every thing for a man, and he
larns to make every thing out of any thing. I
could make my bread where these same Indians
wouldn't find the skin of a hoe-cake; and in these
woods or in the middle of the sea, t'ant any thing
for me to say I can contrive always to fish up
some notion that will sell in the market.
Well, now, that's wonderful, strannger, and I
should like to see how you would do it.
You can't do nothing, no how, friend, unless
you begin at the beginning. You'll have to begin
when you're jest a mere boy, and set about getting
your edication as I got mine. There's no two
ways about it. It won't come to you; you must
go to it. When you're put out into the wide world,
and have no company and no acquaintance, why,
what are you to do? Suppose now, when your
wagon mired down, I had not come to your help,
and cut out your wood, and put in the spoke,
wouldn't you have had to do it yourself?
Yesto be sure; but then I couldn't have done
it in a day. I an't handy at these things.
Well, that was jest the way with me when I
was a boy. I had nobody to help me out of the
mudnobody to splice my spokes or assist me
any how, and so I larned to do it myself. And
now, would you think it, I'm sometimes glad of a
little turn over, or an accident, jest that I may keep
my hand in, and not forget to be able to help
myself
or my neighbours.
Well, you're a
curous
person, and I'd like to
hear something more about you. But it's high
time we should
wet our whistles
, and it's but dry
talking without something to wash a clear way for
the slack. So, boys, be up, and fish up the
jemmijohn
I
hope it han't been thumped to bits in the
rut. If it has I shall be in a
tearing
passion.
Well, now, that won't be reasonable, seeing
that it's no use, and jest wasting good breath that
might bring a fair price in the market.
What, not get in a passion if all the whiskey's gone? That won't do, strannger, and though you
have helped me out of the ditch, by dogs, no man
shall prevent me from getting in a passion if I
choose it.
Oh, to be sure, friendyou an't up to my idee.
I did'nt know that it was for the good it did you
that you got in a passion. I am clear that when a
man feels himself better from a passion, he oughtn't
to be shy in getting into it. Though that wasn't a
part of my edication, yet I guess, if such a thing
would make me feel more comfortable, I'd get in a
passion fifty times a day.
Well, now, strannger, you talk like a man of
sense. '
Drot
the man, says I, who hasn't the
courage
to get in a passion. None but a miserable,
shadow-skinning Yankee would refuse to get in a
passion when his jug of whiskey was left in the
road.
Ahem coughed the dealer in small wares
the speech of the old wagoner grating harshly
upon his senses; for if the Yankee be proud of any
thing, it is of his countryits enterprise, its
institutions
;
I 2
and of these, perhaps, he has more true
and unqualified reason to be pleased and proud
than any other one people on the face of the globe.
He did not relish well the sitting quietly under the
harsh censure of his companion, who seemed to
regard the existence of a genuine emotion among
the people down East as a manifest absurdity;
and was thinking to come out with a defence, in
detail, of the pretensions of New-England, when,
prudence having first taken a survey of the huge
limbs of the wagoner and calling to mind the fierce
prejudices of the uneducated southrons generally
against all his tribe, suggested the convenient
propriety
of an evasive reply.
Ahem repeated the Yankee, the
argumentum
ad hominem
still prominent in his eyes
well, now, I take it, friend, there's no love to spare
for the people you speak of down in these parts.
They don't seem to smell at all pleasant in this
country.
No, I guess not, strannger, as how should they
a mean, tricky, catchpenny, skulking setthat
makes money out of everybody, and han't the
spirit to spend it. I do hate them, now, worse than
a pole-cat.
Well, now, friend, that's strange. If you were
to travel now for a spell, down about Boston or
Salem in Massachusetts, or at Meriden in
Connetticut
,
you'd hear tell of the Yankees quite
different
.
If you believe what the people say
thereabouts
,
you'd say there was no sich people on the
face of the airth.
That's jist because they don't know any thing
about them; and it's not because they can't know
them neither, for a Yankee is a varmint you can
nose any where. It must be that none ever travels
in those partsselling their tin kettles, and their
wooden clocks, and all their notions.
Oh, yes, they do. They make 'em in those
parts. I know it by this same reason, that I bought
a lot myself from a house in Connetticut, a town
called Meriden, where they make almost nothing
else but clockswhere they make 'em by steam,
and horse-power, and machinery, and will turn
you out a hundred or two to a minute.
The pedler had somewhat overleaped his
shoulders, as they phrase it in the west, when his
companion drew himself back over the blazing
embers, with a look of ill-concealed aversion,
exclaiming
,
as he did so
Why, you an't a Yankee, are you?
The pedler was a special pleader in one sense
of the word, and knew the value of a technical
distinction
as well as his friend, Lawyer Pippin. His
reply was prompt and professional.
Why, no, I an't a Yankee according to your
idee. It's true, I was born among them, but that,
you know, don't make a man one on them?
No, to be sure not. Every man that's a
freeman
has a right to choose what country he shall
belong
to. My dad was born in Ireland, yet he always
counted himself a full-blooded American.
The old man found a parallel in his father's
nativity
,
which satisfied himself of the legitimacy of
the ground taken by the pedler, and helped the
latter out of his difficulty.
But here's the whiskey, standing by us all the
time, waiting patiently to be drunk. Here, Nick
Snell, boy, take your hands out of your breeches
pocket, and run down with the
calibash
to the
branch
. The water is pretty good there, I reckon;
and, strannger, after we've taken a
sup
, we'll eat a
bite
, and then
lie down
. It's high time, I reckon,
that we do so.
It was in his progress to the branch, that Ralph
Colleton came upon this member of the party.
Nick Snell was no genius, and did not readily
reply
to the passing inquiry which was put to him
by the youth, who advanced upon the main party
while the dialogue between the pedler and the
wagoner was in full gust. They started, as if by
common consent, to their feet, as his horse's tread
smote upon their ears; but satisfied with the
appearance
of a single man, and witnessing the jaded
condition of his steed, they were content to invite
him to partake with them of the rude cheer which
the good woman was now busied in setting before
them. The
hoe-cakes
and bacon were smoking
finely, and the fatigue of the youth engaged his
senses, with no unwillingness on their part, to
detect
a most savoury attraction in the assault which
they made upon his sight and nostrils alike. He
waited not for a second invitation, but in a few
moments, having first stripped his horse, and put
the saddle, by direction of the emigrant, into his
wagon, he threw himself beside them upon the
ground, and joined readily and heartily in the
consumption
of the goodly edibles which were spread
out before them. They had not been long at this
game when a couple of fine watch dogs which
were in the camp, guarding the baggage, gave the
alarm, and the whole party was on the alert, with
sharp eye and cocked rifle. They commenced a
survey, and at some distance could hear the tread
of horsemen seemingly on the approach. The
banditti
,
of which we have already spoken, were well
known to the emigrant, and he had already to
complain
of divers injuries at their hands. It is not,
therefore, matter of surprise, that he should place
his sentinels, and prepare even for the most
audacious
attack. He had scarcely made this
disposition
of his force, which exhibited them to the best
advantage, when the strangers made their
appearance
.
They rode cautiously around, without
approaching
the defences sufficiently nigh to
occasion
strife, but evidently having for their object
originally an attack upon the wayfarer. At length
one of the party, which consisted of six persons,
now came forward, and with a friendly tone of
voice, bade them good evening, in a manner which
seemed to indicate a desire to be upon a footing of
the most amiable sort with them. The old man
answered dryly, with some show of sarcastic
indifference
in his speech,
Ay, good evening enough, if the moon had
not gone down and if the stars were out, that we
might pick out the honest men from the rogues.
What, are there rogues in these parts, then, old
gentleman? asked the new comer.
Why do you ask me, was the sturdy reply.
You ought to be able to say, without going
farther
than your own pockets.
Why, you are tough to-night, my old buck,
was the somewhat crabbed speech of the visiter.
You'll find me troublesome, too, Mr.
Night-walker
so
take good counsel, and be off while
you've whole bones, or I'll tumble you now in half
a minute from your crittur, and give you a sharp
supper of pine-knots.
Well, that wouldn't be altogether kind on your
part old fellow, and I mightn't be willing to let
you; but as you seem not disposed to be civil, I
suppose the best thing I can do is to be off.
Ay, ay, be off. You get nothing out of us;
and we've no shot that we want to throw away.
Leave you alone, and Jack Ketch will save us
shot.
Ha, ha! exclaimed the outlyer, in concert, and
from the deeper emphasis which he gave it, in
chorus
to the laughter which followed, among the
party, the dry expression of the old man's humour.
Ha, ha! old boyyou have the
swing
of it
to-night
,
was the reply of the visiter, as he rode off
to his companionsbut, if you don't mind, we
shall smoke you before you get into Alabam.
The robber rejoined his companions, and a sort
of council for deliberation was determined upon
among them.
How now, I ambertyou have been at dead
fault, was his sudden address, as he returned, to
one of the party. You assured me that old Snell
and his two sons were the whole force that he
carried
,
while I find two stout able-bodied men
beside
,
all well armed, and ready for the attack. The
old woman, too, standing with the gridiron in her
fists, is equal of herself to any two men, hand to
hand.
Lambert, a short, sly, dogged little personage,
endeavoured to account for the error, if such it was
but he was sure, that at starting, there were
but threethey must have had company join them
since. Did the lieutenant make out the
appearance
of the others?
I did, said the officer in command, and, to
say truth, they do not seem to be of the old
fellow's
party. They must have come upon him
since the night. But how came you, Lambert, to
neglect sawing the axle. You had time enough
when it stood in the farm-yard last night, and you
were about it a full hour. The wagon stands as
stoutly on its all-fours as the first day it was built.
I did that, sir, and did it, I thought, to the very
mark. I calculated to leave enough solid to bear
them to the night, when in our circuit we should
come among them just in time to finish the business.
The wood is stronger, perhaps, than I took it to be,
but it won't hold out longer than to-morrow, I'm
certain, when, if we watch, we can take our way
with them.
Well, I hope so, and we must watch them, for
it won't do to let the old fellow escape. He has, I
know, a matter of three or four hundred hard
dollars
in his possession, to buy lands in Mississippi,
and it's a pity to let so much good money go out
of the state.
But why may we not set upon them now,
inquired
one of the youngest of the party.
For a very good reason, Briggsthey are
armed, ready, and nearly equal in number to
ourselves
;
and though I doubt not we should be able
to ride over them, yet I am not willing to leave
one or more of us behind. Besides, if we keep
the look-out to-morrow, as we shall, we can settle
the business without any such risk.
This being the determination, the robbers, thus
disappointed of their game, were nevertheless in
better humour than might have been well expected;
but such men are philosophers, and their very
recklessness of human life is in some respects the
result of a due estimate of its vicissitudes. They
rode on their way laughing at the sturdy
bluntness
of the old wagoner, which their leader, of
whom we have already heard under the name of
Dillon, related to them at large. With a whoop
and halloo, they cheered the travellers as they rode
by, but at some distance from, the encampment.
The tenants of the encampment, thus strangely
but fortunately thrown together, having first seen
that every thing was quiet, took their severally
assigned places, and laid themselves down for
repose
.
The pedler contenting himself with
guessing
that them 'ere chaps did not make no great
deal by that speculation.
CHAPTER IX.
And here they dwell, the human-hating throng,
Skill'd in all mischief, ripe for every wrong.
It
was in the wildest and least trodden recesses
of the rock and forest, that the band of outlaws, of
which Rivers was the great head and leader, had
fixed their place of abode and assemblage. A
natural cavity, formed by the juxtaposition of
two huge rocks, overhung by a third, with some
few artificial additions, formed for them a cavern,
in whichso admirably was it overgrown by the
surrounding forest, and so finely situated among
hills and abrupt ridges yielding few inducements
for travelthey found the most perfect security.
It is true such a shelter could not long have
availed them as such, were the adjacent country in
the possession of a civilized people; but the near
neighbourhood of the Cherokees, by keeping back
civilization, was perhaps, quite as much as the
position
they had chosen, its protection from the
scrutiny of many, who had already, prompted by
their excesses, endeavoured, but partially, on
more than one occasion, to find them out. The
place was distant from the village of
Chestatee
about ten miles, or perhaps more. No
highway
no
thoroughfare or public road passed in
its neighbourhood, and it had been the policy of the
outlaws to avoid the use of any vehicle, the traces
of which might be followed. There was, beside,
but little necessity for their employment. The
place of counsel and deliberation was not necessarily
their place of abode, and the several members of
the band found it more profitable by far to reside,
or keep stations, in the adjacent hamlets and
stands
(for by this latter name in those regions, the nightly
stopping-places of wayfarers are commonly
designated
)where,
in most cases, they put on the
appearance, and in many respects bore the
reputation
,
of staid and sober working men. This
arrangement was perhaps the very best for the
predatory
life they led, as it afforded opportunities
for information which otherwise must have been
lost to them. In this way they heard of this or that
travellerhis destinationthe objects he had in
view, and the wealth he carried about with him.
In one of these situations the knowledge of old Snell's
journey, and the amount of wealth in his possession,
had been acquired, and in the person of the worthy
stable-boy who brought corn to the old fellow's
horses the night before, and whom he rewarded
with a
thrip
(the smallest silver coin known in the
southern currencythe five cent issue excepted)
we might, without spectacles, recognise the active
fugleman of the outlaws, who sawed half through
his axle, cleaned his wheels of all their grease, and
then attempted to rob him the very night after.
Nor, though thus situated, was it a matter of
difficulty
to call them together upon an emergency.
One or more of the most trustworthy among them
had only to make a tour over the road, and through
the hamlets in which they were scattered within
the circuit of ten or twenty miles, and as they kept
Vol. II.K
usually with rigid punctuality to their several
stations
,
they were soon apprized, and off at the first
signal. A whisper in the ear of the hostler who
brought out your horse, or the drover who put
up the cattle, was enough; and the absence of a
colt from pasture, or the missing of a stray young
heifer from the flock, furnished a sufficient reason
to the proprietor for the occasional absence of Tom,
Dick, or Harry: who, in the meanwhile, was,
most probably crying `stand' to a true man, or
cutting
a trunk from a sulky, or, in mere wantonness,
shooting down the traveller who had perhaps given
him a long chase, yet yielded nothing by way of
compensation for the labour.
Dillon, or, to speak more properly and to the
card, Lieutenant Dillon, arrived at the place of
assemblage
just as the day was breaking. He was
a leader of considerable influence among the
outlaws
,
and, next to Rivers, was most popular.
Indeed
,
in certain respects, he was far more popular;
for, though perhaps not so adroit in his profession,
nor so well fitted for its command, he was
possessed
of many of those qualities which are apt
to be taking with the fierce democratie! He was
a prince of hail fellowswas thoroughly versed
in low jest and scurvy anecdotecould play at
push-pins, and drink at every point in the game;
and, strange to say, though always drinking, was
never drunk. Nor, though thus accomplished, and
thus prone to these accomplishments, did he ever
neglect or forget those duties which he assumed to
perform, or which were assigned him. No
indulgence
led him away from his postand, on the
reverse
,
no post compelled or constrained him into
gravity. He was a careless, reckless blade,
indifferent
alike, it would seem, to sun or storm, rain or
shineand making of life a circle, that would not
inaptly have illustrated the favourite text of
Sardanapalus
.
He arrived at the cave, as we have said, just as
the day was breaking. A shrill whistle along the
ridges of wood and rock, as he passed them, denoted
the various stations of the sentinels, as studiously
strewn along the paths by which their place of
refuge might be assailed, as if they were already
beleaguered
by a superior and assailing army.
Without
pausing to listen to the various speeches and
inquiries which assailed his ears upon his arrival,
he advanced to the cavern, and was told that the
captain had been for some time anxiously awaiting
his arrivalthat he had morosely kept the inner
recess of the cave, and since his return, which had
not been until late in the night, had been seen but
two or three times, and then but for a moment,
when he had come forth to make inquiries for
himself
.
Leaving his men differently disposed, Dillon
at once penetrated into the small apartment in
which his leader was lodged, assured of the
propriety
of the intrusionwhich had otherwise
subjected
him, most probably, to some severe
reprimand
from
what had just been told him. The
recess
,
which was separated from the outer hall
by a curtain of thick coarse stuff, falling to the
floor from a beam, the apertures for the reception
of which had been chiselled in the rock, was dimly
illuminated by a single lamp, hanging from a chain,
which was in turn fastened to a pole that stretched
directly across the apartment. A small table in
the centre of the room, covered with a piece of
cotton cloth, a few chairs, a broken mirror, and on
a shelf that stood trimly in the corner, a few glasses
and decanters, completed the furniture of the
apartment
.
On the table at which the outlaw sat, lay
his pistolsa huge and seemingly unwieldy, but
well-made pair. A short sword, a dirk, and one
or two other weapons of similar description,
contemplated
only for hand-to-hand purposes, lay along
with them; and the better to complete the
picture
,
now already something
outr
, a decanter of
brandy and tumblers were contiguous. Rivers
did not observe the slide of the curtain to the
apartment, nor the entrance of Dillon. He was
deeply absorbed in contemplation; his head rested
heavily upon his two palms, while his eyes were
deeply fixed upon the now opened miniature which
he had torn from the neck of Lucy Munro, and
which rested before him. He sighed nothe
spoke not, but ever and anon, as if perfectly
unconscious
all the while of what he did, he drank
from the tumbler of the compounded draught that
stood before him, hurriedly and desperately, as if
to keep the strong emotion from choking him.
There was in his look a bitter agony of expression,
indicating a vexed spirit, now more strongly than
ever at work in a way which had, indeed, been one
of the primest sources of his miserable life. It
was a spirit ill at rest with itselfvexed at its own
feebleness of executionits incapacitude to attain
and acquire the realization of its own wild and
vague conceptions. His was the ambition of one
who discovers at every step that nothing can be
known, yet will not give up the unprofitable
pursuit
,
because, even while making the discovery, he
still hopes vainly that he may yet, in his own
person
,
give the maxim the lie. For ever soaring to
the sun, he was for ever realizing the fine Grecian
fable of Icarus, and the sea of disappointment into
which he perpetually fell, with its tumultuous tides
and ever chafing billows, bearing him on from
whirlpool to whirlpool, for ever battling and for ever
lost. He was unconscious, as we have said, of
the entrance and approach of his lieutenant, and
words of bitterness, in soliloquy, fell at brief periods
from his lips.
It is after all the best he mused.Despair
is the true parent of philosophy, since it begets
indifference
yet
do I not despair. Why should I
hope? What prospect is there now, that these
eyes, that lip, these many graces, and the imperial
pride of that expression, which looks out like a
high soul from the heaven that men talk and dream
ofwhat delusion is there now to bid me hope they
ever can be more to me than they are now. I care
not for the world's waysnor feel I now the pang
of its scorn and its outlawry; yet I would it were
not so, that I might, upon a field as fair as that of
the most successful, assert my claim, and woo and
win hernot with those childish notes of
commonplace
that
sickly cant of sentimental stuff which
I despise, and which I know she despises no less
than I. Yet, when this field was mine, as I now
desire it, what more did it avail me. Where was
the strong sensethe lofty reason that should then
have conquered with an unobstructed force,
sweeping
all before it, as the flame that rushes through
the long grass of the prairies. Goneprostrate
dumb. The fierce passion was upward, and my
heart was then more an outlaw than I myself am
now. Yet there is one hopeone chanceone
path, if not to her affections, at least to her. It
shall be done, and then, most beautiful enchantress
witch, wizard, stern, and to me heartless, as
thou hast ever beenthou shalt not always
triumph
.I
would that I could sleep on thisI would
that I could sleep. There is but one time of
happiness
but
one time when the thorn has no sting
when the scorn bites notwhen the sneer chafes
notwhen the pride and the spirit shrink not
K 2
when there is no wild passion to make every thing
a storm and a conflagration among the senses
and that isforgetfulness. I would that I could
sleep and as he spoke, his head sunk upon the
table with a heavy sound, as if unconsciousness
had really come with the articulated wish. He
started quickly, however, as now for the first time
the presence of Dillon became obvious, and
hurriedly
thrusting the portrait into his vest, he turned
quickly to the intruder, and sternly demanded the
occasion of his interruption. The lieutenant was
prepared, and at once replied to the interrogatory
with the easy, blunt air of one who not only felt
that he might be confided in, but who was then in
the strict performance of his duties.
I came at your own call, captain. I have just
returned from the river, and skirting down in
that quarter, and was kept something later than I
looked for; hearing, on my arrival, that you had
been inquiring for me, I did not hesitate to present
myself at once, not knowing but the business might
be pressing.
It is pressing, responded the outlaw, seemingly
well satisfied with the tacit apology. It is
pressing
,
Dillon, and you will have little time for rest
before starting again. I myself have been riding
all night, and shall be off in an hour again. But
what have you to report? What's in the wind now?
I hear but little, sir. There is some talk about
a detachment of the Georgia Guard, something
like a hundred men, to be sent out expressly for
our benefit; but I look upon this as a mistake.
Their eye is rather upon the miners, and the Indian
gold lands and those who dig it, and not upon those
who merely take it after it is gathered. I have
heard, too, of something like a brush betwixt
Fullam's
troop and the miners at Tracy's diggings,
but no particulars, except that the Guard got the
worst of it.
On that point I am already advised. That is
well for us, since it will turn the eye of the
authorities
in a quarter in which we have little to do.
I had some hand in that scrape myself, and set the
dogs on with this object, and it is partly on this
matter that I would confer with you, since there
are some few of our men in the village who had
large hands in it, who must not be hazarded, and
must yet stay there.
If the brush was serious, captain, that will be
a matter of some difficulty; for of late, there has
been so much of our business done, that
government
,
I believe, has some thought of taking it up,
and in order to do so without competition, will
think of putting us down. Uncle Sam and the
states, too, are quarrelling in the business, and, as I
hear, there is like to be warm work between them.
The Georgians are quite hot on the subject, and
go where I will, they talk of nothing else than
hanging
the President, the Indians, and all the judges.
They are brushing up their rifles, and they speak
out plain.
The more sport for usbut this is all idle. It
will all end in talk, and, whether it does or not,
we, at least, have nothing to do with it. But,
there is drinkfilland let us look to business
before either of us sleep.
The lieutenant did as suggested by Rivers, who,
rising from his seat, continued for some time to pace
the apartment evidently in deep meditation. He
suddenly paused, at length, and resuming his seat,
inquired of Dillon as to the manner in which he
had been employed through the last few days. A
narration not necessary to repeat followed from
the officer, in which the numerous petty details of
frontier irregularity made up the chief material.
Plots and counterplots were rife in his story, and
more than once the outlaw interrupted his officer
in the hope of abridging the petty particulars of
some of their attenuated proportionsan aim not
always successful, since among the numerous
virtues
of Lieutenant Dillon, that of precision and
niceness in his statement of particulars must not
be omitted. To this narration, however, though
called for by himself, the superior yielded but little
attention, until he proceeded to describe the
adventure
of the night, resulting so unsuccessfully,
with the emigrating farmer. When he described
the persons of the two strangers, so unexpectedly
lending their aid in defence of the traveller, a new
interest was awakened in the features and manner
of his auditor, who here suddenly and with some
energy of expression interrupted him, to make
inquiries into particulars with regard to their
dress and appearance, which not a little surprised
Dillon, who had frequently experienced the
aversion
of his superior to all seemingly unnecessary
minuti. Having been satisfied on these points,
the outlaw rose, and pacing the apartment with
slow steps, seemed to meditate some design which
the narrative had suggested. Suddenly pausing,
at length, as if all the necessary lights had shone
in upon his deliberations at once, he turned to
Dillon, who stood in silent waiting, and thus
proceeded
to detail the duties at present provided for
him.
I have it, said he, half-musingly, to his
lieutenant
.
I have it, Dillonit must be so. How
far, say you, is it from the place where the man
what's his nameencamped last night?
Nine or ten miles, perhaps, or more.
And you know his route for to-day?
There is now but one which he can take,
pursuing
the route which he does.
And upon that he will not go more than fifteen
or twenty miles in the day. But not so with
him
not so with
him
. He will scarcely be content
to move at that pace, and there will be no hope in
that way to overtake him.
Rivers spoke in soliloquy, and Dillon, though
accustomed to many of the mental irregularities
of his superior, exhibited something like surprise
as he looked upon the lowering brows and
unwonted
indecision of the outlaw.
Of whom does the captain speak? was his
inquiry.
Of
whom?
of
him
of
him!
was the rather
abrupt response of the superior, who seemed to
regard the ignorance of his lieutenant as to the
object in view with almost as much wonder as
that worthy entertained at the moment for the
hallucinations of his captain.
Of whom should I speakof whom should I
think but the onethe thing accursed, fatal and
singular, who and he stopped short, while his
mind, now comprehending the true relationship
between himself and the person beside him, which,
in his moody self-examination, he had momentarily
forgotten, proceeded to his designs with all of his
wonted coherence.
I wander, Dillon, and am half-asleep. The
fact is, I am almost worn out with this
unslumbering
motion. I have not been five hours out of the
saddle in the last twenty-four, and it requires
something
more of rest, if I desire to do well what I
have on handwhat, indeed, we both have on
hand.
There was something apologetic in the manner,
if not in the language, of the speaker; and his words
seemed to indicate, if possible, an excuse for the
incoherence of his address, in the physical fatigue
which he had undergonein this way to divert
suspicion from those mental causes of excitement,
of which, in the present situation, he felt some what
ashamed. Pouring out a glass of liquor, and
quaffing
it without pause, he motioned to the lieutenant
to do the samea suggestion not possible for that
person to misunderstand,and then proceeded to
narrate such portions of the late occurrences in
and about the village as it was necessary that he
should know. He carefully suppressed his own
agency in any of these events, for, with the policy
of the ancient, he had learned, at an early period
in his life, to treat his friend as if he might one day
become his enemy; and, so far as such a resolution
might consistently be maintained while engaged
in such an occupation as his, he rigidly observed it.
The business, Dillon, which I want you to
execute, and to which you will give all your own
attention, is difficult and troublesome, and requires
ingenuity. You are to know, then, that Mark
Forrester
was killed last night, as is supposed, in a
fray with a youth named Colleton, like himself a
Carolinian. If such is not the opinion yet, I am
determined such shall be the opinion; and have
made arrangements by which the object will be
attained. Of course the murderer should be taken,
and I have reasons to desire that this object too
should be attained. It is on this business, then, that
you are to go. You must be the officer to take
him.
But where is he?if within reach, you know
there is no difficulty.
Hear methere is difficulty, though he is
in reach. He is one of the men whom you found
with the old farmer you would otherwise have
attacked last night. There is difficulty, for he
will fight like a wild beast, and stick to his ground
like a rattlesnake; and, supported by the old fellow
whom you found him with, he will be able to resist
almost any force which you could muster on the
emergency. The only fear I have, is, that being
well-mounted, he will not keep with the company,
but as they must needs travel slowly, he will go on
and leave them.
Should it not rather be a source of
satisfaction
than otherwisewill it not put him more
completely
at our disposal?
Nofor having so much the start of you, and
a good animal, he will soon leave all pursuit behind
him. There is a plan which I have been thinking
of, and which will be the very thing, if at once
acted upon. You know the sheriff, Maxson, lives
on the same road,you must take two of the men
with you, pick fresh and good horses, set off to
Maxson's at once with a letter which I shall give
you, and he will make you special deputies for the
occasion of this young man's arrest. I have
arranged
it so that the suspicion shall take the shape
of a legal warranty, sufficient to authorize his
arrest
and detention. The proof of his offence will
be matter of after consideration.
But will Maxson do thismay he not refuse?
You know he has been once before threatened with
being brought up for his leaning towards some of
us, in that affair of the Indian chief, Enakamon.
He cannothe dare not refuse! said the
outlaw
,
rising impatiently. He holds his place and
his life at my disposal, and he knows it. He will
not venture to refuse me!
He has been very scrupulous of late in all his
dealings with us, you know, and has rather kept out
of our way. Besides that, he has been
thorough-going
at several camp-meetings lately, and, when
a man begins to appear over-honest, I think it high
time he should be looked after by all parties.
You are right, Dillon, you are right. I should
not trust it to paper either. I will go myself.
But you shall along with me, and on the way I will
put you in a train for bringing out certain prisoners
whom it is necessary that we should secure before
the sitting of the court, and until it is over. They
might be foolish enough to convict themselves and
us of being more honest than their neighbours, and
it is but humane to keep them from the
commission
of so sad an impropriety. Give orders for
the best two of your troop, and have horses saddled
for all four of us. We must be on the road, on the
spot.
Dillon did as directed, and returned to the
conference
,
which was conducted, on the part of his
superior, with a degree of excitation and warmth,
mingled with a sharp asperity of manner,
something
unwonted for him in the discussion and
arranging
of any mere matter of business.
Maxson will not refuse us; if he does, I will
hang him by my saddle straps. The scoundrel owes
his election to our votes, and shall he refuse us
what we ask. He knows his fate too well to
hesitate
as to what he shall do.And then, Dillon, when
you have his commission for the arrest of this boy,
spare not the spur: secure him at all hazards of
horseflesh or personal inconvenience. He will not
resist the laws, or any thing having their semblance;
nor, indeed, has he any reason
No reason, sirwhy, did you not say he had
killed Forrester? inquired his companion.
Your memory is sharp, master lieutenantI
did say, and I say so still. But he affects to think
not, and I should not be at all surprised if he not
only denies it to you, but in reality disbelieves it
himself. Have you not heard of men who have
learned in time to believe the lies of their own
invention
.
Why not men doubt the truth of their
own doings. There are such men, and he may be
one of them. He may deny stoutly and solemnly
the charge, but let him not deceive you or baffle
your pursuit. We shall prove it upon him, and he
shall hang, Dillonay, he shall hang, hang, hang
though it be under her very eyes!
It was in this way, that, in the progress of the
dialogue which took place between the chief and
his subordinate, the rambling malignity would break
through the cooler counsels of the villain, and dark
glimpses of the mystery of the transaction would
burst upon the senses of the latter. Rivers had
the faculty, however, seemingly intuitive, of never
exhibiting too much of himself; and when hurried
on by a passion seemingly too fierce and furious
for restraint, he would suddenly curb himself in,
while a sharp and scornful smile would curl his
lips, as if he felt a consciousness, not only of his
own powers of command, but of his
impenetrability
to all examination and analysis.
The horses being now ready, the outlaw,
buckling
on his pistols, and hiding his dirk in his bosom,
threw a huge dark cloak over his shoulders, which
fully enveloped and concealed his person; and, in
company with his lieutenant, and two stout men of
his band, all admirably and freshly mounted, they
proceeded to the abode of the sheriff, who,
connected
,
though secretly, with Rivers and Munro,
was indebted to them and the votes which in that
region they could throw into the boxes, for his
success
in his elevation to the office which he held,
and was, as might reasonably have been expected,
a mere creature in their hands, and under their
management. Maxson, of late days, however,
Vol. II.L
whether from a reasonable apprehension,
increasing
duly with increasing years, that he might
become
at last so involved in the meshes of those
crimes of his colleagues, from which, while he was
compelled to share the risk, he was denied in great
part the profit, had grown scrupuloushad avoided
as much as possible their connexion; and the
better
to strengthen himself in the increasing favour
of public opinion, had taken advantage of all those
externals of morality and virtue which, unhappily,
too frequently conceal qualities at deadly hostility
with them. He had, in the popular phrase of the
country got religion; and, like the worthy
reformers
of the Cromwell era, every thing which he
did, and every thing which he said, had Scripture
for its authority, or he had none of it.
Psalm-singing
commenced and ended the day in his house, and
graces before meat and graces before sleep, prayers
and ablutions, thanks givings and fastings, had so
much thinned the animal necessities of his
household
,
that a domestic war was the consequence, and
the sheriff and the sheriff's lady held separate sway,
having equally divided the dwelling between them,
and ruling each their respective sovereignties with
a most jealous watchfulness. All rights, not
expressly
delegated in the distribution of powers
originally, were insisted on even to blood; and the
arbitration of the sword, or rather the poker, once
appealed to, most emphatically by the sovereign of
the gentler sex, had cut off the euphonious
utterance
of one of the choicest paraphrases of
Sternhold
and Hopkins in the middle; and by splitting
the scull of the reformed and reforming sheriff, had
nearly rendered a new election necessary to the
repose and well-being of the county in which
they lived. But the worthy convert recovered,
to the sore discomfiture of his spouse, and to the
comfort and rejoicing of all true believers. The
breach in his head was healed, but that which
separated
his family remained the same
As rocks that had been rent asunder;
They knew the fellowship of man and wife only
in so much as was absolutely essential to the
keeping
up of appearances to the public eyea
matter
necessary to maintaining her lord in the
possession
of his dignitywhich, as it conferred
honour
and profit, through him, upon her too, it was of
necessity a part of her policy to continue.
There had been a brush--a small gust had
passed over that fair region of domestic harmony,
on the very morning upon which the outlaw and
his party rode up the untrimmed and
half-over-grown
avenue, which led to the house of the
writ-server
.
There had been an amiable discussion
between the two, as to which of them, with
propriety
,
belonged the duty of putting on the breeches
of their son Tommy, preparatory to his making
his appearance at the breakfast-table. Some
extraneous
influence had that morning prompted the
sheriff to resist the performance of a task which
had now for some time been imposed upon him,
and for which, therefore, there was the sanction of
prescription and usage. It was an unlucky
moment
for the assertion of his manhood; for, a series
of circumstances operating just about that time
unfavourably
upon the mind of his wife, she was in
the worst possible humour upon which to try
experiments
.
She heard the refusal of her liege to do
the required duty, therefore, with an astonishment,
not unmingled with a degree of pleasure, as it
gave a full excuse for the venting forth upon him of
those splenetic humours, which, for some time, had
been growing and gathering in her system. The
little sheriff, from long attendance on
courts
and
camps
, had acquired something more, perhaps, of
the desire and disposition, than the capacity, to
make long speeches and longer sermons, in the
performance of both of which labours, however, he
was admirably fortified by the technicals of the
law, and the Bible phraseology. The quarrel had
been waged for some time, and poor Tommy, the
bone of contention, sitting all the while between
the contending parties in a state of utter nudity,
kept up a fine running accompaniment to the full
tones of the wranglers, by crying bitterly for his
breeches. For the first time for a long period of
years, the lady found her powers of tongue fail in the
proposed effect upon the understanding of her loving
and legal lord; and knowing but of one other way
to assail it, her hand at length grappling with the
stool, from which she tumbled the breechless babe
without scruple, seized upon an argument to which
her adversary could oppose neither text nor
technical
;
when, fortunately for him, the loud rapping
of their early visiters at the outer door of the
dwelling interposed between her wrath and its
object
,
and spared the life of the devout sheriff for
other occurrences. Bundling the naked child out
of sight, the mother rushed into an inner
apartment
,
shaking the stool in the pale countenance of
her lord as she retreated, in a manner and with a
significance which said, as plainly as words could
say, that this temporary delay would only sharpen
her appetite for vengeance, and exaggerate its
terrors
when the hour did arrive. It was with a
hesitating
step and wo-begone countenance, therefore,
that the officer proceeded to his parlour, where
a no less troublesome, but less awkward, trial
awaited him.
CHAPTER X.
We come on warrant for your taking, sir,
And do arrest you, as a dangerous man,
Full of most foul design and traitorous thought,
And hostile to our rule.
The
high-sheriff made his appearance before
his early and well-known visiters with a desperate
air of composure and unconcern, the effort to
attain
which was readily perceptible to his
companions
.
He could not, in the first place, well get rid
of those terrors of the domestic world from which
their interruption had timely shielded him; nor, on
the other hand, could he feel altogether assured that
the visit now paid him would not result in the
exaction
of some usurious interest. He had recently,
as much through motives of worldly as spiritual
policy, become an active religionist, in a small way,
in and about the section of country in which he
resided; and knowing that his professions were
in some sort regarded with no small degree of
doubt and suspicion by some of his brethren
holding
the same faith, he felt the necessity of playing
a close and cautious game in all his practices. He
might well be apprehensive, therefore, of the visits
of those who never came but as so many omens
of evil, and whose claims upon, and perfect
knowledge
of, his true character, were such, that he felt
himself, in many respects, most completely at their
mercy.
Rivers did not give much time to preliminaries,
but, after a few phrases of commonplace, coming
L 2
directly to the point, he stated the business in hand,
and demanded the assistance of the officer of
justice
for the arrest of one of its fugitives. There
were some difficulties of form in the matter, which
saved the sheriff in part, and which the outlaw had
in great part overlooked. A warrant of arrest
was necessary from some officer properly
empowered
to issue one, and a new difficulty was thus
presented in the way of Colleton's pursuit. The
sheriff had not the slightest objections to making
deputies of the persons recommended by the
outlaw
,
provided they were fully empowered to
execute
the commands of some judicial officer; beyond
this, the scrupulous executioner of justice was
unwilling
to go; and having stood out so long in the
previous controversy with his spouse, it was
wonderful
what a vast stock of audacious courage he
now felt himself entitled, and ventured, to manifest.
I cannot do it, Master Guyit's impossible
seeing, in the first place, that I han't any right by
the laws to issue any warrant, though it's true, I
has to serve them. Then, agin, in the next place,
'twont do for another reason that's jist as good,
you see. It's only the other day, Master Guy, that
the fear of the Lord come upon me, and I got
religion
;
and now I've set myself up as a worker
in other courts, you see, than those of man; and
there be eyes around me that would see, and hearts
to rejoice at the backslidings of the poor labourer.
Howbeit, Master Guy, I am not the man to
forget
old sarvice; and if it be true that this man has
been put to death in this manner, though I myself
can do nothing at this time, I may put you in the
wayfor the sake of old time, and for the sake of
justice, which requires that the slayer of his brother
should also be slainof having your wish.
Though something irritated still at the reluctance
of his former creature to lend himself without
scruple
to his purposes, the outlaw did not hesitate to
accept the overture, and to press for its immediate
accomplishment. He had expostulated with the
sheriff for some time on the point, and baffled and
denied, he was very glad, at the conclusion of the
dialogue with that worthy, to find that there was
even so much of a prospect of concert, though
falling far short of his original anticipations, from
that quarter. He was too well aware, also, of
the difficulty in the way of any proceeding
without
something savouring of authority in the
matter
;
for, from a previous and rather correct
estimate
of Colleton's character, he well foresaw
that, knowing his enemy, he would fight to the last
against an arrest, which, under the forms of law
and with the sanction of a known officer, he would
otherwise readily recognise and submit to.
Seizing
,
therefore, upon the speech of the sheriff, he
eagerly availed himself of its opening to obtain
those advantages in the affair, of which, from the
canting spirit and newly-awakened morality of his
late coadjutor, he had utterly begun to despair.
He proceeded to reply to the suggestion as
follows
:
I suppose I must content myself, Maxson, with
doing in this thing as you say, though really I see
not why you should now be so particular, for there
are not ten men in the county who are able to
determine
upon any of your powers, or who would
venture to measure their extent. Let us hear your
plan, and I suppose it will be effectual in our
object
,
and this is all I want. All I desire is, that our
people, you know, should not be murdered by
strangers
without rhyme or reason.
The sheriff knew well the hypocrisy of the
sentiment
with which Rivers concluded, but made
no remark. A single smile testified his
knowledge
of the nature of his colleague, and indicated
his suspicion of a deeper and different motive for
this new activity. Approaching the outlaw closely,
he asked, in a half whisper:
Who was the witness of the murderwho
could swear for the magistrate? You must get
somebody to do that.
This was another point which Rivers, in his
impatience
,
had not thought to consider. But
fruitful
in expedient, his fertile mind suggested that
ground of suspicion was all that the law required
for apprehension at least, and having already
arranged
that the body of the murdered man should
be found under certain circumstances, he contented
himself with procuring commissions, as deputies,
for his two officers, and posted away to the village.
Here, as he anticipated, the intelligence had already
been receivedthe body of Forrester had been
found, and sufficient ground for suspicion to
authorize
a warrant was recognised in the dirk of
the youth which, smeared with blood as it had been
left by Rivers, had been found upon the body.
Rivers had but little to do. He contrived,
however
,
to do nothing himself. The warrant of
Pippin
,
as magistrate, was procured, and the two
officers
,
commissioned by the sheriff, went off in pursuit
of the supposed murderer, against whom the
indignation
of all the village was sufficiently heightened
by the recollection of the close intimacy existing
between
Ralph and Forrester, and the nobly
characteristic
manner in which the latter had volunteered to
do his fighting with Rivers. The murdered man had,
independent of this, no small popularity of his own,
which brought out for him a warm and active
sympathy highly creditable to his memory. Old
Walton, too, suffered deeply, not less on his own,
than his daughter's account. She, poor girl, had
few words, and her sorrow, silent, if not tearless,
was confined to the solitude of her own chamber.
In the prosecution of the affair against Ralph,
there was but one person whose testimony could
have availed him, and that person was Lucy
Munro. As the chief particular in evidence, and
that which established the strong leading
presumption
against him, consisted in the discovery of his
dagger alongside the body of the murdered man,
and covered with his blood; it was evident that
she who could prove the loss of the dagger by the
youth, and its finding by Munro, prior to the event,
and unaccompanied by any tokens of crime, would
not only be able to free the person suspected, at least
from this point of suspicion, but would be enabled to
place its burden elsewhere, and with the most
conclusive
distinctness. This was a dilemma which
Rivers and Munro did not fail to consider. The
private deliberation, for an hour, of the two
conspirators
,
determined upon the course which for
mutual safety they were required to pursue; and
Munro gave his niece due notice to prepare for an
immediate departure with her aunt and himself, on
some plausible pretence, to another portion of the
country. To such a suggestion, as Lucy knew
not the object, she offered no objection; and a secret
departure was effected of the three, who, after a
lonely ride of several hours through a route
circuitously
chosen to mislead, were safely brought
to the sheltered and rocky abiding-place of the
robbers, as we have already described it. Marks
of its offensive features, however, had been so
modified
as not to occasion much alarm. The
weapons
of war had been studiously put out of sight,
and apartments, distinct from those we have
seen, partly the creation of nature, and partly of
man, were assigned to the accommodation of the
new comers. The outlaws had their instructions,
and did not appear, though lurking and watching
for ever around in close and immediate
neighbourhood
.
Nor, in this particular alone, had the guilty
parties
made due provision for their future safety.
The affair of the Guard had made more stir than
had been anticipated in the rash moment which had
seen its consummation; and their advices warned
them of the approach of a much larger force of
State troops, obedient to the direction of the
district
attorney, than they could well contend with.
They determined, therefore, prudently for
themselves
,
to keep as much out of the way of
detection
as they could; and to avoid those risks upon
which a previous conference had partially
persauded
them to adventure. They were also
apprized
of the greater excitement attending the fate
of Forrester, than could possibly have followed
the death, in his place, of the contemplated victim:
and adopting a habit of caution, heretofore but
little considered in that region, they prepared for all
hazards, and at the same time, tacitly determined
upon the suspension of their numerous atrocities
at least, while a controlling force was in the
neighbourhood
.
Previous impunity had led them so
far, that at length the neighbouring country was
aroused, and all the better classes, taking advantage
of the excitement, grew bolder in the expression of
their anger against those who had beset them so
long. The sheriff, Maxson, had been something
tutored by these influences, or, it had been fair to
surmise, his scruples would have been less difficult
to overcome.
In the mean time, the pursuit of Ralph Colleton,
as the murderer of Forrester, had been hotly urged
by the officers. The pursuers knew the route, and
having the control of new horses as they
proceeded
,
at frequent intervals, gained of course at
every step upon the unconscious travellers. We
have seen the latter retiring to repose at a late
hour of the night. Under the several fatigues
which all parties had undergone, it is not strange
that the sun should have arisen some little time
before those who had not retired quite so early as
himself. At a moderately late hour they breakfasted
togetherthe family of the wagoner, and Ralph,
and our old friend the pedler. Pursuing the same
route, the two latter, after the repast, separated,
with many acknowledgments on both sides, from
the emigrating party, and pursued their way
together
.
On their road, Bunce gave the youth a long
and particular account of all those circumstances
at the village inn by which he had been deprived
of his chattels, and congratulated himself not a
little on the adroit thought which had determined
him to retain the good steed of the Lawyer Pippin
in lieu of his losses. He spoke of it as quite a
clever and creditable performance, and one as fully
deserving the golden honours of the medal as
many of those doings which are so rewarded. On
this point his companion said little; and though he
could not altogether comprehend the propriety of
the pedler's morals, he certainly did not see but
that the necessity and pressing danger of his
situation
somewhat sanctioned the deceit. He
suggested
this idea to Bunce, but when he came to
talk of the propriety of returning the animal the
moment he was fairly in safety, the speculator
failed entirely to perceive the philosophy of his
doctrine.
The sheriff's officers came upon the wagoner a
few hours after the two had separated from them.
The intelligence received from him quickened their
pace, and towards noon, they descried our two
travellers ascending a hill a few hundred yards in
advance of them. A repeated application of the
spur brought them together, and, as had been
anticipated
by Rivers, Ralph offered not the slightest
objection, when once satisfied of the legality of his
arrest, to becoming their prisoner. But the
consternation
of Bunce was inexpressible. He
endeavoured
to shelter himself in the adjoining woods,
and was quietly edging his steed into the covert for
that purpose, on the first alarm, but was not
permitted
by the sharp eyes and ready unscrupulosity
of the robber representatives of the law. They
had no warrant, it is true, for the arrest of any
other person than the said Ralph Colletonbut
the unlucky colour of Pippin's horse, and their
perfect knowledge of the animal, readily identifying
him, did the business for the pedler. Under the
custody of the laws, therefore, we behold the youth
retracing his ground, horror-stricken at the death
of Forresterindignant at the suspicions
entertained
of himself as the murderer, but sanguine of
the result, and firm and fearless as ever. Not so
Buncethere were cruel visions in his sight of
seven-sided pine railsfierce regulatorsLynch's
law, and all that terrible paraphernalia of
punishment
,
which is studiously arrayed in those regions
for the enjoyment of evil-doers. The next day
found them both securely locked up in the common
jail of Chestatee.
CHAPTER XI.
I must go on, yet tremblewould shrink back,
Yet dare not. 'Tis a good thought prompts me on,
And let me stand to it. I may not lose,
Whatever be the game. There are high powers
That watch for the well-doing, and befriend.
The
young mind of Colleton, excursive as it
was, could scarcely realize to itself the strange
and rapidly succeeding changes of the last few
days. Shelf-exiled from the dwelling in which so
much of his heart and hope had been stored up
a wanderer among the wanderingassaulted by
ruffiansthe witness of their crimespursued by
the officers of justice, and finally the tenant of a
prison, as a criminal himself! After the first
emotions
of astonishment and vexation had subsided
ignorant of the result of this last adventure, and
preparing for the worsthe called for pen and
paper, and briefly, to his uncle, recounted his
adventures
,
as we have already related them, partially
acknowledging his precipitance in departing from
his house, but substantially insisting upon the
propriety
of those grounds which had made him do
so. To Edith, what could he say? Nothing
every thing. His letter to her, enclosed in that to
her uncle, was just such as might be expected from
one with a character such as we have endeavoured
to describethat of the genuine aristocrat of
Carolina
gentle,
but firmsoothing, but manlytruly
but loftily affectionatethe rock touched, if not
softened, by the sunbeam. Warm and impetuous,
Vol. II.M
but generally just in his emotionsliberal in his
usual estimate of mankind, and generous, to a
fault, in all his associations. Ignorant of any value
in money, unless for high purposesas subservient
to taste and civilizationa graceful humanity, and
an honourable affection. With a tenderness the
most respectful, he reiterated his loveprayed for
her prayersfrankly admitted his error in his
abrupt
flight, and freely promised atonement as soon
as he should be freed from his difficulties; an event
which, in speaking to her, he doubted not. This
duty over, his mind grew somewhat relieved, and
despatching a note by the jailer's deputy to the
lawyer
Pippin, he desired immediately to see him.
Pippin had looked for such an invitation, and was
already in attendance. His regrets were
prodigious
,
but his gratification not less, as it would give
him an opportunity, for some time desired, for
serving
so excellent a gentleman. But the lawyer
shook his head with most professional uncertainty
at every step of his own narration of the case, and
soon convinced Ralph that he really stood in a
very awkward predicament. He described the
situation of the body of Forrester when found
the bloody dirk which lay beside it, having the
initials of his name plainly carved upon ithis
midnight
flighthis close companionship with
Forrester
on the evening of the night in which he had
been murdereda fact proved by old Walton and
his familythe intimate freedom with which
Forrester
had been known to confide his purposes to the
youth, deducible from the joint call which they had
made upon the sweetheart of the formerand many
other smaller details, unimportant in themselves,
but linked together with the rest of the particulars,
strengthening the chain of circumstances against
him to a degree which rendered it improbable that
he should escape conviction. Pippin sought,
however
,
to console his client, and, after the first
development
of particulars, the natural buoyancy of
the youth returned. He was not disposed readily
to despair, and his courage and confidence rose
with the pressure of events. He entered into a
plain story of all the particulars of his flightthe
instrumentality of Miss Munro in that transaction,
and which she could explain, in such a manner as
to do away with any unfavourable impression
which that circumstance, of itself, might create.
Touching the dagger, he could say nothing. He
had discovered its loss, but knew not at what time
he had lost it. The manner in which it had been
found was of course fatal, unless this fact could
have been established; and for this the consulting
parties saw no hope. Still, they did not despair,
but proceeded to the task of preparing the defence
for the day of trial, which was at hand. The
technical
portions of the case were managed by the
lawyer, who issued his subpnasmade
voluminous
noteswrote out the exordium of his speech,
and sat up all night committing it to memory.
Having done all that the occasion called for in
his interview with Ralph, the lawyer proceeded to
visit, uncalled-for, one whom he considered a far
greater criminalthe murder being provedthan
his client. The cell to which the luckless pedler,
Bunce, had been carried, was not far from that of
the former, and the rapid step of the lawyer soon
overcame the distance between. Never was man
seemingly so glad to see his neighbour, as was
Bunce, on this occasion, to look upon Pippin. His
delight found words of the most honeyed
description
for his visiter, and his delight was truly
infectious
.
The lawyer was delighted too, but his
delight
was of a far different origin. He had now
some prospect of getting back his favourite steed
that fine animal, described by him elsewhere to
the pedler, as one docile as a dog, and fleet as
a deer. He had heard of the safety of his horse,
and his anger with the pedler had undergone some
abatement; but with the consciousness of power,
as is the case with inferior minds, came a strong
desire for its use. He knew that the pedler had
been guilty in a legal sense of no crimeand could
only be liable in a civil action for his breach of
trust. But he suspected that the dealer in wares
was ignorant of the advantageous distinctions in
morals which the law had made, and consequently
amused himself with playing upon the fears of the
offender. He put on a countenance of much
commiseration
,
and drawing a long sigh, regretted the
necessity which had brought him to prepare the
mind of his old friend for the last terrors of justice.
But Bunce was not a man to be easily frightened.
As he phrased it himself, he had been quite too long
knocking about among men to be taken in by
shadows, and replied stoutlythough really with
some internal misgivingsto the lachrymalities of
the learned counsel. He gave him to understand,
that if he got into difficulty, he knew some other
persons whom his confessions would make
uncomfortable
;
and hinted pretty directly at certain
practices
of a certain professional gentleman, which,
though the pedler knew nothing of the technical
significant, might yet come under the head of
barratry
,
and so forth. The lawyer was the more
timid man of the two, and found it necessary to pare
down his potency. He soon found it profitable to
let the matter rest, and having made arrangements
with the pedler for bringing suit for damages against
two of the neighbouring farmers concerned in the
demolition of his wareswho, happening to be less
guilty than their accessories, had bentured to
remain
in the country,Bunce found no difficulty in
making his way out of the prison. There had been
no right originally for his detention, but the
consciousness
of guilt, and some other ugly
misgivings
,
had so relaxed the nerves of the tradesman,
that he had never thought to inquire if his name
were included in the warrant of arrest. It is
probable
that his courage and confidence would have
been far less than it appears at present, had not
Pippin assured him that the regulators were no
longer to be fearedthat the judge had arrived
that the grand jury had found bills against several
of the offenders, and were still engaged in their
laboursthat a detachment of the state military
had been ordered to the stationand that things
looked as civil as it was altogether possible for
such warlike exhibition to make them. It is
surprising
to think how fearlessly uncompromising
was the conduct of Bunce under this new
condition
of affairs.
But the pedler, in his own release from custody,
was not forgetful of his less fortunate companion.
He was a frequent visiter in the dungeon of Ralph
Colleton,bore all messages between the prisoner
and his counsel, and contributed, by his shrewd
knowledge of human kind, not a little to the
material
out of which his defence was to be made. He
suggested the suspicion never before entertained
by the youth, or entertained for a moment only,
that his present arrest was the result of a scheme
purposely laid with a reference to this end; and
did not scruple to charge upon Rivers the entire
management of the matter. Ralph could only
narrate what he knew of the malignant hatred of
the outlaw to himselfanother fact which none but
Lucy Munro could establish. Her evidence,
however
,
M 2
would only prove Rivers to have meditated
one crime; it would not free him from the
imputation
of having committed another. Still, so much
was important, and casualties were to be relied
upon for the rest. But what was the horror of all
parties when it was known that neither Lucy nor
any of the landlord's family were to be found.
The process of subpna was returned, and the
general opinion was, that, alarmed at the approach
of the military in such force, and confident that his
agency in the late transactions could not long
remain
concealed in the possession of so many,
though guilty like himself, Munro had fled to the
west. The mental agony of the youth, when thus
informed, cannot well be conceived. He was, for
a time, utterly prostrate, and gave himself up to
despair. The entreaties of the pedler, and the
counsels and exhortings of the lawyer, failed equally
to enliven him; and they had almost come to adopt
his gloomy resignation, when, as he sat on his low
bench, with head drooping on his hand, a solitary
glance of sunshine fell through the barred window
the only one assigned to his cell. The smile of
God, himself, that solitary ray appeared to the
diseased spirit of the youth, and he grew strong in
an instant. Talk of the lessons of the learned, and
the reasonings of the sagea vagrant breeze, a
rippling water, a glance of the sweet sunlight, have
more of consolation in them for the sad heart, than
all the pleadings of philosophy. They bear the
missives of a higher teacher.
Bunce was an active coadjutor with the lawyer
in this melancholy case. He made all inquiries
he went everywhere. He searched in all places,
and spared no labour, but at length despaired.
Nothing could be elicited by his inquiries, and he
ceased to hope, himself, and ceased to persuade
Ralph into hope. The lawyer shook his head in
reply to all questions, and put on a look of mystery
which is the safety-valve to all swollen pretenders.
In this state of affairs, taking the horse of the youth,
with a last effort at discoveries, Bunce rode forth
into the surrounding country. He had heretofore
taken all the common routes, to which, in his
previous
intercourse with the people, he had been
accustomed
;
he now determined to strike into a path
scarcely perceptible, and one which he never
remembered
to have seen before. He followed, mile
after mile, its sinuosities. It was a wild, and,
seemingly
,
an untrodden region. The hills shot up
jaggedly
from the plain around himthe fissures were
rude and steepmore like embrasures, blown out
by sudden power from the solid rock. Where the
forest appeared, it was dense and intricate
abounding
in brush and underwood; where it was
deficient
,
the blasted heath chosen by the witches in
Macbeth would have been no unfit similitude.
Hopeless of human presence in this dreary region,
the pedler yet rode on, as if to dissipate the
unpleasant
thoughts following upon his frequent
disappointment
.
Suddenly, however, a turn in the
winding
path brought him in contact with a
strange-looking
figure, not more than five feet in height,
neither boy nor man, uncouthly habited, and
seemingly
one to whom all converse but that of the trees
and rocks, during his whole life, had been
unfamiliar
.
The reader has already heard something
of the Cherokee ponyit was upon one of these
animals he rode. They are a small, but
compactly
made and hardy creatureof great
fortitude
,
stubborn endurance, and an activity, which,
in the travel of day after day, will seldom depart
from the gallop. It was the increasing demand
for these animals that had brought into existence
and exercise a company, which, by a transition far
from uncommon, passed readily from the
plundering
of horses to the cutting of throats and purses;
scarcely discriminating in their reckless rapacity
between the several degrees of crime in which
such a practice involved them.
Though somewhat uncouth in appearance, the
new-comer seemed decidedly harmlessnay,
almost
idiotic in appearance. His smile was
pleasant
,
though illuminating features of the ruggedest
description, and the tones of his voice were even
musical in the ears of the pedler, to whom any
voice would probably have seemed so in that
gloomy region. He very sociably addressed Bunce
in the
patois
of that section, and the ceremonial of
introduction, without delay or difficulty, was
overcome
duly on both sides. In the southern
wilderness
,
indeed, it does not call for much formality, nor
does a strict adherence to the received rules of
etiquette
become at all necessary, to make the
traveller
hail fellow well met. Any thing, in that
quarter
,
savouring of reserve or stiffness, is punished
with decided hostility or openly avowed contempt;
and, in the more rude regions, the refusal to
partake
in the very social employments of wrestling or
whiskey-drinking, has brought the scrupulous
personage
to the more questionable enjoyments of a
regular gouging match and fight. A demure habit
is the most unpopular among all classes. Freedom
of manner, on the other hand, obtains confidence
readily, and the heart is won, at once, by an
offhanded
familiarity of demeanour, which fails to
recognise any inequalities in human condition.
The society and the continued presence of nature,
as it were, in her own peculiar abode, puts aside
all merely conventional distinctions, and men meet
upon a common footing. Thus, even when perfect
strangers to one another, after the usual
preliminaries
of how are you, friend, or strannger?
whare
from?
whare
going?fair or foul
weatheras the case may bethe acquaintance
is established, and familiarity well begun. Such
was the case in the present instance. Bunce knew
the people well, and exhibited his most unreluctant
manner. The horses of the two, in like manner
with their masters, made similar overtures; and,
in a little while, their necks were drawn in lines
parallel to each other.
Bunce was less communicative, however, than
the stranger. Still his head and heart, alike, were
full, and he talked more freely than was altogether
consistent with his Yankee character. He told of
Ralph's predicament, and the clown sympathized;
he narrated the quest which had brought him forth,
and of his heretofore unrewarded labours;
concluding
with naming the ensuing Monday as the
day of the youth's trial, when, if nothing in the
mean time could be discovered of the true
criminal
for
the pedler never for a moment doubted
that Ralph was innocenthe mortally feared
things would go again him.
That will be hard, tooa mighty tough
difficulty
,
now, stranngerto be hanged for other folks'
doings. But, I reckon, he'll have to make up his
mind to it.
Oh, no! don't say so, now, friend, I beg you.
What makes you think so? said the anxious
pedler.
Why, only from what I
heer'd
you say. You
said so yourself, and I believed it as if I had seed it,
was the reply of the simple countryman.
Oh, yes. It's but a poor chance with him now,
I guess. I'd a notion that I could find out some
little particular, you see
No, I don't see.
To be sure you don't, but that's my say.
Everybody has a say, you know.
No, I don't know.
To be sure, of course you don't know, but that's
what I tell you. Now you must know
Don't say must to me, strannger, if you want
that we shall keep hands off. I don't let any man
say
must
to me.
No harm, friendI didn't mean any harm,
said the worried pedler, not knowing what to make
of his acquaintance, who spoke understandingly,
though in language which left the fact doubtful.
Avoiding all circumlocution of phrase, and
dropping
the you sees, and you knows from his
narration, he proceeded to state his agency in
procuring
testimony for the youth, and of the ill
success
which had hitherto attended him. At length,
in the course of his story, which he contrived to
tell with as much caution as came within the scope
of his education, he happened to speak of Lucy
Munro, but had scarcely mentioned her name
when his queer companion interrupted him:
Look you, strannger, I'll lick you now, off-hand,
if you don't put Miss for a handle to the gal's
name. She's Miss Lucy. Don't I know her, and
han't I seen her, and isn't it I, Chub Williams, as
they calls me, that loves the very airth she treads?
You know Miss Lucy? inquired the pedler,
enraptured even at this moderate discovery, though
carefully coupling the prefix to her name while
giving it utterancenow, do you know Miss
Lucy, friend, and will you tell me where I can find
her?
Do you think I will, and you may be looking
arter her too? Drot my old hat, strannger, but I
do itch to git at you.
Oh, now, Mr. Williams
I won't answer to that name. Call me Chub
Williams, if you wants to be polite. Mother
always called me Chub, and that's the reason I
like it.
Well, Chub,said the other, quite paternally
I assure you I don't love Miss Munroand
What! you don't love Miss Lucy. Why,
everybody
ought to love her. Now, if you don't love
her, I'll hammer you, strannger, off-hand.
The poor pedler professed; and satisfied, after
a while, the scruples of one who, in addition to
deformity, he also discovered to labour under the
more serious curse of partial idiocy. Having done
this, and flattered, in sundry other ways, the
peculiarities
of his companion, he pursued his other
point with laudable pertinacity. He at length
got from Chub his own history: how he had run
into the woods with his mother, who had suffered
from the ill treatment of her husband: how, with
his own industry, he had sustained her wants, and
supplied her with all the comforts which a long
period
had required; and how, dying, at length, she
had left himthe forest boyalone, to pursue those
toils which heretofore had an object, while she
yielded
him in return for them society and sympathy.
These particulars, got from him in a manner the
most desultory, were made to preface the more
important parts of the narrative. It appears that
his harmlessness had kept him undisturbed, even
by the wild marauders of that region, and that he
still continued to procure a narrow livelihood by
his woodland labours, and sought no association
with that humanity which, though among
fellow-creatures
,
would still have lacked of fellowship for
him. In the transfer of Lucy from the village to
the shelter of the outlaws, he had obtained a
glimpse of her person and form, and had ever since
been prying in the neighbourhood for a second
and similar enjoyment. He now made known to
the pedler her place of concealment, which he had,
some time before this event, himself discovered;
but which, through dread of Rivers, for whom he
seemed to entertain an habitual fear, he had never
ventured to penetrate.
Well, I must see her, exclaimed Bunce. I
an't afraid, 'cause, you see, Mr. WilliamsChub, I
mean, it's only justice, and to save the poor
gentleman's
life. I'm sure I oughtn't to be afraid, and
no more I an't. Won't you go there with me,
Chub?
Can't think of it, stranger. Guy is a dark man,
and mother said I must keep away when he rode
in the woods. Guy don't talkhe shoots.
The pedler made sundry efforts to procure a
companion for his adventure; but finding it vain,
and determined to do right, he grew more resolute
with the necessity, and, contenting himself with
claiming the guidance of Chub, he went boldly on
the path. Having reached a certain point in the
woods, after a very circuitous departure from the
main track, the guide pointed out to the pedler a long
and rude ledge of rocks, so seeming to the glance
that none could have ever conjectured to find them
the abode of any thing but the serpent and the wolf.
Chub gave him his directions, then alighting from
his nag, which he concealed in a clump of
neighbouring
brush, hastily and with the agility of a monkey
ran up a neighbouring tree which overhung the
prospect. Bunce, left alone, grew somewhat
staggered
with his fears. He now half-repented of
the self-imposed adventure; wondered at his own
rash humanity, and might perhaps have utterly
foreborne the trial, but for a single consideration.
His pride was concerned, that the deformed Chub
should not have occasion to laugh at his weakness.
Descending, therefore, from his horse, he fastened
him to the hanging branch of a neighbouring tree,
and with something of desperate defiance in his
manner, resolutely advanced to the silent and
forbidding
mass of rocks, which rose up so silently
around him. In another moment, and he was lost
to sight in the gloomy shadow of the
entrance-passage
pointed out to him by the half-witted, but not
altogether ignorant, Chub.
CHAPTER XII.
They have thee in their gripe, but fear thou not
The darkness is thy shelter, and the night,
That's but a gloom to guilt, hath many a beam
To bless and guide the true and innocent.
But
the preparations of Bunce had been
foreseen
and provided for by those most deeply
interested
in his progress; and scarcely had the worthy
tradesman effected his entrance fairly into the
forbidden
territory, when he felt himself grappled
from behind. He struggled with an energy, due
as much to the sudden terror as to any exercise
of the free will; but he struggled in vain. The
arms that were fastened about his own, bound them
down with a grasp of steel; and after a few
moments
of desperate effort, accompanied with one
or two exclamations, half surprise, half
expostulation
,
of Hello, friend, what do you mean and,
I say, now, friend, you'd better have done the
Vol. II.N
struggle ceased, and he lay supine in the hold of
the unseen person or personsfor there were more
than onewho had secured him. These persons
he could not then discernthe passage was
cavernously
dark, and had evidently been as much the
work of nature as of art. A handkerchief was
fastened about his eyes, and he felt himself carried
on the shoulders of those who made nothing of the
burden. After the progress of several minutes,
in which the anxiety natural to his situation led
Bunce into frequent exclamations and entreaties,
he was set down, and a buzzing dialogue, as of
several persons, having first taken place around
him, the bandage was removed from his eyes, and
he was once more permitted their free exercise.
To his great wonder, however, nothing but women,
of all sizes and ages, met his sight. In vain
did he look around for the men who brought him.
They were no longer to be seen, and so silent had
been their passage out, that the unfortunate pedler
was compelled to satisfy himself with the belief,
that persons of the gentler sex had been in truth
his captors. Had he, indeed, given up the struggle
so easily? The thought was mortifying enough,
and yet, when he looked around him, he grew
more satisfied with his own efforts at resistance.
He had never seen such strongly built women in
his life; scarcely one of them but could easily
have overthrown him, without stratagem, in single
combat. The faces of many of them were familiar
to him but where had he seen them before? His
memory failed him utterly, and he gave himself up
to his bewilderment. He looked around, and the
scene was well calculated to affect a nervous
mind. It was a fit scene for the painter of the
supernatural
.
The small apartment in which they
were was formed in great part from the natural
rock; where a fissure presented itself, a huge pine
tree, overthrown so as to fill the vacuity,
completed
what nature had left undone; and, bating
the one or two rude cavities left here and there in
the sidesthemselves so covered as to lie hidden
from all withoutthere was all the compactness
of a regularly constructed dwelling. A single and
small lamp, pendant from a beam that hung over
the room, gave a feeble light, which, taken in
connexion
with that borrowed from without, served
only to make visible the dark indistinct of the
place. With something dramatic in their taste,
the old women had dressed themselves in sombre
habiliments, according with the general unique of
all things around them; and, as the unfortunate
pedler continued to gaze in wonderment, his fear
grew with every progressive step in his
observation
.
One by one, however, the old women
commenced
stirring, and, as they moved, now before
and now behind himhis eyes following them on
every sidehe at length discovered, amid the
group, the small and delicate form of the very
being for whom he sought. There, indeed, was
Lucy Munro and her aunt, holding a passive
character in the strange assembly. This was
encouraging
;
and Bunce, forgetting his wonder in
the satisfaction which such a prospect afforded
him, endeavoured to force his way forward to
them, when a salutary twitch of the arm from one
of the beldame troop, by tumbling him backwards
upon the floor of the cavern, brought him again to
a consideration of his predicament. He could not
be restrained from speech, however, though, as he
spoke, the old women saluted his face on all hands
with strokes from brushes of fern, which occasioned
him no small inconvenience. But he had gone too
far now to recede, and in a broken mannerbroken
as much by his own hurry and vehemence as
by the interruptions to which he was subjected
he contrived to say enough to Lucy of the
situation of Colleton to revive in her an interest
of the most painful character. She rushed
forward
,
and was about to ask more from the
beleaguered
pedler; but it was not the policy of those
having both of them in charge to permit such a
proceeding. One of the stoutest of the old women
now came prominently upon the scene, and with a
rough voice, which it is not difficult to recognise
as that of Munro, commanded the young girl
away, and gave her in charge to two attendants.
But she struggled still to hear, and Bunce all the
while speaking, she was enabled to gather most of
the particulars in his narration before her removal
was effected. The mummery had ceased, and
Bunce having been carried elsewhere, the maskers
resumed their native apparel, having thrown aside
that which had been put on for a distinct purpose.
The pedler, in another and more secure
department
of the robber's hiding-place, was solaced
with the prospect of a long and dark
imprisonment
.
In the mean time, our little friend Chub Williams
had been made to undergo his own distinct
punishment
for his share in the adventure. No sooner
had Bunce been laid by the heels, than Rivers, who
had directed the whole, advanced from the shelter
of the cave, in company with his lieutenant, Dillon,
both armed with rifles, and without saying a word,
singling out the tree on which Chub had perched
himself, took deliberate aim at the head of the
unfortunate
urchin. He saw the danger in an instant,
and his first words were characteristic.
Now don'tdon't, now, I tell you, Mr. Guy
you may hit Chub.
Come down, then, you rascal, was the reply,
as with a laugh, lowering the weapon, he awaited
the descent of the spy. And now, Bur, what
have you to say that I shouldn't wear out a hickory
or two upon you?
My name an't Bur, Mr. Guymy name is
Chub, and I don't like to be called out of my name.
Mother always called me Chub.
Well, Chubsince you like it best, though at
best a bur,what were you doing in that tree.
How dare you spy into my dwelling, and send
other people there? Speak, or I'll skin you alive.
Now, don't, Mr. Guy. Don't, I beg you.
'Taint right to talk so, and I don't like it. But is that
your dwelling, Mr. Guy, in truth. You really
live in it, all the year round? Now, you don't, do
you?
The outlaw had no fierceness when
contemplating
the object before him. Strange nature!
He seemed to regard the deformities of mind and
body, in the outcast under his eyes, as something
kindred. Was there any thing like sympathy in
such a feeling; or was it rather that perversity of
temper, which sometimes seemes to cast an
ennobling
feature over violence, and to afford, here and
there, a touch of that moral sunshine, which can
now and then give an almost redeeming expression
to the countenance of vice itself. He contemplated
the idiot for a few moments with a close eye, and a
mind evidently busied in thought. Laying his
hand, at length, on his shoulder, he was about to
speak, when the deformed started back from the
touch as if in horrora feeling, indeed, fully visible
in every feature of his face.
Now, don't touch Chub, Mr. Guy. Mother
said you were a dark man, and told me to keep
N 2
clear of you. Don't touch me again, Mr. Guy; I
don't like it.
The outlaw, musingly, spoke to his lieutenant
And this is educationwho shall doubt its
importance
who
shall say that it does not overthrow,
and altogether destroy the original nature. The
selfish mother of this miserable outcast, fearing that
he might be won away from his service to her,
taught him to avoid all other persons, and even
those who had treated her with kindness were
thus described to this poor dependant. To him
the sympathies of others would have been the
greatest blessing, yet she so tutored him, that, at her
death, he was left desolate. You hear his account
of me, gathered, as he says, and as I doubt not,
from her own lips. That account is true, so far as
my other relationships with mankind are concerned;
but not true as regards my connexions with her.
I furnished that old creature when she was
starving
,
and when this boy, sick and impotent, could do
little for her service. I never uttered a harsh
word in her ears, or treated her unkindly, yet this
is the character she gives of me, and this, indeed,
the character which she has given of all others. A
feeling of the narrowest selfishness has led her
deliberately to misrepresent all mankind; and has
been productive of a more ungracious result, in
driving one from his species, who, more than any
other, stands in need of their sympathy and
association
.
While Rivers spoke thus, the idiot listened with
an air of the most stupid attention. His head fell
on one shoulder, and one hand partially sustained
it. As the former concluded his remarks, Chub
recovered a posture as nearly erect as possible,
and remarked, with as much significance as could
comport with his general expression,Chub's
mother was good to Chub, and Mr. Guy mustn't
say nothing agin her.
But, Chub, will you not come and live with me?
I will give you a good rifleone like this, and you
shall travel everywhere with me.
You will beat Chub when you are angry, and
make him shoot people with the rifle. I won't have
the rifle. I don't want it. If folks say harm to
Chub, he can lick them with his fists. Chub don't
want to live with you.
Well, as you please. But come in and look at
my house, and see where I live.
And shall I see the strannger agin? I can lick
him, and I told him so. But he called me Chub,
and I made friends with him.
Yes, you shall see him, and
And Miss Lucy tooI want to see Miss Lucy
Chub saw her, and she spoke to Chub
yesterday
.
The outlaw promised him all, and after this
there was no farther difficulty. The unconscious
idiot scrupled no longer, and followed his
conductors
intoprison. It was necessary, for the farther
safety of the outlaws in their present abode, that
such should be the case. The secret of their
hiding-place
was in the possession of quite too many;
and the subject of deliberation among the leaders
was now into the propriety of its continued tenure.
The country, they felt assured, would soon be
overrun with the State troops. They had no fears
of discovery from this source, prior to the affair of
the massacre of the Guard, which rendered
necessary
the secretion of many in their retreat, who,
before that time, were perfectly unconscious of its
existence. In addition to this, it was now known
to the pedler and the idiot, neither of whom had
any reason for secrecy on the subject in the event
of their being able to make it public. The
difficulty
,
with regard to the two latter, subjected them
to some small risk of suffering from the ultimate
resource of roguery; but so much blood had been
already spilt, that the sense of the majority
revolted
at the farther resort to that degree of
violence
,
particularly, too, when it was recollected that
they could only hold their citadel for a certain and
short period of time. It was determined, therefore,
that as long as they themselves continued in their
hiding-place, that Bunce and Chub should, perforce,
continue their prisoners. Having so determined,
and made their arrangements accordingly, the two
last made captives were assigned a cell, chosen
with reference to its greater security than the
other portions of their hold; and sufficiently
tenacious
of its trust, it would seem, to have answered
well its purpose.
In the mean time the sufferings of Lucy Munro
were such as may well be understood from the
character of her feelings, as we have heretofore
surveyed their expression. In her own apartment
her cell, we may style it, for she was in some
sort of honourable bondage, she brooded with deep
melancholy over the narrative given by the pedler.
She had no reason to doubt its correctness, and the
more she meditated upon it, the more acute became
her misery. But a day intervened, and the trial
of Ralph Colleton must take place, and without
her evidence, she was well aware there could be
no hope of his escape from the doom of felony
from the death of shame and physical agony. The
whole picture grew up before her excited fancy
she beheld the assembled crowdshe saw him
borne to execution, and her senses reeled beneath
the terrible conjurations of her fancy. She threw
herself prostrate upon her couch, and strove not
to think, but in vain. The mind, still active,
maddened
,
and she grew conscious herselfthe worst
of all kinds of consciousnessthat reason was no
longer secure in her sovereignty; and with a strong
effort of the still firm will, she strove rather to
discover
the best mode of defeating the awful fate,
and rescuing the victim from the death suspended
above himand she succeeded, while deliberating
on such means, in quieting the more subtle
workings
of her imagination.
Many were the thoughts which came into her
brain in this examination. At one time she thought
it not impossible to convey a letter, in which her
testimony should be carefully set down; but the
difficulty of procuring a messenger, and the doubt
that such a statement would prove of any avail,
decided her to seek for other means. An ordinary
mind and a moderate degree of interest in the fate
of the individual would have contented itself with
some such step; but such a mind and such
affections
were not those of the high-souled and spirited
Lucy. She dreaded not personal danger, and to
rescue the youth, whom she so much idolized, from
the doom that threatened him, she would have
willingly dared to encounter that fate itself, in
its darkest forms. She determined, therefore, to
rely chiefly upon herself in all efforts which she
could make for the purpose in view; and her
object
,
therefore, was to effect a return to the village
in time to appear at the trial. Yet how should
this be done? She felt herself to be a captive:
she knew the restraints upon herand did not
doubt that all her motions were sedulously observed.
How then should she proceed? An agent was
necessary; and, while thus deliberating with
herself
upon the difficulty thus assailing her at the
outset, her ears were drawn to the distinct
utterance
of sounds, as of persons engaged in
conversation
,
from the adjoining section of the rock. One
of the voices appeared familiar, and at length she
distinctly made out her own name in various parts
of the dialogue. She soon distinguished the nasal
tones of the pedler, whose prison adjoined her own,
separated only by a huge wall of earth and rock, the
rude and jagged sides of which had been made
complete
,
where naturally imperfect for the purposes of
a wall, by the free use of clay, which, plastered in
huge masses into the crevices and every fissure,
was no inconsiderable apology for the more perfect
structures of civilization. Satisfied, at length, that
the two so confined were friendly, she contrived to
make them understand her contiguity, by speaking in
tones sufficiently low as to be unheard beyond the
apartment in which they were. In this way she
was enabled to converse with the pedler, to whom
all her difficulties were suggested, and to whom
she did not hesitate to say that she knew that
which would not fail to save the life of Colleton.
Bunce was not slow to devise various measures
for the further promotion of the scheme, none of
which, however, served the purpose of showing to
either party how they should get out, and but for
the ingenuity of the idiot, it is more than probable,
despairing of success, they would at length have
thrown aside the hope of doing any thing for the
youth as perfectly illusory. But Chub came in as
a prime auxiliar. From the first moment in which
he heard the gentle tones of Lucy's voice, he had
busied himself with his long nails and long fingers
in removing the various masses of clay which had
been made to fill up the sundry crevices of the
intervening
wall, and had so far succeeded as to
detach
a large square of the rock itself, which, with
all possible pains and caution, he lifted from the
embrasure
.
This done, he could distinguish objects,
though dimly, from one apartment in the other,
and thus introduced the parties to a somewhat
nearer acquaintance with one another. Having
done so much, he reposed from his labours, content
with a sight of Lucy, on whom he continued to
look with a fixed and stupid admiration. He had
pursued this work so noiselessly, and the maiden
and Bunce had been so busily employed in
discussing
their several plans, that they had not observed
the vast progress which Chub had made towards
furnishing them with a better solution of their
difficulties
than any of their own previous cogitations.
When Bunce saw how much had been done in one
quarter, he applied himself resolutely to similar
experiments on the opposite wall: and had the
satisfaction of discovering that, as a dungeon, the
dwelling in which they were required to remain
was sadly deficient in some few of the requisites
of security. With the aid of a small pick of iron,
which Lucy handed him from her cell, he pierced
the outer wall in several places, in which the clay
had been required to do the offices of the rock, and
had the satisfaction of perceiving, from the sudden
influx of light in the apartment, succeeding his
application
of the instrument, that, with a small
labour and in little time, they should be enabled to
effect their escape, at least into the free air, and
under the more genial vault of heaven. Having
made this discovery, it was determined that nothing
more should be done until night, and having filled
up the apertures which they had made, with one
thing or another, they proceeded to consult, with
more deliberate composure, on the future progress.
It was arranged that the night should be permitted to
set in fairlythat Lucy should retire early, having
first been studious that Munro and her aunt, with
whom she more exclusively consortedRivers
having altogether kept out of sight since her
removal
should
see her at the evening meal, without
any departure from her usual habits. Bunce
undertook
to officiate as a guide, and as Chub
expressed
himself willing to do whatever Miss Lucy
should tell him, it was arranged that he should
remain, occasionally making himself heard in his
cell, as if in conversation, for as long a period after
their departure as might be thought necessary to
put them sufficiently in advance of any pursuita
requisition to which Chub readily gave his
consent
.
He was the only one of the party who
appeared
to regard the whole matter with
comparative
indifference. He knew that a man was in
danger of his lifehe felt that he himself was in
prison, and he said he would rather be out among the
pine treesbut there was no rush of feeling, such
as troubled the heart of the young girl, whose
spirit, clothing itself in all the noblest habiliments of
manhood, lifted her up into the choicest superiority
of characternor had he that anxiety to do a service
to his fellow, which made the pedler throw aside
some of his more wordly characteristicshe did
simply as he was bid, and had no further care.
Miss Lucy, he said, talked sweetly, like his mother,
and Chub would do for Miss Lucy any thing that
she asked him. The principle of his government
was simple, and having chosen a sovereign he did
not withhold his obedience. Thus stood the
preparations
of the three prisoners, when darkness
long looked-for, and hailed with trembling emotions
at length came down over the silent homestead
of the outlaws.
CHAPTER XIII.
Speed, scour the woods aroundlet none escape,
Or all is perill'dyet forbear to strike:
Bind them with cords, and see them well secured,
But harm ye not their lives.
The
night gathered a pace, and the usual hour of
repose had come. Lucy retired to her apartment
with a trembling heart, but a courageous spirit,
full of a noble determination to persevere in her
project. Though full of fear, she never for a
moment
thought of retreat from the decision which
she had made. Her character afforded an
admirable
model for the not unfrequent union of
shrinking
delicacy with manly and efficient firmness.
Munro and Rivers, having first been assured that
all was quiet, by a ramble which they took around
their hiding-place, returned to the little chamber
of the latter, such as we have described it in a
previous
portion of our narrative, and proceeded to
the further discussion of their plans. The mind
of the landlord was very ill at ease. He had
arrived
at that time of life when repose and a fixed
habitation become necessary; and when,
whatever
may have been the habits of earlier manhood,
the mind ceases to crave the excitements of
adventure
,
and foregoes, or would fain forego, all its
roving characteristics. To this state of feeling
had he come, and the circumstances which now
denied him the fruition of that prospect of repose
which he had been promising himself so long, were
regarded with no little restlessness and impatience.
Vol. II.O
At the moment, they could make no positive
arrangements
for the future. Munro was loath to
give up the property which, in one way or other,
he had acquired in the neighbourhood, and which
it was impossible for him to remove to any other
region; and, strange to say, a strong feeling of
inhabitiveness
the
love of homeif home he could
be thought to have anywhere, might almost be
considered a passion with his less scrupulous
companion
.
Thus situated, they lingered on in the
hope that the military would soon be withdrawn
from the neighbourhood, as it could only be
maintained
at great expense by the State; and then, as
the country was but nominally settled, and so
sparsely as to scarcely merit any consideration,
they felt assured that they might readily return to
their old, or any practices, and without any further
apprehension. The necessity, however, which
made them thus deliberate, had the effect, at the
same time, of impressing them with a gloomy spirit,
not common to either of them.
Let us see, Munrothere is, after all, less to
apprehend than we first thought. In a week, and
the court will be overin another week and the
Guard will be withdrawn, and for this period only
will it be necessary that we should keep dark. I
think we are now perfectly safe where we are.
The only persons who know of our retreat, and
might be troublesome, are safe in our possession.
They will hardly escape until we let them, and
before
we do so we shall first see that they can give
us no further necessity for caution. Of our own
party, none are permitted to know the secrets of
our hiding-place, but those in whom we may trust
confidently. I have taken care to provide for the
doubtful at some distance in the adjoining woods,
exaggerating so greatly the danger of exposure,
that they will hardly venture to be seen under any
circumstances and by anybody. Once let these
two weeks go over, and I have no fearswe shall
have no difficulties then.
And what's to be done with the pedler and the
fool? I say, Guy, there must be no more blood
I will not agree to it. The fact is, I feel more
and more dismal every day since that poor fellow's
death; and now that the youngster's taken, the
thought is like fire in my brain, which tells me he
may suffer for our crime.
Why, you are grown parson. Would you go
and save him, by giving up the true criminal? I
shall look for that after this, and consider myself no
longer in safety. If you go on in this manner, I
shall begin to meditate an off-hand journey to the
Mississippi.
Ay, and the sooner we all go the better
though, to be plain, Guylet this affair once blow
over, and I care not to go with you any longer. We
must then cut loose for ever. I am not a good
man, I knowany thing beside; but you have
carried
me on, step by step, until I am what I am afraid
to name to myself. You found me a rogueyou
have made me a
Why do you hesitate? Speak it out, Munro
it is a large step gained towards reform when
we learn to name truly our offences to ourselves.
I dare not. The thought is sufficiently
horrible
without the thing. I hear some devil
whispering
it too frequently in my ears, to venture upon its
utterance myself. But youhow you can live
without feeling it, after your experience, which has
been so much more dreadful than mine, I know
not.
I do feel it, Munro, but have long since ceased
to fear it. The reiteration takes away the terror
which is due rather to the novelty than to the
offence
.
But when I began, I felt it. The first sleep
I had after the affair of Jessup was full of tortures.
The old man, I thought, lay beside me in my bed;
his blood run under me, and clotted around me, and
fastened me there, while his gashed face kept
peering into mine, and his eyes danced over me
with the fierce light of a threatening comet. The
dream nearly drove me mad, and mad I should
have been had I gone to my prayers. I knew that,
and chose a different course for relief.
What was that?
I sought for another victim as soon after as I
conveniently could. The one spectre superseded
the other, until all vanished. They never trouble
me nowthough sometimes, in my waking
moments
,
I have met them on the road sideglaring
at me from bush or tree, until I shouted at them
fiercely, and then they were gone. These are
my terrors, and they do sometimes unman me.
They would do more with me; they would
destroy me on the spot. But, let us no more of
this. Let us rather see if we cannot do
something
towards making our visions more agreeable.
Do you persevere in the sacrifice of this
youngster
.
Must he die?
Am I a child, Walter Munro, that you ask me
such a question? Must I again tell over the
accursed
story of my defeat and of his success? Must
I speak of my thousand defeatsof my
overthrown
pretensionsmy blasted hopes, where I
had set my affectionsupon which every feeling
of my heart had been placed? Must I go over a
story so full of pain and humiliationmust I
describe
my loss, in again placing before your eyes a
portraiture like this? Look, man, lookand read
my answer in the smile, which, denying me,
provides
me, in this case, with a denial as immutable
as hers.
He placed before his companion the miniature
of Edith, which he took from his bosom, where he
seems carefully to have treasured it. He was
again the envenomed and the excited savage which
we have elsewhere seen him, and in which mood
Munro knew well that nothing could be done with
him in the shape of argument or entreaty. He
went on:
Ask me no questions, Munro, so idle, so
perfectly
unnecessary as this. Fortune has done
handsomely here. He falls through me, yet falls
by the common hangman. What a double blow
is this to both of them. I have been striving to
imagine their feelings, and such a repast as that
effort has procured meI would not exchange it
nonot for worldsfor nothing less, Munro, than
my restoration back to that societyto that place
in society, from which my fierce passions, and
your cruel promptings, and the wrongs of society
itself, have for ever exiled me.
And would you return, if you could do so?
To-morrowto-nightthis instant. I am
sanguinary
,
Munrorevengefulfierceall that is
bad, because I am not permitted to be better. My
pridemy strong feelings and deeply absorbing
moodthese have no other field for exercise. The
love of homethe high ambition, which, had
society
done me common justice, and had not, in
enslaving
itself, dishonoured and defrauded me
would, under other circumstances, have made me
a patriot. My pride is even now to command the
admiration of menI never sought their love.
Their approbation would have made me fearless
and fearful in their defence and for their rights
their injustice makes me their enemy. My
passions
,
O 2
unprovoked and unexaggerated by
mortifying
repulses, would have only been a warm and
stimulating influence, perpetually working in their
servicebut, pressed upon and irritated as they
have been, they grew into so many wild beasts,
and preyed upon the cruel or the careless keepers,
whose gentle treatment and constant attention had
tamed them into obedient servants. Yet, would I
could, even now, return to that condition in which
there might have been hope. The true spectre of
the criminalsuch as I amthe criminal chiefly
from the crimes and injustice of society, not
forgetting
the education of my boyhood, which grew
out of the same crimes, and whose most dreadful
lesson is selfishnessis despair! The black waters
once past, the hills rise between, and there is no
return to those regions of hope, which, once lost,
are lost for ever. This is the true punishment
the worst punishment which man inflicts upon
his fellowthe felony of public opinion. The
curse of society is no unfit illustration of that ban
which its faith holds forth as the penal doom of the
future. There is no return!
The dialogue, mixed up thus, throughout, with
the utterance of opinions on the part of the outlaw,
many of which were true, or founded in truth, yet
coupled with many false deductionswas devoted,
for some little while longer, to the discussion of
their various necessities and plans for the future.
The night had considerably progressed in this way,
when, of a sudden, their ears were assailed with an
eldritch screech, like that of the owl, issuing from
one of the several cells around them. The quick
sense of Rivers immediately discerned the voice
of the idiot, and without hesitation he proceeded
to that division of the rock which contained the
two prisoners. To each of these apartments had
been assigned a sentinel, or watch, whose own
place of abode, while covered completely and from
sight, and in all respects furnishing a dwelling,
though rather a confined one, for himself, enabled
him to attend to the duty assigned him without
himself
being seen. The night had been fairly set in,
when Bunce, with the aid of Chub Williams, with
all due caution proceeded to his task, and with so
much success, that, in the course of a couple of
hours, they had succeeded, not only in making a
fair outlet for themselves, but for Lucy Munro too.
The watchman, in the mean time, holding his
station
as merely nominal, gave himself as little
trouble
as possible; and believing all things quiet, had,
after a little while, insinuated himself into the good
graces of as attractive a slumber as may usually
be won in the warm summer season in the south,
by one to whom a night-watch is a peculiarly
ungracious
exercise. Before this conclusion,
however
,
he looked forth every now and then, and
deceived
by the natural stillness of earth and sky, he
committed the further care of the hours, somewhat
in anticipation of the time, to the successor who
was to relieve him on the watch. Without being
conscious of this decision in their favour, and
ignorant
entirely of the sentinel himself, the pedler
fortunately
chose this period for his own departure
with the young lady whom he was to escort; and
who, with probably far less fear than her gallant,
did not scruple, for a single instant, to go forth
under
his guidance. Chub took his instructions from
the lips of Lucy, and promised the most implicit
obedience. They had scarcely been well gone
when the sentinels were changed, and one
something
more tenacious of discipline, or something
less drowsy than his predecessor, took his place.
After muttering at intervals, as directed, for the
space of an hour, probably, from the time at which
his companion had departed, Chub thought it only
prudent to sally forth too. Accordingly,
ascending
to the break in the wall, through which his
companion
had made his way, the urchin emerged from
the cavern at the unlucky moment, when, at some
ten or fifteen paces in front of him, the sentinel
came forth from his niche to inspect the order of
his watch. Chub saw his adversary first, and his
first impulse originated the scream which at once
drew the attention of Rivers, as already narrated.
The outlaw rushed quickly to the scene of
difficulty
,
and before the sentinel had well recovered
from the astonishment occasioned by the
singularly
sudden appearance and wild screech of the
urchin.
Why, what is this, Briggs; what see you?
was the hasty inquiry of Rivers.
There, sir, there, exclaimed the watch, still
half bewildered, and pointing to the edge of the
hill, where, in a condition seemingly of equal
incertitude
with himself, stood the imbecile.
Seize upon himtake him at oncelet him
not escape you! were the hasty orders of the
outlaw
.
Briggs set forward, but his approach had the
effect of giving determination also to Chub; who,
just as the pursuer thought himself sure of his
captive, and was indeed directly upon him, doubled
himself up, as it were into a complete ball, and
without effort rolled headlong down the hill;
gathering upon his feet as he attained the level,
seemingly unhurt, and with all the agility of the
monkey.
Shall I shoot, sir? was the inquiry of Briggs,
as the urchin stood off, laughing wildly at his good
fortune.
Now, don'twas the cryNow, don't
was the exclamation of Chub himself, who,
however
,
trusting nothing to the effect of his entreaty,
ran vigorously on his way.
Yes, shoot him down, was the sudden
exclamation
of Munro; but Rivers struck the poised
weapon upward in the hands of the sentinel, to
the astonishment, not less of the sentinel than of
the landlord.
Nolet him live, Munro. Let him live. Such
as he should be spared. Is he not alonewithout
fellowshipscornedan outcastwithout
sympathy
like
myself. Let him live, let him live! and
as he concluded a direction, so strange from his
lips, his countenance indicated the most foreign
abstraction
of his thoughts. Munro gave directions
to see after the other prisoners.
A few moments sufficed for this, and the panic
was universal among the inmates of the rock. The
secret was now lost, unless immediate pursuit
could avail in the recovery of the fugitives. This
pursuit was immediately undertaken, and both
Rivers and Munro, taking different directions, and
dispersing their whole force about the forest, set off
on the search.
Apprehensive of pursuit, the policy of Bunce, to
whom Lucy gave up the entire direction of their
flight, was determined upon with not a little
judgment
.
Assured that his pursuers would search
chiefly on the direct route between their abode and
the village, to which they would necessarily
surmise
the flight was directed, he boldly determined
upon a course, picked sinuously out, obliquing
largely from the true direction, which, while it
would materially lengthen the distance, would at
least secure them, he thought, from the danger of
contact with the scouring party. By no means
ignorant
of the country, in and about which he had
frequently travelled in the pursuit of trade, he
contrived
,
fortunately, in this way, completely to
mislead
the pursuers; and the morning found them
still some distance from the village, but in a
direction
affording few chances of interruption in their
contemplated approach to it. Lucy was
dreadfully
fatigued, and a frequent sense of weariness
almost persuaded her to lay down life itself in utter
exhaustion; but the encouraging words of the
pedler, and the thought of his peril, for whose
safety, though herself hopeless of all beside, she
would willingly peril all, restored her, and
invigorated
to renewed effort. At the dawn of day they
approached a small farm-house, some of the inmates
of which happened to know Lucy, and, though they
looked somewhat askant at her companion, and
wondered not a little at the circumstance of her
travelling at such a time of night, yet, as she was
generally well respected, their surmises and
scruples
were permitted to sleep; and, after a little
difficulty, they were persuaded to lend her the
family pony and side-saddle, with the view to the
completion of her journey. Taking some slight
refreshment
,
she hurried on; Bunce, taking the road
on foot, alongside, with all the patient docility of a
squire of the middle ages; and to the great
satisfaction
of all parties, they arrived in sight of the
village, just as Counsellor Pippin, learned in the
law, was disputing with the state attorney upon the
non-admissibility of certain points of testimony,
which it was the policy of the former to exclude.
CHAPTER XIV.
Read out the doom,the written doom of guilt,
He spills man's blood, by man his blood be spilt
Let no delay impede the law's decree,
Bind the chord surely, and prepare the tree.
The
village of Chestatee was crowded with
visiters of all descriptions. Judges and lawyers,
soldiers and citizens and farmersall classes were
duly represented, and a more wholesome and
subordinate
disposition in that quarter, may be inferred
as duly resulting from the combination. Curiosity
brought many to the spot from portions of country
twenty, thirty, and even forty miles offfor, usually
well-provided with good horses, the southron finds
a difference of ten or twenty miles no great
matter
.
Such had been the reputation of the region
here spoken of, not less for its large mineral wealth
than for the ferocious character of those in its
neighbourhood, that numbers, who would not
otherwise
have adventured, now gladly took advantage
of the great excitement, and presence of so many,
to look themselves upon a section of which they had
heard so long and so much. There came the planter,
of rather more wealth than his neighbours,
solicitous
for some excitement and novelty to keep himself
from utter stagnation. There came the farmer,
discontented with his present abiding-place, and in
search of a new spot of more promise, in which to
drive stakes and do better. The lawyer, from a
neighbouring county, in search of a cause; and the
creditor in search of his runaway debtorthe
judge and the jury also added something, not less to
the number than the respectability of the throng.
The grand jury had found a number of bills, and
most of them for the more aggravated offences in
the estimation of the law. Rivers, Munro,
Blundell
,
Forrester, were all severally and collectively
included in their inquiries; but as none of the
parties
were to be found, for the present at least, and
as one of them had been removed to another and
higher jurisdiction, the case of most importance
left remaining was that which charged Colleton
with Forrester's murder. There was no occasion
for delay; and, in gloomy and half desponding
mood, though still erect and unshrinking to the eye
of the beholder, Ralph refused the privilege of a
traverse, and instructed Pippin to go on with the
case. The lawyer himself had not the slightest
objection to this procedure, for, not to be harsh in
our estimate of his humanities, there is no reason to
believe that he regarded for a single instant the
value of his client's life, but as its preservation was
to confer credit upon his capacity as his legal friend
and adviser. The issue was consequently made
up without delaythe indictment was read, and
the prisoner put himself upon God and the
country
,
according to the usual forms, and the case
proceeded
.
The general impression of the spectators was
decidedly in favour of the accused. His youth
the noble bearingthe ease, the unobtrusive
confidence
the
gentle expression, pliant and, though
sad, yet entirely free from any thing like
desponding
weaknessall told in his favour. He was a
fine specimen of the southern aristocratthe true
nobleman of that region, whose pride of character
is never seen, and is only to be felt in the influence
which it invariably exercises over all with whom
it may have contact or connexion. Though firm
in every expression, and manly in every
movement
,
there was nothing in the habit and
appearance
of Ralph, which, to the eye of those around,
savoured of the murderer. There was nothing
ruffianly or insincere. But, as the testimony
proceeded
when
the degree of intimacy was shown
which had existed between himself and the
murdered
manwhen they heard that Forrester had
brought him wounded and fainting to his home
had attended himhad offered even to fight for him
with Rivers.When all these facts were
developed
,
in connexion with the sudden flight of the
person
so befriendedon the same night with him who
had befriended himhe having a knowledge of the
proposed departure of the latter, and with the
finding
of the bloody dagger marked with the youth's
initialsthis feeling very perceptibly underwent a
change. The people, proverbially fickle, veered
round to the opposite extreme of opinion, and a
confused buzz around, sometimes made sufficiently
audible to all senses, indicated the unfavourable
character of the change. The witnesses were
closely examined, and the story was complete and
admirably coherent. The presumptions, as they
were coupled together, were conclusive; and, when
it was found that not a solitary witness came
forward
even to say that the accused was a man of
character and good connexionsa circumstance
which could not materially have affected the
testimony
as it stood, but which, wanting, gave it
additional
forcethe unhappy youth, himself, felt that
all was over. A burning flush, succeeded by a
deathlike paleness, came over his face for a
moment
;construed
by those around into a
consciousness
of guiltfor, where the prejudices of men
become
active, all appearances of change which go
Vol. II.P
not to affect the very foundation of the bias, are only
additional proofs of what they have before believed.
He rested his head upon his united hands in deep
but momentary agony. What were his feelings
then? With warm, pure emotionswith a pride,
only limited by a true sense of proprietywith an
ambition, whose eye was sunward everwith
affections
which rendered life doubly desirable, and
which made love a high and holy aspirationwith
these several and predominating feelings struggling
in his soul, to be told of such a doomto be stricken
from the respect of his fellowsto forfeit life, and
love, and reputationto undergo the punishment
of the malefactor, and to live in memory only as a
felonungrateful, foolish, fiendisha creature of
dishonest passions, and mad and merciless in their
exercise. The tide of thought, which bore to his
consciousness all these harrowing convictions, was
sudden as the wing of the lightning, and nearly
shattered, in that single instant, the towering
manhood
whose high reachings had attracted it. But
the pride consequent to his education and the
society
in which he had lived, came to his relief; and
after the first dreadful agony of soul, he again
stood erect, and listened, seemingly unmoved, to
the defences set up by his counsel. But how idle,
even to his mind, desirous as he must have been of
every species of defence, were all the vainglorious
mouthings of the pettifogger. He soon
discovered
that the ambition of Pippin chiefly consisted
in the utterance of his speech. He saw, too, in a
little while, that the nonsense of the lawyer had
not even the solitary meritif such it beof being
extemporaneous; and in the slow and monotonous
delivery of a long string of stale truisms, not
bearing
any analogy to the case in hand, he perceived
the dull elaborations of the closet. But such was
not the estimate of the lawyer himself. He knew
what he was about; and having satisfied himself
that the case was utterly hopeless, he was only
solicitous
that the people should see that he could still
make a speech. He well knew that his auditory,
perfectly assured with himself of the hopelessness
of the defence, would give him the credit of having
made the most of his materials, and this was all he
wanted. In the course of his exhortations,
however
,
he was unfortunate enough to make an
admission
for his client which was, of itself, fatal; and
his argument thence became unnecessary. He
admitted that the circumstances sufficiently
established
the charge of killing, but proceeded,
however
,
to certain liberal assumptions, without any
ground whatever of provocation on the part of
Forrester, which made his murder only matter of
self-defence on the side of the accused, whose
crime, therefore, became justifiable; but Ralph,
who had for some time been listening with
manifest
impatience to sundry misrepresentations, not
equally evil with this, but almost equally annoying,
now rose and interrupted him; and though the
proceeding
was something informal, proceeded to
correct
the statement.
No one, may it please your honour, and you,
gentlemen, now presiding over my fate, can be
more conscious than myself, from the nature of the
evidence given in this case, of the utter
hopelessness
of any defence which may be offered on my
behalf. But, while recognising, in their fullest
force, the strong circumstantial proofs of crime
which you have heard, I may be permitted to deny
for myself what my counsel has been pleased to
admit for me. To say that I have not been guilty
of this crime, is only to repeat that which was said
when I threw myself upon the justice of the
country
.
I denied any knowledge of it thenI deny
any knowledge of, or participation in it, now. I
am not guilty of this killing, whether with or
without
justification. The blood of the unfortunate
man, Forrester, is not upon my hands; and
whatever
may be your decree this day, of this sweet
consciousness nothing can deprive me.
I consider, may it please your honour, that my
counsel, having virtually abandoned my cause, I
have the right to go on with it myself
But here Pippin, who had been dreadfully
impatient
heretofore, started forward, with evident
alarm.
Oh, nono, your honourmy clientMr.
Colleton
how
can you think such a thing? I have
not, your honour, abandoned the caseon the
contrary
,
your honour will remember, that it was while
actually proceeding with the case that I was
interrupted
.
The youth, with a singular degree of composure,
replied:
Your honour will readily understand me,
though the gentleman of the bar does not. I
conceive
him not only to have abandoned the case,
your honour, but actually to have joined hand and
hand with the prosecuting counsel. It is true, sir,
that he still calls himself my counseland still,
under that name, presumes to harangue, as he
alleges
,
in my behalf; but, when he violates the
truth, not less than my instructionswhen he
declares
all that is alleged against me in that paper to
be trueall of which I declare to be falsewhen
he admits me to be guilty of a crime of which I am
not guiltyI say that he has not only abandoned
my case, but that he has betrayed the trust reposed
in him. What, your honour, must the jury infer
from the confession which he has just made?
What!but that in my conference with him I have
made the same confession? It becomes necessary,
therefore, may it please your honour, not only that I
take from him, thus openly, the power which I
confided
to him, but that I call upon your honour to
demand from him, upon oath, whether such an
admission
was ever made to him by me. I know
that my own words will avail me nothing hereI
also know why they should notbut I am surely
entitled to require that he should speak out as to
the truth, when his misrepresentations are to make
weight against me in future. His oath, that I made
no such confession to him, will avail nothing for my
defence, but will avail greatly with those who, from
present appearances, are likely to condemn me. I
call upon him, may it please your honour, as
matter
of right, that he should be sworn to this
particular
.
This, your honour will perceive, if my
assertion be true, is the smallest justice which he
can do me; beyond this I will ask and suggest
nothing
leaving
it to your own mind how far the
license of his profession should be permitted to one,
who thus not only abandons, but betrays and
misrepresents
his client.
The youth was silent, and Pippin rose to speak
in his defence. Without being sworn, he admitted
freely that such a confession had not been made, but
that he had inferred the killing from the nature of
the testimony, which he thought conclusive on the
point. That his object had been to suggest a
probable
difficulty between the parties, in which he
would have shown Forrester as the aggressor.
He bungled on for some time longer in this
manner
,
but as he digressed again into the defence of
the accused, Ralph again begged to interrupt him.
I think it important, may it please your honour,
that the gentleman should be sworn as to the simple
P 2
fact which he has uttered. I want it on record,
that, at some future day, the few who have any
interest
in my fate should feel no mortifying doubts
of my innocence, when reminded of the
occurrence
which
this strange admission, improperly
circulated, might otherwise occasion. Let him
swear, your honour, to the fact; this, I think, I may
require.
After a few moments of deliberation, his honour
decided that the demand was one of right, strictly
due, not merely to the prisoner, and to the abstract
merits of the circumstance, but also to the
necessity
which such an event clearly created, of
establishing
certain governing principles for restraining
those holding situations so responsible, who should
so far wilfully betray their trusts. The lawyer was
made to go through the humiliating process, and
then subjected to a sharp reprimand from the judge;
who, indeed, might have well gone further, in
actually
striking his name from the rolls of court.
It was just after this interesting period in the
history
of the trial, and when Pippin, who could not
be made to give up the case, as Ralph had required,
was endeavouring to combat with the attorney of
the State some incidental points of doctrine, and to
resist their application to certain parts of the
previously
recorded testimony, that our heroine, Lucy
Munro, attended by her trusty squire, Bunce,
made her appearance in the court-house.
She entered the hall more dead than alive. The
fire was no longer in her eyea thick haze had
overspread its usually rich and lustrous expression
her form trembled with the emotionthe strong
and struggling emotion of her souland fatigue
had done much towards the general enervation of
her person. The cheek was pale with the innate
consciousnessthe lips were blanched, and slightly
parted, as if wanting in the muscular exercise which
could bring them together. She tottered forward
to the stand upon which the witnesses were usually
assembled, and to which her course had been
directed
,
and for a few moments after her
appearance
in the court-room, her progress had been as
one stunned by a sudden and severe blow. But,
when roused by the confused hum of human voices
around her, she ventured to look up, and her eye, as
if by instinct, turned upon the dark box assigned for
the accusedshe again saw the form, in her mind
and eye, of almost faultless mould and excellence,
and then there was no more weaknessno more
struggle. Her eye kindledthe colour rushed
into her cheeksa sudden spirit re-invigorated her
frameand with clasped hands she boldly ascended
the small steps which led to the stand from which
her evidence was to be given, and declared her
ability, in low tones, almost unheard but by the
judge, to furnish matter of interest and importance
to the defence. Some little demur as to the
formality
of such a proceeding, after the evidence had
been fairly closed, took place between the counsel;
but, fortunately for justice, the judge was too wise
and too good a man to limit the course of truth to
prescribed rules, which could not be affected by a
departure, in the present instance, from their
restraints
.
The objection was overruled, and the
bold, but yet trembling girl, was called upon for her
testimony.
A new hope had been breathed into the bosoms
of the parties most concerned, on the appearance
of this interruption to the headlong and impelling
force of the circumstances so fatally arrayed
against the prisoner. The pedler was
overjoyed
,
and concluded that the danger was now
safely over. The youth himself felt his spirit
much lighter in his bosom, although he himself
knew not the extent of that testimony in his favour
which Lucy was enabled to give. He only knew
that she could account for his sudden flight on the
night of the murder, leading to a fair presumption
that he had not premeditated such an act; and
knew not that it was in her power to overthrow
the only feature in the circumstances shown against
him, by which they had been so connected as to
make out his supposed guilt.
Sanguine herself that this power was in her
to effect the safety of the accused, Lucy had not
for a moment considered the effect upon others,
more nearly connected with her than the youth, of
the development. These considerations were yet
to come.
The oath was administered,she began her
narration
,
but, at the very outset, the difficulties of her
situation beset her. How was she to save the man
she loved? Howbut by showing the guilt of her
uncle? How was she to prove that the dirk of the
youth was not in his possession at the time of the
murder? By showing that just before that time it
was in the possession of Munro, who was setting
forth for the express purpose of murdering the man,
now accused and held guilty of the crime. The
fearful gathering of thoughts and images, thus
without preparation working in her mind, again
destroyed the equilibrium by which her truer senses
would have enforced her determination to proceed.
Her head swamher words were confused and
incoherent, and perpetually contradictory. The
hope which her presence had inspired as suddenly
departed; and pity and doubt were the prevailing
sentiments of the spectators. After several
ineffectual
efforts to proceed, she all at once seemed
informed of the opinions around her, and gathering
new courage from the dreadful thought now forcing
itself upon her mind, that what she had said had
done nothing towards her objectshe exclaimed
impetuously, advancing to the judge, and speaking
alternately from him to the jury and the counsel,
He is not guilty of this crime, believe me. I
may not say what I knowI cannotyou would
not expect me to reveal it. It would involve others
whom I dare not name. I must not say that
but believe me, Mr. Colleton is not guiltyhe did
not commit the murderit was somebody else
I know, I will swear he had no hand in the
matter.
Very well, my good girlI have no doubt
you think, and honestly believe all that you say;
but what reasons have you for this bold assertion
in the teeth of all the testimony which has already
been given? You must not be surprised if we are
slow in believing what you tell us, until you can
show upon what grounds you stand forth in his
behalf. Do not be terrifiedspeak freelyofficer!
a chair for the ladytell us all that you know
keep nothing backremember, you are sworn to
speak the truththe whole truth.
The judge spoke kindly and encouragingly,
while, with considerable emphasis, he insisted upon
a full statement of all she knew. But the distress
of the poor girl increased with every moment of
thought, which warned of the predicament in
which such a statement must necessarily involve
her uncle.
Oh, how can I speak all this? How can I tell
that which must destroy him
Of whom do you speak, lady. Who is
he
?
inquired the attorney of the state.
Hewho?Oh, no, I can say nothing, I can
tell you nothing. I know nothing but that Mr.
Colleton is not guilty. He struck no blow at
Forrester
.
I am sure of itsome other handsome
other person. How can you believe that he would
do so?
There was no such charitable thought for him,
however, in the mind of those who heardas how
should there be? A whispering dialogue now took
place between the judge and the counsel, in which,
while they evidently looked upon her as little better
than demented with her love for the accused, they
still appeared to hold it due to justice, not less than
to humanity, to obtain from her every particular of
testimony bearing on the case, which, by possibility,
she might really have in her possession. Not
that they really believed that she knew any thing
which might avail the prisoner. Regarding her as
individually and warmly interested in his life, they
looked upon her appearance, and the evidence
which she tenderedif so it might be styledas
solely intended to provoke sympathy, gain time,
or possibly, as the result of feelings so deeply
excited
as to have utterly passed the bounds of all
restraining reason. The judge himself, who was
a good, not less than a sensible man, undertook, in
concluding this conference, to pursue the
examination
himself, with the view to the bringing out
such portions of her information as delicacy or
some other more influential motive might persuade
her to conceal.
You are sure, Miss Munro, of the innocence of
the prisonerso sure that you are willing to swear
to it. Such is your conviction, at least; for, unless
you saw the blow given by another hand, or could
prove Mr. Colleton to have been elsewhere at the
time of the murder, of course you could not, of a
certainty, swear to any such fact. You are not
now to say whether you believe him capable of
such an act or not. You are to say whether you
know of any circumstances which shall acquit him
of the charge, or furnish a plausible reason, why
others, not less than yourself, should have a like
reason with yourself to believe so. Can you do
this, Miss Munro? Can you show any thing in
this chain of circumstances against him which, of
your own knowledge, you can say to be untrue?
Speak out, young lady, and rely upon every
indulgence
from the court.
Here the judge recapitulated all the evidence
which had been furnished against the prisoner.
The maiden listened with close attention, and the
difficulties of her situation became more and more
obvious. Finding her slow to answer, though her
looks were certainly full of meaning, the
presiding
officer took another course for the object which
he had in view. He now proceeded to her
examination
in the following form.
You know the prisoner?
I do.
You knew the murdered man?
Perfectly.
Were they frequently together since the
appearance
of the prisoner in these regions?
Frequently.
At the house in which you dwell?
Yes.
Were they together on the day preceding the
night of the murder?
They werethroughout the better portion of
it.
Did they separate at your place of residence,
and what was the employment of the prisoner
subsequently on the same day?
They did separate while at our house, Mr.
Colleton retiring at an early hour of the evening
to his chamber.
So far, Miss Munro, your answers correspond
directly with the evidence, and now come the
important
portions. You will answer briefly and
distinctly. After that, did you see any thing more
of the prisoner, and know you of his departure
from the housethe hour of the nightthe
occasion
of his goingand the circumstances
attending
it?
These questions were indeed all important to the
female delicacy of the maiden, and as her eye sunk
in confusion, and as her cheek paled and kindled
with the innate consciousness, the youth, who had
hitherto been silent, now rose, and without the
slightest pause or hesitancy of manner, requested
of the maiden that she would say no more.
See you not, your honour, that her mind
wavers
that
she speaks and thinks wildly. I am
satisfied that though she might say something, your
honour, in accounting for my strange flight, yet, as
that constitutes but a small feature in the
circumstances
against me, what she can allege will avail
me little. Press her no farther, therefore, I
entreat
you. Let her retire. Her word can do me
no good, and I would not that, for my sake and
life, she should feel, for a single instant, an
embarrassment
of spirit, which, though it be honourable in
its character, must necessarily be distressing in its
exercise. Proceed with your judgment, I pray
youwhatever it may beI am now ready for
the worst, and though innocent as the babe unborn
of the crime urged against me, I am not afraid to
meet its consequences. I am not unwilling to
die.
But you must not diethey will notthey
cannot find you guilty! How know they you
are guilty? Who dares say you are guilty, when
I know you are innocent. Did I not see you fly?
Did I not send you on your waywas it not to
escape from murder yourself that you flew, and how
should you have been guilty of that crime of which
you were the destined victim yourself. Oh, no
no! you are not guiltyand the daggerI heard
that!that is not trueOh no, the daggeryou
dropt it
The eye of the inspired girl was caught by a
glancea single glancefrom one at the opposite
corner of the court-room, and that glance brought
her back to the full consciousness of the fearful
development she was about to make. A decrepit
old woman, resting with bent form upon a staff
which was planted firmly before her, seemed wrapt
in the general interest pervading the court. The
woman was huge of frame and rough of make;
her face was large and swollen, and the tattered
cap and bonnet, the soiled and coarse materials
which she wore, indicated one of the humblest
caste in the country. Her appearance attracted
no attention, and she was unmarked by all around;
few having eyes for any thing but the exciting
business under consideration. But the disguise did
not conceal her uncle from the glance of his niece.
That one look had the desired effectthe speech
was arrested before its conclusion, and the
spectators
,
now more than ever assured of the very
partial
sanity of the witness, gave up any doubts
which had previously manifested themselves in
behalf
of the accused. A second look of the landlord
was emphatic enough for the purpose of completely
silencing her farther evidence. She read in its
fearful expression, as plainly as if spoken in words
The next syllable you utter is fatal to your uncle
your father. Now speak, woman, if you can.
Vol. II.Q
For a single moment she was dumb and
stationary
her
eye turned from her uncle to the
prisoner
.
Horror, and the agonies natural to the strife
in her bosom, were in its wild expression, and, with
a single cry of I cannotI must not save him,
from her pallid lips, she sunk down senseless
upon the hard floor, and was borne out by several
of the more sympathizing spectators.
There was nothing now to delay the action of
the court. The counsel had closed with the
argument
,
and the judge proceeded in his charge to the
jury. His remarks were rather favourable than
otherwise to the prisoner. He dwelt upon his
youthhis manlinessthe seeming excellence of
his education, and the propriety which had marked
his whole behaviour on trial. These he spoke of
as considerations which must, of course, make the
duty which they had to perform more severely
painful to all. Still, he could not do away with
the strong and tenacious combination of
circumstances
against him. They were closely knit, and
all tended strongly to the conviction of the guilt
of the accused. Still they were circumstantial;
and the doubts of the jury were, of course, so many
arguments on the side of mercy. He concluded.
But the jury had no doubts. How should they
doubt? They deliberated, indeed, for form sake, but
not long. In a little while they returned to their
place, and the verdict was read by the clerk.
Guilty.
Guilty, responded the prisoner, and for a
moment
his head dropped upon the clasped hands,
and his frame shivered as with an ague. Guilty
guiltyOh, my fatherEdithEdithhave I
lived for this? There was no other sign of
human
weakness. He arose with composure, and
followed, with firm step, the officer to his dungeon.
His only thought was of the sorrows and the
shame of othersof those of whom he had been
the passion, and the prideof that father's memory
and name, of whom he had been the cherished hope
of that maiden of whom he had been the
cherished
love. His firm, manly bearing won the
esteem
of all those who, nevertheless, at the same
moment, had few if any doubts of the justice of
his doom.
CHAPTER XV.
I have a prayer to thee, that my fond soul
Still evermore is uttering to herself,
So that my lips have learn'd it, and for aye
Do syllable it into sound.
Ralph Colleton
was once more in his dungeon
aloneand without hope. For a moment
during
the progress of his trial, and at the appearance
of Lucy, he deemed it possible that some
providential
fortune might work a change in the
aspect
of things, favourable to his escape from what,
to his mind, was far worse than any thought of
death, in the manner of his death. But when, after
a moment of reflection, he perceived that the
feminine
delicacy of the maiden must suffer from any
further testimony from her lipswhen he saw that,
most probably, in the minds of all who heard her
narration, the circumstance of her appearance in
his chamber and at such an hour of the night, and
for any object, would be fatal to her
reputation
when
he perceived this consciousness, too,
weighing down even to agony the soul of the still
courageous witnessthe high sense of honour
which had always prompted him, not less than the
chivalrous consideration of the sex taught in the
south among the earliest lessons of society to its
youthcompelled him to interpose, and prevent, if
possible, all further utterance, which, though
possibly
all-important to him, would be fatally
destructive
to her. He did so. He succeeded, and
he was in his dungeonhope shut out from its
walls, and a fearful death and ignominy written
upon them. When the officers attending him had
retiredwhen he heard the bolt shot, and saw that
the eyes of curiosity were excludedthe firm spirit
fled which had supported him. A passing weakness
of heart grew uppermost, and he sunk down upon
the single chair allotted to his prison. He buried his
face in his hands, and the warm tears gushed freely
through his fingers. But he heard approaching
footsteps
,
and speedily recovered. The traces of his
weakness were sedulously brushed from his cheeks,
and the handkerchief employed for the purpose
studiously put out of sight. He was not ashamed of
the pang, but he was not willing that other eyes
should behold it. Such was the nature of his
pridethe pride of strength, moral strength, and
superiority over those weaknesses, which, however
natural they may be, are nevertheless not often
becoming in the man.
It was the pedler, Bunce, who made his
appearance
choosing,
with a feature of higher
characteristic
than would usually have been allotted him,
rather to cheer the prison hours of the unfortunate,
than to pursue his own individual advantages;
which, at such a time, might not have been
inconsiderable
.
The worthy pedler was dreadfully
disappointed
in the result of his late adventure. He
had not given himself any trouble to inquire into
the nature of those proofs which Lucy Munro had
assured him were in her possesion; but satisfied as
much by his own hope as by her assurance, that
all would be as he wished it, he had been elevated
to a pitch of almost indecorous joy, which strongly
contrasted with his present depression. He had
little now to say in the way of consolation, and
that little was coupled with so much that was
unjust
to the maiden, as to call forth, at length, the
rebuke of Colleton.
Forbear on this subject, my good sirshe did
what she could, and what she might have said
would not have served me much. It was well she
said no more. Her willingnessher adventuring
so much in my behalfshould alone be sufficient
to protect her from every thing like blame. But
tell me, Bunce, what has become of herwhere is
she gone, and who is now attending her?
Why, they took her back to the old tavern. A
great big woman took her there, and looked after
her. I did go and had a sight on her, and there,
to be sure, was Munro's wife, though her I did see,
I'll be sworn, in among the rocks, where they shut
us up.
And was Munro there?
Wherein the rocks?
Noin the tavern? You say his wife had
come backdid he trust himself there?
I rather guess notseeing as how he'd stand
a close chance of 'quaintance with the rope. No,
neither him, nor Rivers, nor any of the regulators
thank the powersain't to be seen nowhere.
They're all offup into the nation, I guess, or off,
down in Alabam by this time, clear enough.
And who did you see at the rocks, and what
men were they that made you prisoners?
Q 2
Menif I said men, I was 'nation out, I guess.
Did I say men?
I understood you so.
'Twan't men at all. Nothing better than
women
,
and no small women neither. Didn't see a
man in the neighbourhood, but Chub, and he ain't
no man neither.
What is he?
Why, for that matter, he's neither one thing
nor anothernothing, no how. What they call a
hobbe-de-hoy will suit for his name sooner than any
other that I know on. For he ain't a man and he
ain't a boy; but jest a short, half-grown up chunk of
a fellow, with bunchy shoulders, and a big head,
with a mouth like an oven, and long lap ears like
saddle flaps.
In this manner the pedler informed Ralph of all
those previous particulars with which he had not
till then been acquainted. This having been done,
and the dialogue having fairly reached its
termination
the
words of the two having now but
occasional
utterance, and the youth exhibiting some
strong symptoms of wearinessBunce took his
departure for the present, not, however, without
again proffering his services. These Ralph did
not scruple to acceptgiving him, at the same
time, sundry little commissions, and among them,
a message of thanks and respectful consideration
to Miss Munro.
She, in the meanwhile, had, upon fainting in the
court-room, been borne off in a state of utter
insensibility
to the former residence of Munro, to
which place, as the pedler has already informed us,
the wife of the landlord had that very morning
returned
,
resuming, precisely as before, all the
previous
order of her domestic arrangements. The
reason for this return may be readily assigned.
The escape of the pedler and of Lucy from their
place of temporary confinement had completely
upset all the prior arrangements of the outlaws.
They now conceived it no longer safe as a retreat;
and failing as they did to overtake the fugitives, it
was determined that in the disguises which had
been originally suggested for their adoption, they
should now venture into the village, as many of
them as were willing, to obtain that degree of
information
which would enable them to judge what
further plans to adopt. As Rivers had
conjectured
,
Chub Williams, so far from taking for the
village, had plunged deeper into the woods, flying
to former and well known haunts, and regarding
the face of man as that of a natural enemy. The
pedler had seen none but women, or those so
disguised
as such as to seem none other than what
their guise indicated--while Lucy had been
permitted
to see none but her uncle and aunt, and one
or two persons she had never seen before. Under
these circumstances, Rivers individually felt no
apprehensions that his wild refuge would be
searched; but Munro, something older, less
sanguine
,
and somewhat more timid than his colleague,
determined no longer to risk it; but having, as we
have seen, effectually checked the utterance of that
evidence which, in her unconscious excitation, must
have involved him more deeply in the meshes of
the law, besides indicating his immediate and near
neighbourhood, he made his way, unobserved, from
the village, having first provided for her safety,
and, as he had determined to keep out of the way
himself, having brought his family back to their
old place of abode. He had determined on this
course from a variety of considerations. Nothing,
he well knew, could affect his family. He had
always studiously kept them from any
participation
in his offences. The laws had no terror for
them, and untroubled by any process against him,
they could still remain and peaceably possess his
property, of which he well knew, in the existing
state of society in the south, no legal outlawry of
himself would ever avail to deprive them. This
could not have been his hope in their common flight.
Such a measure, too, would only have impeded his
progress, in the event of his pursuit, and have
burdened
him with incumbrances which would
perpetually
have involved him in difficulty. He
calculated
differently his chances. His hope was to
be able, when the first excitements had overblown,
to return to the village, and, at least, quietly to
effect such a disposition of his property, which
was not inconsiderable, as to avoid the heavy and
almost entire loss which would necessarily follow
any other determination. In all this, however, it
may be remarked that the reasonings of Rivers,
rather than his own, determined his conduct.
That more adventurous ruffian had, from his
superior
boldness and greater capacities in general,
acquired a singular and large influence over his
companion: he governed him, too, as much by
his desire of gain, as by any distinct superiority
which he himself possessed: he stimulated his
avarice with the future results of their enterprises
in the same region after the passing events were
over; and thus held him still in that fearful bondage
of subordinate villany, whose inevitable tendency
is to become the creature, and finally the victim.
The gripe which, in a moral sense and with a
slight reference to character, Rivers had upon the
landlord, was as tenacious as that of deathbut
with this difference, that it was death prolonged,
through a fearful, and though not a protracted, yet
much too long a life. The determination of Munro
was made accordingly; and, following hard upon
the flight of Lucy from the rocks, we find the
landlady
quietly reinstated in her old home as if
nothing
had happened. Munro did not, however,
return
to the place of refuge; he had no such
confidence
in circumstances as Rivers; his fears had
grown active in due proportion with his increase
of years; and, with the increased familiarity with
crime, had grown up in his mind a corresponding
doubt of all persons, and an active suspicion which
trusted nothing; his abode in all this time was
uncertain; he now slept at one deserted lodge,
and now at anothernow in the disguise of one
and now of another character; now on
horse-back
,
now on footbut in no two situations taking
the same feature or disguise. In the night-time, he
sometimes adventured, though with great caution,
to the village, and made inquiries. On all hands,
he heard of nothing but the preparations making
against the clan of which he was certainly one of
the prominent heads. The state was going on with
activity, and a proclamation of the governor,
offering
a high reward for the discovery and detention
of any persons having a hand in the murder of the
Guard, was on one occasion put into his hands.
All these things made caution necessary, and,
though venturing still very considerably at times,
he was yet seldom entirely off his guard.
Rivers kept close in the cover of his den. That
den had numberless ramifications, however, known
only to himself; and his calm indifference was the
result of a conviction that it would require two
hundred men, properly instructed, and all at the
same moment, to trace him through its many
sinuosities
.
He too, sometimes, carefully disguised,
adventured into the village, but never much in the
sight of those who were not bound to him by a
common danger. To Lucy he did not appear on
such occasions, though he did to the old lady, and
even at the family fireside.
Lucy, indeed, had eyes for few objects, and
thoughts but for one. She sat as one stupified
with dangeryet sufficiently conscious of it as to
be conscious of nothing beside. She was
bewildered
with the throng of horrible circumstances
which had been so crowded on her mind and
memory
in so brief a space of time. At one moment
she blamed her own weakness in suffering the trial
of Ralph to progress to a consummation which she
shuddered to reflect upon. Had she a right to
withhold her testimonytestimony so important
to the life and the honour of one, whose life and
honour were no less dear to her heart than they
could possibly be to his? Had she performed her
duty in suffering his case to go to judgment? and
such a judgmentso horrible a doom! Should
she now suffer it to go to its dreadful execution,
when a word from her would stay the hand of the
officer, and save the life of the condemned. But
would such be its effect? What credence would
be given now to one, who, in the hall of justice,
had sunk down like a criminal herself
withholding
the truth, and contradicting it at every word
of her utterance? To whom then could she apply
who could hear her pleaeven though she boldly
narrated all the truthin behalf of the prisoner?
She maddened as she thought on all these
difficulties
her
blood grew fevereda thick haze
overspread
her senses, and she raved at last in the most
wild delirium.
Some days went by in her unconsciousness, and
when she at length grew calmwhen the fever of
her mind had somewhat subsided,she opened her
eyes and found, to her great surprise, her uncle
sitting beside her couch. It was midnight; and
this was the hour he had usually chosen when
making
his visits to his family. In these stolen
moments
,
his attendance was chiefly given to that
hapless orphan, whose present sufferings he well
knew were in great part attributable to himself.
The thought smote him, for, in reference to her, all
feeling had not departed from his soul. There
was still a lurking sensibilitya lingering
weakness
of humanityone of those pledges which
nature gives of her old affiliation, and which she
never entirely takes away from the human heart.
There are still some strings, feeble and wanting in
energy though they be, which bind even the most
reckless outcast in some little particular to
humanity
;
and, however time, and the world's variety of
circumstance may have worn them and impaired
their firm hold, they still sometimes, at
unlooked-for
hours, regrapple the long rebellious subject, and
make themselves felt and understood as in the first
moments of their creation. Such now was their
resumed sway with Munro. While his niece--the
young, the beautiful, the virtuousso endowed by
natureso improved by educationso full of those
fine graces, beyond the reach of any art, lay
before
him insensible--her fine mind spent in
incoherent
ravings; her gentle form racked with
convulsive
shudderingsthe still small monitorial voice,
unheard so long, spoke out to him in terrible
rebukings
.
He felt in those moments how deeply he had
been a criminal; how much, not of his own, he had
appropriated to himself and sacrificedand how
sacred a trust he had abused, in the person of the
delicate creature before him, by a determination
the most cruel and perhaps unnecessary. Days
had elapsed in her delirium; and such were his
newly awakened feelings, that each night brought
him, though at considerable risk, an attendant by
her bed. His hand administeredhis eyes watched
over; and in the new duties of the parent, he
acquired
a feeling of domesticity, the pleasures of
which he had never felt before. But she grew
conscious
at lastand her restoration relieved his
mind of one apprehension which had sorely
troubled
it. Her condition, during her illness, was
freely described to her. But she thought not of
herselfshe had no thought for any other than the
one for whom thoughts and prayers promised now
to avail but little.
Uncle she spoke at lastyou are here,
and I rejoice to see you. I have much to say
much to beg at your handsOh, let me not
beg in vain. Let me not find you stubborn to
that which maynot make me happyI say not
that, for happy I never look to be againbut to
make me as much so as human power can make
me. When and she spoke hurriedly, while a
strong and aguish shiver went through her whole
framewhen is it said that he must die?
He knew perfectly of whom she spoke, but felt
reluctant to indulge her mind in a reference to a
subject which had already exercised so large an
influence over it. But he knew little of the
distempered
heart, and fell into an error by no means
uncommon with society. She soon convinced him
of this, when his prolonged silence left it doubtful
whether he contemplated an answer.
Why are you silentdo you fear to speak?
Have no fears now. We have no time for fear. We
must be activereadybold. Feel my handit
trembles no longer. I am no longer a weak-hearted
woman.
He again doubted her sanity, and spoke to her
soothingly, seeking to divert her mind to indifferent
subjects; but she smiled on the endeavour, which
she readily understood, and putting aside her aunt,
who pressed forward with a like object, she again
addressed her uncle.
Doubt me not, uncleI rave no longer. I am
now calmcalm as it is possible for me to be, having
such a sorrow as mine struggling at my heart.
Why should I hide it from you? It will not be
hidden. I love himlove him as woman never
loved man beforewith a soul and spirit, all and
unreservedly his, and with no thought in which he is
not always the principle. I know that he loves
another
I
know that the passion which I feel I must
feel and cherish alone; that it must burn itself away,
though it burns away its dwelling-place. I am
resigned to such a fate; but I am not prepared
for more. I cannot bear that he too should die
and such a death. He must not die--he must not
die, my uncle; though we save him--ay, save him
--for another.
Shame on you, my daughterhow can you
confess
so much. Think on your sexyour youth
was the somewhat strongly worded rebuke of the
old lady.
I have thought on allon every thing. I feel
all that you have said, and the thought and the
feeling
have been my madness. I must speak, or I
shall again go mad. I am not the tame and cold
creature that the world calls woman. I have been
differently made. I can love in the world's
despite
.
I can feel through the world's freezeI can
dare all, when my soul is in it, though the world
sneer in scorn and contempt. But what I have
said, is said to you. I would notnonot for
worlds, that he should know I said itnot for
worlds!and her cheeks were tinged slightly,
Vol. II.R
while her head rested slightly and for a single
instant upon the pillow.
But all this is nothing, she started up, and
again addressed herself to the landlord. Speak,
uncle, tell me, is there yet time--yet time to save
him--when is it that they say he must die?
On Friday next, at noon.
And this?
Is Monday.
He must not dieno,not die, then, my uncle.
You must save himyou must save him. You
have been the cause of his doomyou must
preserve
him from its execution. You owe it him as
a debt--you owe it me--you owe it to yourself.
Believe not, my uncle, that there is no other day
than thisno other worldno other penalties than
belong to this. You read no Bible, but you have a
thought which must tell you that there are worlds
there is a life yet to come. I know you cannot
doubt--you must not doubt--you must believe.
Have a fear of its punishmentshave a hope of
its rewardsand listen to my prayer. You must
save Ralph Colletonask me not howtalk not
of difficulties. You must save himyou must
you must.
Why, you forget, Lucymy dear childyou
forget that I too am in danger. This is midnight
--it is only at this hour that I can steal into the
village
and
how, and in what manner shall I be able
to do as you require?
Oh, man!--man!forgive me, dear uncle, I
would not vex you. But if there were gold in that
dungeonbroad bars of gold, or shining silver, or
a prize that would make you rich, would you ask
me the how and the where? Would that clumsy
block, and those slight bars, and that dull jailer be
an obstacle that would keep you back? Would
you need a poor girl like me to tell you that the
blocks might be piercedthat the bars might be
brokenthat the jailer might be won to the mercy
which would save. You have strengthyou have
skillyou have the capacity, the powerthere is
but one thing wanting to my prayerthe will, the
disposition.
You do me wrong, Lucygreat wrong, believe
me. I feel for this young man, and the thought
has been no less painful to me than to you, that
my agency has contributed in great measure to his
danger. But what if I were to have the will, as
you saywhat if I went forward to the jailer and
offered a bribe--would not the bribe which the
State has offered for my arrest be a greater
attraction
than any in my gift? To scale the walls and
break the bars, or in any forcible manner to effect
the purpose, I must have confederates, and in
whom could I venture to confide? The few to
whom I could entrust such a design are, like
myself
,
afraid to adventure or be seen, and such a
design would be defeated by Rivers himself, who
so much hates the youth, and is bent on his
destruction.
Speak not of himsay to him nothingyou
must do it yourself, if you do it at all. You can
effect much if you seriously determine. You can
design and execute all, and find ready and able
assistance, if you once willingly set about it. I
am not able to advise, nor will you need my
counsel. Assure me that you will make the effort
that you will put your whole heart into it, and I
have no fears--I feel confident of his escape.
You think too highly of my ability in this
respect
.
There was a time, Lucy, when such a
design had not been so desperate, but now
Oh, not so desperate now, uncle, uncleI
could not live--not a momentwere he to perish
in that dreadful manner. Have I no claim upon
your mercywill you not do for me what you
would do for the attainment of moneywhat you
have done, at the bidding of that dreadful wretch,
Rivers? Nay, look not away, I know it allI
know that you had the dagger of Colletonthat
you put it into the hands of the wretch who struck
the manthat you saw him strikethat you strove
not to stop his hand. Fear you not I shall reveal
it? Fear you not?but I will notI cannot.
But this should be enough to make you strive in
this service. Heard you not, too, when he spoke,
knowing that my word would have saved him
rather than see me brought to the dreadful trial
of telling what I knew of that nightthat awful
night, when you both sought his life? Oh, I could
love him for thisfor this one thingwere there
nothing else beside worthy of my love.
The incident to which she referred had not been
unregarded by the individual she addressed, and
while she spoke his looks assumed a meditative
expression, and he spoke as in soliloquy, and in
broken sentences:
Could I pass to the jail unperceivedgain
admittance
then--but
who would grapple with the
jailer--how manage that?let me seebut no
nothat is impossible!
What is impossible?--nonothing is
impossible
in this, if you will but try. Do not hesitate,
dear uncleit will look easier if you will but for
a while reflect upon it. You will see many ways
of bringing it about. You can get aid if you want
it. There's the pedler, who is quite willing, and
ChubChub will do much if you can only find
him out.
The landlord smiled as she named these two
accessaries. Buncewhy what could the fellow
do?he's not the man for such servicenow
Chub might be of value, if he'd only follow orders:
but that he won't do. I don't see how we're to
work it, Lucyit looks more difficult the more I
think on it.
Oh, if it's only difficultif it's not impossibleit
will be done. Do not shrink back, uncle, do not
scruple. The youth has done you no wrong
you have done him much. You have brought him
where he ishe would have been safe otherwise.
You must save him. Save him, uncleand hear
me as I promise. You may then do with me as
you please. From that moment I am your slave,
and then, if it must be soif you will then require
it, I am willing then to become
his
slave too
him whom you have served so faithfully and so
unhappily
for so long a season.
Of whom speak you?
Guy Rivers! yesI shall then obey you,
though the funeral come with the bridal.
Lucy!
It is true. I hope not to survive it. It will be
a worse destiny to me than even the felon death to
the youth, whom I would save. Do with me as
you please thenbut let him not perish. Rescue
him from the doom you have brought upon himand
oh, my uncle, in that other worldif there we meet
the one good deed shall atone, in the thought of
my poor father, for the other most dreadful
sacrifice
to which his daughter now resigns herself.
The stern man was touched. He trembled, and
his lips quivered convulsively as he took her hand
into his own. Recovering himself, in a firm tone,
not less solemn than that which she had preserved
throughout the dialogue, he replied,
Hear me, Lucy, and believe what I assure
you. I will try to save this youth. I will do
R 2
what I can, my poor child, to redeem the trust of
your father. I have been no father to you
heretofore
not
much of one, at leastbut it is not too
late, and I will atone. I will do my best for
Colleton
the
thing is full of difficulty and danger,
but I will try to save him. All this, however, must
be unknownnot a word to anybody; and Rivers
must not see you happy, or he will suspect. Better
not be seenstill keep to your chamber, and rest
assured that all will be done, in my power, for the
rescue of the youth.
Oh, now you are, indeed, my fatheryet
uncle, shall I see you at the time when it is to be
done? Tell me at what moment you seek his
deliverance, that I may be upon my knees. Yet
say not to him that I have done any thing or said any
thing which has led to your endeavours. He will
not think so well of me if you doand, though he
may not love, I would have him think always of
me as ifas if I were a woman.
She was overcome with exertion, and the
revived
hope had, by its struggles, still further
exhausted
her. She sank back in slumbers far more
sweet than those for some time preceding, when
Munro and his wife retired from the apartment.
CHAPTER XVI.
What, will you save him? Marry, then, I will,
And here's my hand on it.
A day
more had elapsed, and the bustle in the
little village was increased by the arrival of other
travellers. A new light came to the dungeon of
Ralph Colleton, in the persons of his uncle and
sweet cousin, whom his letters, at his first arrest,
had apprized of his situation. They knew that
situation only in part, however; and the first
intimation
of his doom was that which he himself
gave them. The meeting was full of a painful
pleasure. The youth himself was firmmuscle
and mind all over; but deeply did his uncle reproach
himself for his precipitation and sternness, and the
grief of Edith, like all deep grief, was dumb, and
had no expression. There was but the sign of
woof wo inexpressible in the ashy lip, the glazed,
the tearless and half wandering eye, and the
convulsive
shiver, that at intervals racked her whole
frame, like strong and sudden gusts down among
the foliage. The youth, if he had any at such an
hour, spared his reproaches. He narrated in plain
and unexaggerated language, as if engaged in the
merest narration of commonplace, all the
circumstances
of his trial. He pointed out the
difficulties
,
to his mind insuperable, and strove to prepare
the minds of those who heard, for the final and
saddest trial of all, as his own mind had
prepared
him. In that fearful work of preparation,
the spirit of love could have no restraining
influence
,
and never was embrace more fond than that
of Ralph and the maiden. Much of his uncle's
consolation was found in the better disposition
which he now entertained, though at too late a day,
in favour of their passion. He would now
willingly
consent to all.
Had you not been so precipitate, Ralph he
saidhad you not been so proudhad you
thought at all, or given me time for thought, all
this trial had been spared us. Was I not irritated
by other things when I spoke to you unkindly?
You knew not how much I had been chafedyou
should not have been so hasty.
No more of this, uncle, I pray you. I was
wrong and rash, and I blame you not. I have
nobody but myself to reproach. Speak not of the
matter; but, as the best preparation for all that is
to come, let your thought banish me rather from
contemplation. Why should the memory of so
fair a creature as this be haunted by a story such
as mine. Why should she behold, in her mind's eye,
for ever, the picture of my dying agoniesthe
accursed
scaffoldthe and the emotion of his
soul, at the subject of his own contemplation, choked
him in his utterance, while Edith, half-fainting in
his arms, prayed his forbearance.
Speak not thusnot of this, Ralph, if you
would not have me perish. I am fearfully sick
nowmy head swims, and all is commotion at my
heart. Not waternot watergive me words of
hopeof consolation. Tell me that there is still
some chancesome little prospect. That
somebody
is gone in search of evidencein search of
hope. Is there not a circumstance which may
avail? Said you not something ofdid you not
tell me of a person who could say for you that
which would have done much towards your escape?
A woman, was it notspeak, who is shelet me
go to hershe will not refuse to tell me all, if she
be a woman.
Ralph assured her in the gentlest manner of
the hopelessness of any such application; and the
momentary dream which her own energies had
conjured into a promise, as suddenly subsided,
leaving her to a full consciousness of her
desolation
.
Her father at length found it necessary to
abridge the interview. Every moment of its
protraction
seemed still more to unsettle the
understanding
of his daughter. She spoke wildly and
confusedly, and in that thought of separation which
his doom perpetually forced upon her, she
contemplated
in all its fearful extremities, her own. She
was borne away but half alivethe feeling of wo
something blunted, however, by the mental
unconsciousness
following its realization. Private
apartments
were readily found them in the village, and
having provided good attendance for his daughter,
Col. Colleton set out, though almost entirely
hopeless
,
to ascertain still farther the particulars of the
case, and to see what might be done in behalf of
one of whose innocence he felt perfectly assured.
He knew Ralph too well to suspect him of
falsehood
;
and the clear narrative which he had given
and the manly and unhesitating account of all
particulars having any bearing on the case which
had fallen from his lips, he knew, from all his
previous
highmindedness of character, might safely be
relied onassured of this himself, he deemed it
not improbable that something might undergo
development
,
in a course of active inquiry, which
might tend to the creation of a like conviction in
the minds of those in whom rested the control of
life and judgment. His first visit was to the
lawyer
,
from whom, however, he could procure
nothing
,
besides being compelled, without possibility
of escape, to listen to a long string of reproaches
against his nephew.
I could, and would have saved him, Col.
Colleton
,
if the power were in mortal, was the
self-sufficient
speech of the little man; but he would
nothe broke in upon me when the very
threshold
was to be passed, and just as I was upon it.
Things were in a fair train, and all might have gone
well but for his boyish interruption. I would have
come over the jury with a settler. I would have
made out a case, sir, for their consideration, which
every man of them would have believed he
himself
saw. I would have shown your nephew, sir,
riding down the narrow trace, like a peaceable
gentlemananon, sir, you should have seen
Forrester
coming along full tilt after him. Forrester
should have cried out with a whoop and a right
royal oaththen Mr. Colleton would have heard
him, and turned round to receive him. But
Forrester
was drunk, you know, and would not
understand
the young man's civilities. He blunders out
a volley of curses right and left, and bullies Master
Colleton for a fight, which he declines. But
Forrester
is too drunk to mind all thatwithout more
ado, he mounts the young gentleman, and is about
to pluck out his eyes, when he feels the dirk in his
ribs, and then they cut loose. He gets the dirk
from Master Colleton and makes at himbut he
picks up a hatchet that happens to be lying about,
and drives at his head, and down drops Forrester,
as he ought to, dead as a door nail.
Good Heavens! and why did you not bring these
facts forward. They surely could not have
condemned
him under these circumstances.
Bring them forward! To be sure I would
have done so, but, as I tell you, just when on the
threshold, at the very entrance into the
transaction
,
up pops this hasty young fellowI'm sorry
to call your nephew so, Col. Colletonbut the fact
is, he owes his situation entirely to himself. I
would have saved him, but he was obstinately bent
on not being saved; and just as I commenced the
affair, up he pops and tells me, before all the
people, that I know nothing about it. A pretty
joke, indeed. I know nothing about itand it my
business to know all about it. Sir, it ruined him
I saw, from that moment, how the cat would
jump. I pitied the poor fellow, but what more
could I do?
But it is not too latewe can memorialize the
governor, we can put these facts in form, and by
duly showing them with the accompanying proofs,
we can obtain a new triala respite.
Can't be done nowit's too late. Had I been
let alonehad not the youth come between me and
my duty, I would have saved him, sir, as, under
God, I have saved hundreds before. But it's too
late now.
Oh, surely not too latewith the facts that
you mention, if you will give me the names of the
witnesses furnishing them, so that I can obtain
their affidavits
Witnesses!what witnesses?
Why, did you not tell me of the manner in
which Forrester assaulted my nephew, and forced
upon him what he did as matter of self defence.
Where is the proof of this?
Oh, proof. Why, you did not think that was
the true state of the casethat was only the case
I was to present to the jury.
And there is then no evidence for what you
have said?
Not a tittle, sir. Evidence is scarcely
necessary
in a case like this, sir, where the State proves
more than you can possibly disprove. Your only
hope, sir, is to present a plausible conjecture to the
jury. Just set their fancies to work, and they have
a taste most perfectly dramatic. What you leave
undone, they will do. Where you exhibit a blank,
they will supply the words wanting. Only set
them on trail, and they'll tree the 'possum. They
are noble hands at it, and, as I now live and talk to
you, sir, not one of them who heard the plausible
story which I would have made out, but would have
discovered more common sense and reason in it than
in all the evidence you could possibly have given
them. Because, you see, I'd have given them a
reason
for every thing. Look, how I should have made
out the story. Mr. Colleton and Forrester are
excellent friends, and both agree to travel together.
Well, they're to meet at the forks by midnight. In
the mean time, Forrester goes to see his sweetheart,
Kate Waltona smart girl, by-the-way, colonel,
and well to look on. Parting's a very
uncomfortable
thing, now, and they don't altogether like it.
Kate cries, and Forrester storms. Well, must
come, comes at last. They kiss and are off
different
ways. Well, Grief's but a dry companion,
and, to get rid of him, Forrester takes a drink
still Grief holds on, and then he takes another and
another, until Grief gets off at last, but not before
taking with him full half, and not the worst half
either, of the poor fellow's senses. What then?
Why then he swaggers and swears at every thing,
and particularly at your nephew, who, you see, not
knowing his condition, swears at him for keeping
him waiting
Ralph Colleton never swears, Mr. Pippin, said
the colonel, grimly.
Wellwell, if he didn't swear then, he might
very well have sworn, and I'll be sworn but he did
on that occasion; and it was very pardonable too.
Well, he swears at the drunken man, not knowing
his condition, and the drunken man rolls and reels
like a rowdy, and gives it to him back, and then
they get at it. Your nephew, who is a stout colt,
buffets him well for a time, but Forrester, who is a
mighty powerful built fellow, he gets the better in the
long run, and both come down together in the road.
Then Forrester, being uppermost, sticks his thumb
into Master Colleton's eyethe left eye, I think it
wasyes, the left eye it wasand the next
moment
it would have been out, when your nephew,
not liking it, whipped out his dirk, and, 'fore
Forrester
could say Jack Robinson, it was playing
about in his ribs; and then comes the hatchet part,
just as I told it you before.
And is none of this truth?
God bless your soul, no. Do you suppose,
if it was the truth, it would have taken so long
a time in telling. I wouldn't have wasted the
breath in telling it. The witnesses would have
done that, if it were true; but in this was the
beauty of my art, and had I been permitted to say
to the jury what I've said to you, the young man
would have been clear. It wouldn't have been
gospel, but where's the merit of a lawyer if he
can't go through a bog. This is one of the
sweetest
and most delightful features of the profession.
Sir, it is putting the wings of fiction to the lifeless
and otherwise immoveable body of the fact.
Colonel Colleton was absolutely stunned by the
fertility and volubility of the speaker, and after
listening for some time longer, as long as it was
possible to procure from him any thing which
might be of service, he took his departure, bending
his way next to the wigwam, in which, for the
Vol. II.S
time being, the pedler had taken up his abode. It
will not be necessary that we should go with him
there, as it is not probable that any thing materially
serving his purpose or ours will be adduced from
the narrative of Bunce. In the mean time, we will
turn our attention to a personage, whose progress
must correspond in all respects with that of our
narrative.
Guy Rivers had not been unapprized of the
presence
of the late comers at the village. He had
his agents at work, who marked the progress of
things, and conveyed their intelligence to him with
no qualified fidelity. The arrival of Colonel
Colleton
and his daughter had been made known to
him within a few hours after its occurrence, and the
feelings of the outlaw were of a nature the most
complex and contradictory. Secure within his
den, the intricacies of which were scarcely known
to any but himself, he did not study to restrain
those emotions which had prompted him to so
much unjustifiable outrage. With no eye to mark
his actions or to note his speech, the guardian
watchfulness which had secreted so much, in his
association with others, was taken off, and we see
much of that heart and those wild principles of its
government, the mysteries of which were painful
to behold. Slowly, and for a long time after the
receipt of the above mentioned intelligence, he
strode up and down the narrow cell of his retreat;
all passions at sway and contending for the
mastery
sudden
action and incoherent utterance
occasionally diversifying the otherwise
monotonous
movements of his form. At one moment, he
would clench his hands with violence together,
while an angry malediction would escape through
his knitted teethat another, a demoniac smile of
triumph, and a fierce laugh of gratified malignity
would ring through the apartment, coming back
upon him in an echo, which would again restore
him to consciousness, and bring back the silence
so momentarily banished.
They are herethey have come to witness his
degradationto grace my triumphto feel it, and
understand my revenge. We will see if the proud
beauty knows me nowif she yet continues to
discard and to disdain me. I have her now upon
my own termsshe will not refuseI am sure of
herI shall conquer her proud heartI will lead
her in chainsthe heaviest chains of allthe
chains of a dreadful necessity. He must die else.
I will howl it in her ears with the voice of the wolf
I will paint it before her eyes with a finger dipt
in blood and in darkness. She shall see him
carried
to the gallowsI shall make her note the
halter about his neckthat neck, which, in her
young thought, her arms were to have encircled
onlynor shall she shut her eyes upon the last
scenenor close her ears to the last groan of my
victim. She shall see and hear all, or comply
with all that I demand. It must be donebut
how? How shall I see herhow obtain her
presence
how
command her attention. Pshaw! shall
a few beardless soldiers keep me back, and baffle
me in this? Shall I dread the shadow now, and
shrink back when the sun shines out that makes it?
I will not fear. I will see herI will bid defiance
to them all. She shall know my power, and upon
one condition only will I use it to save him. She
will not dare to refuse the conditionshe will
consent
she
will at last be mineand for this I will
do so muchgo so faray, save him whom I
would yet be so delighted to destroy.
Night came, and in a small apartment of one of
the lowliest dwellings of Chestatee, Edith and her
father sat in the deepest melancholy, conjuring up
perpetually, in their minds, those images of sorrow
so necessarily the concomitants of their present
situation. It was somewhat late, and they had just
returned from an evening visit to the dungeon of
Ralph Colleton. The mind of the youth was in
far better condition than theirs, and his chief
employ
had been in preparing them for a similar
feeling
of resignation with himself. He had
succeeded
but indifferently. They strove to appear
firm, that he should not be less so than they found
him; but the effort was very perceptible, and the
recoil of their dammed-up emotions was only
so much more fearful and overpowering. The
strength of Edith had been severely tried, and her
head now rested upon the bosom of her father,
whose arms were required for her support, in a
state of feebleness and exhaustion, leaving it
doubtful
,
at moments, whether the vital principle had not
itself utterly departed. At this period the door
opened, and a stranger stood abruptly before them.
His manner was sufficiently imposing, though his
dress was that of the wandering countryman
savouring of the jockey, and not much unlike that
frequently worn by such wayfarers as the
stage-driver
and carrier of the mails. He had on an
overcoat, made of buckskinan article of the
Indian
habita deep fringe of the same material
hung suspended from two heavy capes that
depended
from the shoulder. His pantaloons were
formed of the same materiala fox-skin cap rested
slightly upon his head, rather more upon one side
than the other; while a whip of huge dimensions
occupied one of his hands. Whiskers, of a bushy
form and most luxuriant growth, half-obscured his
cheek, and the moustaches were sufficiently small
to lead to the inference that the wearer had only
recently determined upon the benefit of their
association
.
A black silk handkerchief, wrapped
loosely about his neck, completed the general
outline
;
and the
tout ensemble
indicated one of those
dashing blades, so frequently to be encountered in
the southern country, who, despising the humdrum
monotony of regular life, are ready for adventure
lads of the turfthe muster-groundthe general
affraythe men who can whip their weight in
wild-cats
whose
general rule it is to knock down and
drag out. Though startling at first to both father
and daughter, the manner of the intruder was such
as to forbid any further alarm than was incidental to
his first abrupt appearance. His conduct was
respectful
and distantclosely observant in the
proprieties
of his address, and so studiously guarded, as
to satisfy them, at the very outset, that nothing
improper
was intended. Still, his entrance without
any intimation was sufficiently objectionable to
occasion
a hasty demand from Colonel Colleton, as to
the meaning of his intrusion.
None, sir, is intended, which may not be atoned
for, was the reply. I had reason to believe,
Colonel Colleton, that the present melancholy
circumstances
of your family were such as might
operate
to the excuse of an intrusion, which may have
the effect of making them less sowhich, indeed,
may go far towards the prevention of that painful
event which you now contemplate as certain.
The words were electrical in their effect upon
both father and daughter. The former rose from
his chair, and motioned the stranger to be seated,
while the daughter, rapidly rising, with an
emotion
which gave new life to her form, inquired,
breathlessly
Speak, sir, sayhow!and she lingered and
listened with figure bent sensibly forward, and
S 2
hand uplifted and motionless, for reply. The
person
addressed smiled with visible effort, while
slight shades of gloom, like the thin clouds fleeting
over the sky at noonday, obscured at intervals the
otherwise subdued and even expression of his
countenance. He looked at the maiden while
speaking, but his words were addressed to her
father.
I need not tell you, sir, that the hopes of your
nephew are gonethere is no single chance upon
which he can rest a doubt whereby his safety may
be secured. The doom is pronouncedthe day is
assignedand the executioner is ready.
Is your purpose insult, sir, that you tell us this?
was the rather fierce inquiry of the colonel.
Calmly, sir,was the response, in a manner
corresponding well with the nature of his words
my purpose, I have already said, is to bring, or at
least to offer, reliefto indicate a course which
may eventuate in the safety of the young man
whose life is now at hazard; and to contribute
myself
to the object which I propose.
Go ongo on, sir, if you pleasebut spare all
unnecessary reference to his situation, said the
colonel, as a significant pressure of his arm by his
daughter motioned him to patience. The stranger
proceeded:
My object in dwelling upon the youth's
situation
was, if possible, by showing its utter
hopelessness
in every other respect, to induce you the more
willingly to hear what I had to offer, and to
comply
with certain conditions which must be
preparatory
to any development upon my part.
There is something strangely mysterious in
this. I am willing to do any thing and every thing,
in reason and without dishonour, for the safety of
my nephewthe more particularly as I believe
him altogether innocent of the crime laid to his
charge. More than this I dare not; and I shall not
be willing to yield to unknown conditions,
prescribed
by a stranger, whatever be the object; but
speak out at once, sir, and keep us no longer in
suspense. In the mean time, retire, Edith, my
childwe shall best transact this business in your
absence. You will feel too acutely the
consideration
of this subject to listen to it in discussion. Go,
my daughter.
But the stranger interposed, with a manner not
to be questioned:
Let her remain, Colonel Colletonit is, indeed,
only to her that I can reveal the mode and the
conditions of the assistance which I am to offer.
This was the preliminary condition of which I
spoke. To her alone can my secret be revealed
and my conference must be entirely with her.
But, sirthis is so strangeso unusualso
improper.
True, Colonel Colletonin the ordinary
concerns
,
the every-day offices of society, it would be
strange, unusual, and improper; but these are not
times, and this is not a region of the world, in which
the common forms are to be insisted upon. You
forget
,
sir, that you are in the wild abiding-place of men
scarcely less wildwith natures as stubborn as the
rocks, and with manners as uncouth and rugged as
the woodland growth which surrounds us. I know
as well as yourself, that my demand is unusual, but
such is my situationsuch, indeed, the necessities
of the whole case, that there is no alternative. I
am persuaded that your nephew can be savedI
am willing to make an effort for that purpose, and
my conditions are to be complied withone of them
you have heardit is for your daughter to hear the
rest.
The colonel still hesitated. He was very
tenacious
of those forms of society, and of intercourse
between the sexes, which are rigidly insisted upon
in the south, and his reluctance was manifest
while he yet hesitated, the stranger again spoke.
The condition which I have proposed, sir, is
unavoidable, but I ask you not to remove from
hearingthe adjoining room is not so remote, but
that you can hear any application which your
daughter may be pleased to make. My own
security
depends, not less than that of your nephew,
upon your compliance, if I undertake to save him.
These suggestions prevailed. Suspecting the
stranger to be one whose evidence would point to
the true criminal, himself an offender, he at length
assented to the arrangement, and after a few
minutes further dialogue he left the room. As he
retired, the stranger carefully locked the door, a
movement which somewhat alarmed the maiden,
but the respectful manner with which he approached
her, and her own curiosity, not less than interest in
the progress of the event, kept her from the
exhibition
of any apprehensions. The stranger now
approached her. His glances, though still
respectful
,
were long and searching upon her face. He
seemed to study all its features, comparing them,
as it would seem, with his own memories upon the
subject. At length, as with a sense of maidenly
propriety she turned sternly away, he addressed
her
Miss Colleton has forgotten me, it appears,
though I have some claim to be an old
acquaintance
.
I, at least, have a better memory for my
friendsI have not forgotten her.
Edith looked upon him in astonishment, but there
was no recognition in her glance. A feeling of
mortified pride might have been detected in the
expression of his countenance, as with a tone of
calm unconsciousness, she replied
You are certainly unremembered, if ever
known, by me, sir. I am truly sorry to have
forgotten
one who styles himself my friend.
Who waswho isor rather, who is now
willing
again to be your friend, Miss Colletonwas
the immediate reply.
Yes, and so I will gladly call you, sir, if you
succeed in what you have promised.
I have yet promised nothing, Miss Colleton.
True, true! but you say you have the power,
and surely would not withhold it in such a time.
Oh, speak, sirtell me how you can serve us all
and receive my blessings and my thanks for ever.
The reward is greatvery greatbut not
greaterperhaps not as great, as I may demand
for my services. But we should not be ignorant
of one another in such an affairat such a time as
this. Is it true, then, that Miss Colleton has no
memory which, at this moment, may spare me from
the utterance of a name, which perhaps she herself
would not be altogether willing to hear, and which
it is not my policy to have uttered by any lips, and
far less by my own. Thinkrememberlady,
and let me be silent still on that one subject. Let
no feeling of pride influence the rejection of a
remembrance
which perhaps carries with it but few
pleasant reflections.
Again were the maiden's eyes fixed searchingly
upon the speaker, and again, conflicting with the
searching character of his own glance, were they
withdrawn, under the direction of a high sense of
modest dignity. She had made the effort at
recognition
that
was evidenteven to him, and had
made it in vain.
Entirely forgottenwell! better that than to
have been remembered as the thing I was. Would
it were possible to be equally forgotten by the rest
but this too is in vain and childish. She must
be taught to remember me.
Thus muttered the stranger to himself;
assuming
,
however, an increased decision of manner at
the conclusion, he approached her, and tearing
from his cheeks the huge whiskers that had
half-obscured
them, he spoke in hurried accents:
Look on me now, Miss Colletonlook on me
now, and while you gaze upon features once
sufficiently
well known to your glance, let your
memory
but retrace the few years when it was your
fortune, and my fate, to spend a few months in
Gwinnett county. Do you remember the time
do you remember that bold, ambitious man, who
at that time was the claimant for a public honour
who was distinguished by you in a dance, at the
ball given on that occasionwho, maddened by
wine, and a fierce passion which preyed upon him
then, like a consuming fire, addressed you, though a
mere child, and sought you for his bride, whobut
I see you remember all!
And are you then CreightonMr. Edward
Creightonand so changed? And she looked
upon him with an expression of simple wonder.
Ay, that was the name oncebut I have
another
now. Would you know me betterI am
Guy Rivers, where the name of Creighton must
not again be spoken. It is the name of a felon
of one under doom of outlawry, whom all men are
privileged to slay. I have been hunted from
society
I
can no longer herd with my fellowsI
am without kindred, and am almost without kind.
Yet, base and black with crimedoomed by
mankind
banished
all human abodesthe slave of
fierce passionsthe leagued with foul associates, I
dared, in your girlhood, to love you; and, more
daring still, I dare to love you now. Fear not,
ladyyou are Edith Colleton to me; and
worthless
,
and vile, and reckless though I have become,
for you I can hold no thought which would behold
you other than you area creature for worship
rather than for love. As such I would have you
still; and for this purpose do I seek you now. I
know your feeling for this young manI saw it
then, when you repulsed me. I saw that you loved
each other, though neither of you were conscious
of the truth. You love him nowyou would not
have him perishI know well how you regard
him, and I come, knowing this, to make hard
conditions
with you for his life.
Keep me no longer in suspensespeak out, Mr.
Creightonshe cried, gaspingly.
RiversRiversI would not hear the other
it was by that name I was driven from my
fellows.
Mr. Riverssay what can be donewhat am
I to domoneythanks, all that we can give shall
be yours, so that you save him from this fate.
And who would speak thus for me? What
fair pleader, fearless of man's opinionthat blights
or blesses, without reference to right or merit
would so far speak for me!
Manymany, Mr. Rivers,I hope there are
many. Heaven knows, though I may have slighted,
in my younger days, your attentions, I know not
many for whom I would more willingly plead and
pray than yourself. I do remember now your
talents and high reputation, and deeply do I regret
the unhappy fortune which has denied them their
fulfilment.
Ah, Edith Colletonthese words would have
saved me oncenow they are nothing, in
recompense
for the hopes which are for ever gone. Your
thoughts are gentle, and may sooth all spirits but
my own. But sounds that lull others, lull me no
longer. It is not the music of a rich dream, or of
a pleasant fancy, which may beguile me into
pleasure
.
I am deaddead as the cold rockto their
influence. The storm which blighted me had
seared, and ate into the very core. I am like the
tree through which the worm has travelledit still
stands, and there is foliage upon it, but the heart is
eaten out and gone. Your words touch me no
longer as they didI need something more than
words and mere flatteriesflatteries so sweet even
as those which come from your lipsare no longer
powerful to bind me to your service. I can save
the youthI will save him, though I hate him; but
the conditions are fatal to your love for him.
I can listenI can hear all that you may say
having reference to him. You have said truly my
feelings on the subject; and, sir, your own passion,
if without offence I may refer to it now, will truly
account for my anxiety to do him service. I know
not what you may intend; I know not what you
may demand for your service. All in honourall
that a maiden may grant and be true to herself,
allall, for his life and safety.
Still, I fear me, Miss Colletonyour love for
him is not sufficiently lavish to enable your
liberality
to keep pace with the extravagance of my
demand
Hold, siron this particular there is no need
of further speech. Whatever may be the extent of
my regard for Ralph, it is enough that I am willing
to do much, to sacrificeto give muchin return
for his rescue from this dreadful fate. Speak,
therefore
,
your demandspare no worddelay me, I
pray, no longer.
Hear me then: As Creighton, I loved you
years agoas Guy Rivers I love you still. The
life of Ralph Colleton is forfeitfor ever forfeit
and a few days only interpose between him and
eternity. I alone can save himI can give him
freedom; and, in doing so, I shall risk much, and
sacrifice not a little. I am ready for this riskI
am prepared for every sacrificeI will save him
at all hazards from his doom, upon one condition!
Speak! speak!
That you be minethat you fly with methat
in the wild regions of the west, where I will build
you a cottage, and worship you as my own forest
divinity, you take up your abode with me, and be
my wife. My wifeall forms shall be complied
with, and every ceremony which society may call
for. Nay, shrink not back thus seeing her
recoil
in horror not less than reproach at his
suggestion
beware
how you defy methink, that
I have his life in my handsthink, that I can speak
his doom or his safetythink, before you reply!
There is no time necessary for thought, sir
nonenone. It cannot be. I cannot comply with
the conditions which you propose. I would die
first.
And he will die tooBe not hasty, Miss
Colleton
rememberit
is not merely your death but
hishis death upon the gallows
Spare me! spare me!
The halterthe crowdthe distorted limb
the racked frame
Horriblehorrible!
Would you see thisknow this, and reflect
upon the shame, the mental agony, far greater
than all, of such a death to him?
With a strong effort, she recovered her
composure
,
though but an instant before almost
convulsed
Vol. II.T
Have you no other terms, Mr. Rivers?
Nonenone. Accept them, and he livesI
will free him, as I promise. Refuse themdeny
me, and he must die, and nothing may save him
then.
Then he must diewe must both diebefore
we choose such terms. Sir, let me call my father.
Our conference must end here. You have chosen
a cruel office, but I can bear your infliction. You
have tantalized a weak heart with hope, only to
make it despair the more. But I am now strong,
sirstronger than everand we speak no more on
this subject.
Yet pauseto relent even to-morrow may be
too late. To-night you must determine or never.
I have already determinedI cannot change
in this.
There is one, ladyone young formscarcely
less beautiful than yourself, who would make the
sameay, and a far greatersacrifice than this,
for the safety of Ralph Colleton. One far less
happy in his love than you, who would willingly die
for him this hour. Would you be less ready than
her for such a sacrifice?
No, not less ready for deathas I livenot
less willing to free him with the loss of my own
life. But not ready for a sacrifice like thisnot
ready for this.
You have doomed him!
Be it so, sir. Be it so. Let me now call my
father.
Yet think, ere it be too lateonce gone, not
even your words shall call me back.
Believe me, I shall not desire it.
The firmness of the maiden was finely
contrasted
with the disappointment of the outlaw. He
was not less mortified with his own defeat than
with the calm and immoveable bearing, the sweet,
even dignity, which the discussion of a subject so
trying to her heart, and the overthrow of all hope
which her own decision must have occasioned, had
failed utterly to affect. He would have renewed
his suggestions, but while repeating them, a sudden
commotion in the villagethe trampling of feet
the buzz of many voices, and sounds of
wide-spread
confusion, contributed to abridge an
interview
already quite too long. The outlaw rushed
out of the apartment, barely recognising, at his
departure, the presence of Colonel Colleton, whom
his daughter had now called in. The cause of the
uproar we reserve for another chapter.
CHAPTER XVII.
Will you stand by me, nobly as a man,
And strike if there be need, nor wince and turn,
Undoing what we aim at? Scruple not
There's gold to win you, if so be you lack
A better thought to serve us.
The
pledge which Munro had given to his niece
in behalf of Colleton was productive of no small
inconvenience to the former personage. Though
himself unwilling, we must do him the justice to
believe, that the youth should perish for a crime so
completely his own, he had in him no great deal
of that tenacious conscientiousness, of itself
sufficiently
strong to have persuaded him to such a
risk, as that he had undertaken at the supplication
of Lucy. The more he reflected upon the matter,
the more trifling seemed the consideration. Money,
nowthe spoil or the steed of the travellerwould
have been a far more decided stimulant to action.
In regarding such an object, he certainly would
have overlooked much of the danger, and have
been less regardful of the consequences. The
selfishness of the motive would not merely have
sanctioned, but have smoothed the enterprise; and
he thought too much with the majorityallowing
for any lurking ambition in his mindnot to
perceive
that where there is gain, there must be glory.
None of these consolatory thoughts came to him
in the contemplation of his present purpose. To
adventure his own lifeperhaps to exchange
places with the condemned he proposed to save
though, in such a risk, he only sought to rescue the
innocent from the doom justly due to himself
was a flight of generous impulse somewhat above
the usual aim of the landlord;and, but for the
impelling influence of his niecean influence
which, in spite of his own evil habits, swayed him
beyond his consciousnesswe should not now
have to record the almost redeeming instance in
the events of his life at this periodthe one virtue,
contrasting with, if it could not lessen or relieve,
the long tissue of his offences.
There were some few other influences, however
if this were not enoughcoupled with that of his
niece's entreaty, which gave strength and decision
to his present determination. Munro was not
insensible
to the force of superior character, and a
large feeling of veneration led him, from the
first, to observe the lofty spirit and high sense of
honour which distinguished the bearing and
deportment
of Ralph Colleton. He could not but
admire the native superiority which characterized
the manner of the youth, particularly when brought
into contrast with that of Guy Rivers, for whom
the same feeling had induced a like, though not a
parallel respect, on the part of the landlord. It
may appear strange to those accustomed only to a
passing and superficial estimate of the thousand
inconsistencies which make up that contradictory
creation, the human mind, that such should be a
feature in the character of a ruffian like Munro;
but, to those who examine for themselves, we shall
utter nothing novel when we assert, that a respect
for superiority of mental and even mere moral
attribute, enters largely into the habit of the ruffian
generally. The murderer is not unfrequently
found to possess benevolence as well as veneration
in a high degree; and the zealots of all
countries
and religions are almost invariably creatures
of strong and violent passions, to which the
extravagance
of their zeal and devotion furnishes an
outlet, which is not always innocent in its
direction
or effects. Thus, in their enthusiasmwhich
is only a minor madnesswhether the Eastern
brahmin or the Spanish bigot, the English
round-head
or the follower of the only true faith at
Mecca, be understood, it is but a word and a blow
though the word be a hurried prayer to the God
of their adoration, and the blow be aimed with all
the malevolence of hell at the bosom of a
fellow-creature
.
There is no greater inconsistency in the
one character than in the other. The temperament
which, under false tuition, makes the zealot, and
drives him on to the perpetration of wholesale
murder
,
while uttering a prayer to the Deity, prompts
the same individual who, as an assassin or a
high-wayman
,
cuts your throat, and picks your pocket,
and at the next moment bestows his ill-gotten gains
without reservation upon the starving beggar by
the wayside.
There was yet another reason which swayed
Munro not a little in his determination, if possible,
T 2
to save the youthand this was a lurking
sentiment
of hostility to Rivers. His pride, of late, on
many occasions, had taken alarm at the frequent
encroachments of his comrade upon its
boundaries
.
The too much repeated display of that very
mental superiority in his companion, which had so
much fettered him, had aroused his own latent
sense of independence; and the utterance of
sundry
pungent rebukes on the part of Rivers had
done much towards provoking within him a new
sentiment of dislike for that person, which gladly
availed itself of the first legitimate occasion for
exercise and development. The very superiority
which commanded, and which he honoured, he
hated for that very reason; and, in our analysis of
moral dependency, we may add, that, in Greece,
and the mere Hob of the humble farm-house, Munro
might have been the countryman to vote Aristides
into banishment because of his reputation for
justice
.
The barrier is slight, the space short, the
transition easy, from one to the other extreme of
injustice; and the peasant who voted for the
banishment
of the just man, in another sphere and under
other circumstances, would have been a Borgia or
a Catiline. With this feeling in his bosom, Munro
was yet unapprized of its existence. It is not with
the man, so long hurried forward by his impulses
as at last to become their creature, to analyze
either their character or his own. Vice, though
itself a monster, is yet the slave of a thousand
influences
,
not vicious in themselves; and their
desires it not uncommonly performs when
blind-folded
.
It carries the knife, it strikes the blow, but
is not always the chooser of its own victim.
But, fortunately for Ralph Colleton, whatever
and how many or how few were the impelling
motives leading to this determination, Munro had
decided upon the preservation of his life; and,
with that energy of habit, which, in a rash office,
or one violative of the laws, he had always
heretofore
displayed, he permitted no time to escape
him unemployed for the contemplated purpose.
His mind immediately addressed itself to its
chosen duty, and, in one disguise or another, and
those perpetually changing, he perambulated the
village, making his arrangements for the desired
object. The difficulties in his way were not trifling
in character nor few in number; and the greatest
of these was that of finding coadjutors willing to
second him. He felt assured that he could
confide
in none of their well-known associates, who
were to a man the creatures of Rivers; that
outlaw
,
by a liberality which seemed to disdain money,
and yielding every form of indulgence, having
acquired
over them an influence almost amounting to
personal affection. Fortunately for his purpose,
Rivers dared not venture much into the village or
its neighbourhood; therefore, though free from
any fear of obstruction from one in whose despite
his whole design was undertaken, Munro was yet
not a little at a loss for his co-operation. To whom,
at that moment, could he turn, without putting
himself
in the power of an enemy? Thought only
raised up new difficulties in his way, and in utter
despair of any better alternative, though scarcely
willing to trust to one of whom he thought so
lightly, his eyes were compelled to rest, in the last
hope, upon the person of the pedler, Bunce.
Bunce, if the reader will remember, had, upon
his release from prison, taken up his abode
temporarily
in the village. Under the protection now
afforded by the presence of the judge, and the
other officers of justicenot to speak of the many
strangers from the adjacent parts, whom one cause
or another had brought to the placehe had
presumed
to exhibit his person with much more
audacity
and a more perfect freedom from
apprehension
than had ever formed a part of his spirit
and character before. He nowfor ever on the go
thrust himself fearlessly into every cot and corner.
No place escaped the searching analysis of his
glance; and, in a scrutiny so nice, it was not long
before
he had made the acquaintance of every body and
every thing at all worthy, in that region, to be known.
He could now venture to jostle Pippin with
impunity
;
for, since the trial in which he had so much
blundered, the lawyer had lost no small portion of
the confidence and esteem of his neighbours.
Accused
of the abandonment of his clientan offence
particularly monstrous in the estimation of those
who are sufficiently interested to acquire a personal
feeling in such matters,and compelled, as he had
beena worse feature still in the estimation of the
same classto eat his own wordshe had lost
caste prodigiously in the last few days, and his fine
sayings ceased to own a flavour in the estimation of
his neighbours. His speeches sunk below par along
with himself; and the pedler, in his contumelious
treatment of the disconsolate jurist, simply obeyed
and indicated the direction of the popular opinion.
One or two rude replies, and a nudge which the
elbow of Bunce effected in the ribs of the lawyer,
did provoke the latter so far as to repeat his threat
on the subject of the prosecution for the horse, but
the pedler snapped his fingers in his face as he did
so, and bade him defiance. He also reminded
Pippin of the certain malfeasances to which he
had referred previously, and the consciousness of
the truth was sufficiently strong and awkward to
prevent his proceeding to any further measure of
disquiet with the pedler. Thus, without fear, and
with an audacity of which he was not a little proud,
Bunce perambulated the village and its
neighbourhood
,
in a mood and with a deportment he had
never ventured upon before in that quarter.
He had a variety of reasons for lingering in the
village seemingly in a state of idleness. Bunce
was a long-sighted fellow, and beheld the promise
which it held forth, at a distance, of a large and
thriving business in the neighbourhood, and he had
too much sagacity not to be perfectly aware of the
advantage, to a tradesman, resulting from a priority
of ground. He had not lost every thing in the
conflagration which destroyed his cart-body and
calicoes; for, apart from sundry little debts due
him in the surrounding country, he had carefully
preserved around his body, in a black silk
handkerchief
,
a small wallet, holding a moderate amount of
the best papernone of the issue of the small
banks with a specie capital of
thirty-seven and a half
cents
in the vaults,
[1]
[1]
The newspapers some time ago related such an instance;
doubtless somewhat exaggerated, but, it is to be fearedsuch is
the propensity to gambling in our country,not much wide of
the mark.
and a gross circulation in
gorgeously
printed notes of two hundred thousand
dollars. NoBunce, among other things, had
soon learned to discriminate between good and
bad paper, and the result of his education in this
respect assured him of the perfect integrity of the
three hundred and odd dollars which kept
themselves
snugly about his middleready to be
expended for clocks and calicoes, horn buttons
and wooden combs, knives and negro-handkerchiefs,
whenever their proprietor should determine upon a
proper whereabouts in which to fix himself. Bunce
had grown tired of peddlingthe trade was not
less uncertain than fatiguing. Besides, travelling
so much among the southrons, he had imbibed not
a few of their prejudices against his vocation, and,
to speak the truth, had grown somewhat ashamed
of his present mode of life. He was becoming
rapidly aristocratic, as we may infer from a very
paternal and somewhat patronizing epistle, which
he despatched about this time to his elder brother
and co-partner, Ichabod Bunce, who carried on
his portion of the business at their native place in
Meriden, Connecticut. He told him, in a manner
and vein not less lofty than surprising to his
coadjutor
,
that it would not be the thing, no how, to
keep along, lock and lock with him, in the same
gears. It was henceforward his idee to drive
on his own hook. Times warn't as they used to
be; and the fact washe did not say it in so many
wordsthat the firm of Ichabod Bunce and
Brother
,
was scarcely so creditable to the latter
personage
as he should altogether desire among his
southern friends and acquaintances. He guessed,
therefore, best haul off, and eachhere Bunce
showed his respect for his new friends by quoting
their phraseologymust paddle his own canoe.
We have minced this epistle, and have contented
ourselves with providing a scrap, here and there, to
the readerdespairing, as we utterly do, to gather
from memory a full description of a performance
so perfectly unique in its singular compound of
lofty vein, with the patois and vulgar contractions
of his native, and those common to his adopted
country. It proved to his more staid and veteran
brother, that Jared was the only one of his family
likely to get above his bread and business; but
while he lamented over the wanderings and follies
of his brother, he could not help enjoying a
sentiment
of pride as he looked more closely into the
matter. Who knows, thought the clock-maker to
himself, but that Jared, who is a monstrous sly
fellow, will pick up some southern heiress, with a
thousand blackiesand a hundred acres of prime
cotton land to each, and thus ennoble the blood of
the Bunces by a rapid ascent, through the various
grades of office in a sovereign state, until a seat in
congressin the administration itselfreceives
him:and Ichabod grew more than ever pleased
and satisfied with the idea, when he reflected that
Jared had all along been held to possess a goodly
person, and a very fair development of the parts
of speech.
Whether the individual of whom so much was
expected, himself entertained any such
anticipations
or ideas, we do not pretend to say; but, certain
it is, that the southern candidate for the popular
suffrage could never have taken more pains to
extend
his acquaintance or to ingratiate himself
among the people, than did our worthy friend the
pedler. In the brief time which he had passed in
the village after the arrest of Colleton, he had
contrived
to have something to say or do with almost
everybody in it. He had found a word for his
honour the judge, and having once spoken with that
dignitary Bunce was not the man to fail at future
recognition. No distance of manner, no cheerless
response, to the modestly urged or moderate
suggestion
,
could prompt him to forego an
acquaintance
.
With the jurors he had contrived to enjoy
a sup of whiskey at the tavern bar-room, and had
actually, and with a manner the most adroit, gone
deeply into the distribution of an entire packet of
steel pens, one of which he accommodated to a
reed, and to the fingers of each of the worthy twelve,
who made the panel on that occasiontaking care,
however, to assure them of the value of the gift,
by saying, that if he were to sell the article,
twenty-five cents each would be his lowest price,
and that he could scarcely save himself at that.
But this was not all. Having seriously determined
upon abiding at the south, he adventured upon some
few of the practices prevailing in that region, and on
more than one occasion, a gallon of whiskey had
circulated `free gratis,' and
pro bono publico
, at the
cost of our worthy tradesman. These things, it
may not be necessary to say, had elevated that
worthy into no moderate importance among those
around him; and, that he himself was not altogether
unconscious of the change, it may be remarked
that an ugly
kink
, or double in his backthe
consequence
of his pack and past humilityhad gone
down wonderfully, keeping due pace in its descent
with the progress of present manifestations.
Such was the somewhat novel position of
Bunce, in the village and neighbourhood of
Chestatee
,
when the absolute necessity of the case
prompted Munro's application to him for
assistance
in the proposed extrication of Ralph
Colleton
.
The landlord had not been insensible to
the interest which the pedler had taken in the
youth's fortune, and not doubting his perfect
sympathy
with the design in view, he felt the fewer
scruples in approaching him for the purpose.
Putting
on, therefore, the disguise, which, as an old
woman, had effectually concealed his true person
from Bunce on a previous occasion, he waited until
evening had set in fairly, and then proceeded to the
abode of him he sought. The pedler was alone
in his cottage, discussing, most probably, his future
designs, and calculating to a nicety the various
profits of each premeditated branch of his future
business. Munro's disguise was intended rather to
facilitate his progress without detection through the
village, than to impose upon the pedler merely;
but it was not unwise that he should be ignorant
also of the person with whom he dealt. Affecting
a tone of voice, therefore, which, however
masculine
,
was yet totally unlike his own, the landlord
demanded a private interview, which was readily
granted, though, as the circumstance was really
strange, with some few signs of trepidation. Bunce
was no lover of old women, nor, indeed, of young
ones either. He was habitually and
constitutionally
cold and impenetrable on the subject of all
passions save that of trade, and would rather have
sold a dress of calico than have kissed the
prettiest
damsel in creation. His manner, to the old
woman who appeared before him, seemed that of
one who had an uncomfortable suspicion of having
pleased rather more than he intended; and it was
no small relief, therefore, the first salutation being
over, when the masculine tones reassured him.
Munro, without much circumlocution, immediately
proceeded to ask whether he was willing to lend a
hand for the help of Colleton, and to save him
from the gallows.
Colletonsave Master Colletondo tellis
that what you mean?
It isare you the man to help your friend
will you make one along with others who are going
to try for it.
Well, nowdon't be rashgive a body time
to consider. It's so strange and the pedler
showed himself bewildered by the sudden manner
in which the subject had been broached.
There's little time to be lost, Bunceif we
don't set to work at once, we needn't set to work
at all. Speak out, man! will you join usnow or
neverto save the young fellow?
With something like desperation in his manner,
as if he scrupled to commit himself too far, yet had
Vol. II.U
the will to contribute considerably to the object,
the pedler replied:
Save the young fellowwell, I guess I will
but what's to be doneI'll lend a hand, to be
sure, if there's no trouble to come of it. He's
now somehow a likely chap, and not so stiff
neither
,
though I did count him rather high-headed at
first. But after that, he sort a smoothed down, and
now I don't know nobody I'd sooner help jest now
out of the slush; but I can't see how we're to set
about it.
Can you fight, Bunceare you willing to
knock down and drag out, when there's need
for it?
Why, if I was fairly listed, and if so be there's
no law agin it. I don't like to run agin the law,
no how, and if you could get a body clear on it,
whyand there's no way to do the thing no other
howI guess I shouldn't stand too long to consider
when it's to help a friend.
It may be no child's play, Bunce, and there
must be stout heart and free hand. One mustn't
stop for trifles in such casesand as for the law
when a man's friend's in danger he must make his
own law.
That wasn't my edication, no how said the
pedler, as he paused to consider. The landlord
saw no necessity for consideration, and fearful that
the scruples of Bunce would be something too
strong, he proceeded to smooth away the
difficulty
.
After all, Bunce, the probability is, we shall be
able to manage the affair without violence; so we
shall try, for I like blows just as little as anybody
elsebut it's best, you know, to make ready for the
worstnobody knows how things will turn up,
and if it comes to the scratch, why one musn't
mind knocking a fellow on the head if he stands in
the way.
No, to be sure nottwould be foolish to stop
and think and be knocked down yourself
Certainly, you're right, Bunce; that's only
reason.
And yet, misterI guess you wouldn't want
that I should know your raal name, now, would
youor maybe you're going to tell it to me now
well
To the businesswhat matters it whether I
have a name or not. I have a fist, you see, and
Yes, yes, I see exclaimed he of the notions,
rapidly retreating, as Munro, suiting the action to
the word, thrust rather more closely to the face of
his companion than was altogether encouraging
the ponderous mass which courtesy alone would
consider a fist
Well, I don't care, you see, to know the name,
mister, but somehow it raally aint the thing, no
how, to be mistering nobody knows who. I see
you aint a woman plain enough from your face,
and I pretty much conclude you must be a man
though you have got onwhat's that now?It's a
kind of calico, I guess; but them's not fast colours,
friend. I should say, now, you had been taken in
pretty much by that bit of goods. It aint the kind
of print, now, that's not afeared of washing.
And if I have been taken in, Bunce, in these
calicoes, you're the man that has done it said
the landlord, laughingthis piece was sold by you
into my own hands, last March was a year, when
you came back from the Cherokees.
Now, don't. Well, I guess there must be some
mistakeyou aint sure, now, friendmight be
some other dealer that you bought from?
None other than yourself, Bunce. You are
the man, and I can bring a dozen to prove it on
you.
Well, I 'spose what you say's true, and that
jest lets me know how to mister you now, 'cause,
you see, I do recollect now all about who I sold to
that season.
The landlord had been overreached; and,
amused with the ingenuity of the trader, he
contented
himself with again lifting the huge fist in a
threatening manner, though the smile which
accompanied
the action fairly deprived it of its terrors.
Wellwell, said the landlordwe burn
daylight in such talk as thisI come to you as the
only man who will or can help me in this matter,
and Lucy Munro tells me you willyou made her
some such promise.
Well, now, I guess I must toe the chalk, after
allthough, to say truth, I don't altogether
remember
any such promise. It must be right though, if
she says it; and sartain she's a sweet bodyI'll go
my length for her any day.
You'll not lose by it; and now hear my plan.
You know Brooks, the jailer, and his bull-dog
brother-in-law
,
Tongs? I saw you talking with both
of them yesterday.
Guess you're right. Late acquaintance though
they aint neither on 'em to my liking.
Enough for our purpose. Tongs is a brute
who will drink as long as he can stand, and some
time after it. Brooks is rather shy of it, but he
will drink enough to stagger him, for he is pretty
weak-headed. We have only to manage these
fellows, and there's the end of it. They keep the
jail.
Yes, I know; but you don't count young
Brooks?
Oh, he's a mere boy. Don't matter about him.
He's easily managed. Now hear to my design.
Provide your jug of whiskey, with plenty of eggs
and sugar, so that they shan't want any thing, and
get them here. Send for Tongs at once, and let
him once know what's in the wind, then ask
Brooks, and he will be sure to force him to come.
Say nothing of the boylet him stay or come as
they think proper. To ask all might make them
suspicious. When here, ply them well, and then
we shall go on according to circumstances. Brooks
carries the keys along with himget him once in
for it, and I'll take them from him. If he resists or
any of them
Knock 'em down?
Ay, quick as you say it.
Well, but how if they do not bring the boy,
and they leave him in the jail?
What then! Can't we knock him down too?
But, then, they'll fix the whole business on my
head. Won't Brooks and Tongs say where they
got drunk, and then shan't I be in a scant fixin'?
They dare not. They won't confess
themselves
drunkit's as much as their place is worth.
They will say nothing till they get sober, and then
they'll get up some story that will fly against
nobody.
But
But whatwill you never cease to but against
obstacles? Are you a manare you readybent
to do what you can? Speak out, and let me
know if I can depend on you exclaimed the
landlord, impatiently.
Now, don't be in a passionyou're as soon off
as a fly-machine, and a thought sooner. Why, didn't
I say now, I'd go my length for the young
gentleman
?
And I'm sure I'm ready, and aint at all
U 2
afeared, no how. I only did want to say, that if
the thing takes wind, as how it stood, it spiles all
my calkilations. I couldn't stablish a consarn here,
I guess, for a nation long spell of time after.
And what thenwhere's your calculations?
Get the young fellow clear, and what will his
friends do for you? Think of that, Bunce. You
go off to Carolina with him, and open store in his
parts, and he buys from you all he wantshis
negro clothshis calicoeshis domestics, and
stripes, and every thing. Then his family, and
friends and neighbours, under his recommendation
they all buy from you; and thenthe presents
they will make youthe fine horsesand who
knows but even a plantation and negroes may all
come out of this one transaction?
To be surewho knows. Wellthings do
look slick enough, and there's a mighty deal of
reason now in what you say. Large business that,
I guess, in the long run. Aint I ready?let's see
a gallon of whiskeyaint a gallon a heap too
much for only three people?
Better have ten than want. Then there must
be pipes, tobacco, segars; and mind, when they
get well on in drinking, I shall look to you through
that window. Be sure and come to me then.
Make some pretence, for as Brooks may be slow
and cautious, I shall get something to drop into
his liquora little mixture which I shall hand you.
What mixture! No pizon, I hope. I don't go
thatnot Ino pizoning for me.
Pshaw! fool,nonsense!if I wanted their
lives, could I not choose a shorter method, and a
weapon which I could more truly rely upon than
I ever can upon you? It is to make them sleep
that I shall give you the mixture.
Oh, laudnum. Well, now, why couldn't you
say laudnum at first, without frightening people so
with your mixtures. There's no harm in laudnum,
for my old aunt Tabitha chaws laudnum jest as
other folks chaws tobacco.
Well, that's allit's only to get them asleep
sooner. See now about your men at once. We
have no time to lose, and if this contrivance fails, I
must look about for another. It must be done
to-night
,
or it cannot be done at all. In an hour I
shall return; and hope, by that time, to find you
busy with their brains. Ply them welldon't be
slow or stingyand see that you have enough of
whiskeyhere's moneyhave every thing ready.
The pedler took the money, and Munro left him.
Bunce gave himself but little time and less trouble
for reflection. The prospects of fortune which the
landlord had magnified to his vision, were quite too
enticing to be easily resisted by one whose
morale
was none of the largest; and having provided
every thing, as agreed upon, necessary for their
accommodation, he sallied forth for the more
important
purpose of getting his company.
CHAPTER XVIII.
'Tis a joyous life we pass here in the woods,
And the world wrings us not. We sing and laugh,
And with the merry owl, the toper's bird,
We hoot dull night away.
The
task of getting the desired company was
by no means difficult, and our pedler was not long
in reporting progress. Tongs, a confirmed toper,
was easily persuaded to any thing that guaranteed
hard drinking. He luxuriated in the very idea of
a debauch. Brooks, his brother-in-law, was a
somewhat better and less pregnable person; but
he was a widower, had been a good deal with
Tongs, and, what with the accustomed loneliness
of the office which he held, and the gloomy
dwelling
in which it required he should live, he found
it not such an easy matter to resist the temptation
of social enjoyment, and all the pleasant associations
of that good-fellowship, which Bunce had taken
care to depict before the minds of both parties.
The attractions of Bunce himself, by-the-way,
tended, not less than the whiskey and segars, to
persuade the jailer, and to neutralize most of the
existing prejudices current among those around
him against his tribe. He had travelled much,
and was no random observer. He had seen a
great deal, as well of human nature as of places
could tell a good story, in good spirit, and was
endowed
with a dry, sneaking humour, that came out
unawares upon his hearers, and made them laugh
frequently in spite of themselves.
Bunce had been now sufficiently long in the
village
to enable those about him to come at a
knowledge
of his parts; and his accomplishments in
the several respects referred to, were by this
time generally well understood. The inducement
was sufficiently strong for the jailer; and, at
length, having secured the main entrance of the
jail carefully, he strapped the keys securely to a
leathern girdle, which he wore about him, lodging
them in the breast pocket of his coat, in a position
the most safe in his thought and according to his
previous experience, and prepared to go along with
his worthy brother-in-law. Nor was the younger
Brooks forgotten. Being a tall, good-looking lad of
sixteen, Tongs insisted it was high time he should
go among men; and the invitation of the pedler
was chosen, as a happy occasion for his initiation
into some of those practices, by a liberal courtesy
esteemed significant of manliness.
With every thing in proper trim, Bunce stood at
the entrance ready to receive them. The
preliminaries
were soon despatched, and we behold them
accordingly, all four, comfortably seated around a
huge oaken table in the centre of the apartment.
There was the jug, and there the glassesthe
sugar, the peppermint, the nutmegsthe pipes and
tobaccoall were convenient, and sufficiently
tempting for the unscrupulous. The pedler did
the honours with no little skill, and Tongs plunged
headforward into the debauch. The whiskey was
never better, and found, for this reason, any thing
but security where it stood. Glass after glass,
drank and replenished, attested the industrious
hospitality
of the host, not less than its own excellence.
Tongs, averaging three draughts to one of his
companions
,
was soon fairly under way in his
progress
to that state of mental self-glorification, in
which the world ceases to have vicissitudes, and
the animal realizes the abstractions of an ancient
philosophy, and denies all pain to life. Brooks,
however, though not averse to the overcoming
element
,
had more of that vulgar quality of prudence
than his brother, and far more than was thought
amiable in the consideration of the pedler. For some
time, therefore, he drank with measured
scrupulousness
,
and it was with no small degree of anxiety
that Bunce plied him with the bottlecomplaining
of his unsociableness, and watching, with the
intensity
of any other experimentalist, the progress
of his scheme upon him. As for the ladthe
younger Brooksit was soon evident, that, once
permitted, and even encouraged as he had been,
by his superiors to drink, he would not, after a
little while, give much, if any inconvenience to
the conspirators. The design of the pedler was
considerably advanced by Tongs, who, once
intoxicated
himself, was not slow in the endeavour
to bring all around him under the same influence.
Drink, Brooksdrink, old fellow he
exclaimed
as
you are a true man, drink, and don't
fight shy of the critter. Whiskey, my boyold
Monongahely like this, I saywhiskey is wife and
childrenhouse and horselands and niggers
liberty, and (hiccup) plenty to live on. Don't
you see how I drive a head, and don't care for the
hind wheels? It's all owing to whiskey. Grog, I
sayHark ye, Mr. Pedler, grog, I say, is the wheels
of lifeit carries a man
for'ad
. Why don't men
go
for'ad
in the world? What's the reason now?
I'll tell you. They're afeared. Well, now, who's
afeared when he's got a broadside of whiskey in
him. Nobodynobody's afeared but you,you,
Ben Brooks, you're a dd crickcrick,you're
always afeared of something, or nothingfor, after
all, whenever you're afeared of something, it turns
out to be nothing. All 'cause you don't drink like a
man. That's his cha-cha-
rack
-ter, Mr. Bunce
and it's all owing 'cause he won't drink.
Guess there's no sparing of reason in that bit of
argument, now, I tell you, Mr. Tongs. Bless my
heartit's no use of talking, no how, but I'd a been
clean done up, dead as a door nail, if it hadn't
been for drink. Strong drink makes strong.
Many's the time, and the freezing cold, and the
hard travelling in bad roads, and other dreadful
fixins I've seed, would soon ha' settled me up, if it
hadn't been for that same good stuff there, that
Master Brooks does look as if he was afeared on.
Now, don't be afeared, Master Brooks. There's
no teeth in whiskey, and it never bites nobody.
No, said Brooks, with the utmost simplicity
only when they take too much.
How? said the pedler, looking as if the
sentence
contained some mysterious meaning. Brooks
might have explained, but for Tongs, who dashed
in after this fashion:
And who takes too much?You don't mean to
say I takes too much, Ben BrooksI'd like to hear
the two legged critter, now, to say I takes more of
the stuff than does me goodI drinks in reason
for the benefit of my health; and jest, you see, as
a sort of medicine, Mr. Pedler; and, Brooks, you
knows I never takes a drop more than is needful.
Sometimessometimes Tongs, you know you
aint all together right under itnow and then you
take a little too much for your good was the
mild response of Brooks to the almost fierce speech
of his less scrupulous brother-in-law. The latter,
thus encountered, changed his ground with singular
rapidity.
Well, by dogsand what of that!and who
is it says I shan't, if it's my notion. I'd like now to
see the boy that'll stand up agin me and make such
a speech. Who says I shan't take what I likes
and that I takes more than is good for me. Does
you say so, Mr. Bunce
No,thank ye, no. How should I say what
aint true. You don't take half enough, now, its
my idee, neither on you. It's all talk and no cider,
and that I call monstrous dry work. Come, pass
round the bottle. Here's to you, Master Tongs
Master Brooks, I drink your very good health.
But fill up, fill upyou aint got nothing in your
tumbler.
No, he's a sneakyou're a sneak, Brooks, if
you don't fill up to the hub. Go the whole hog,
boy, and don't twist your mouth as if the stuff was
physic. It's what I call nation good, now; no
mistake
in it, I tell you.
Hah! that's a true wordthere's no mistake
in this stuff. It is jest now what I calls
ginywine
.
True Monongahely, Master Pedler. Who ever
reckoned to find a Yankee pedler with a
raal
good
taste for Monongahely. Give us your fist, Mr.
BunceI see you know's what's what. You
aint been among us for nothing. You've larned
something by travelling, and, by dogs, you'll come
to something yit, if you live long enough, if so be
you can only keep clear of the
old range
.
The pedler winced under the equivocal
compliments
poured forth in such profusion by his
companion
,
but did not suffer any thing of this
description
to interfere with the vigorous prosecution of
his design. He had the satisfaction to perceive
that Brooks had gradually accommodated himself
not a little to the element in which his
brother-in-law
Tongs was already floating happily; and the
boy, his son, already put on the features of one over
whose senses the strong liquor was momentarily
obtaining the mastery. But these signs did not
persuade him into any relaxation of his labours;
on the contrary, encouraged by success, he plied
the draughts more frequently and freely than before,
and with additional evidence of the influence of the
potations upon those who drank, when he found
that he was enabled, unperceived, to deposite the
contents of his own tumbler, in most instances,
under the table around which they had gathered.
In the cloud of smoke encircling them, and sent
up from their several pipes, Bunce could perceive
the face of his colleague in the conspiracy peering
in occasionally upon the assembly, and at length,
on some slight pretence, he approached the
aperture
agreeable to the given signal, and received
from the hands of the landlord a phial containing a
strong infusion of opium, which he placed cautiously
in his bosom, and awaited the moment of more
increased stupefaction to employ it. So
favourably
had the liquor operated by this time upon the
faculties of all, that the elder Brooks grew
garrulous
and full of jest at the expense of his son--
who now, completely overcome, had sunk down
with his head upon the table in a profound
slumber
.
The pedler joined, as well as Tongs, in the
merrimentthis latter personage, by the way,
having now put himself completely under the control
of the ardent spirit, and exhibiting all the
appearance
of a happy madness. He howled like the
wolfimitated sundry animalsbroke out into
catches of song which he invariably failed to finish,
and at length, grappling his brother-in-law, Brooks,
around the neck, with both arms, as he sat beside
Vol. II.X
him, he swore by all that was strong in
Monongahely
,
he should give them a song.
That's jest my idee, now, Master Tongs. A
song is a main fine thing, now, to fill up the chinks.
First a glass, then a puff, or mayhap two, and then
a song.
Brooks, who, in backwood parlance, was
considerably
up a stump,that is to say, half drunk
after a few shows of resistance, and the utterance of
some feeble scruples, which were all rapidly set
aside by his companions, proceeded to pour forth
the rude melody which follows:
THE HOW-D'YE-DO BOY.
For a how-d'ye-do, boy, 'tis pleasure enough,
(The world goes round, the world goes round)
To have a sup of such goodly stuff
(The world goes round, the world goes round)
To float away in a sky of fog,
(The world goes round, the world goes round)
And swim the while in a sea of grog;
(The world goes round, the world goes round)
But high or low,
Let the world go.
The how-d'ye-do boy don't care for itnononono.
The brother-in-law and son, who seemed to be
familiar with the uncouth dithyrambic, repeated
with the singer the regularly recurring second line,
and this addition gave it surprising effect; the
pedler
joining in at the conclusion, and repeating the
negative with prodigious compass of voice. The
song proceeded
For a how-d'ye-do boy who smokes and drinks,
(The world goes round, the world goes round)
He does not care who cares or thinks
(The world goes round, the world goes round)
Would Grief deny him to laugh and sing,
(The world goes round, the world goes round)
He knocks her down with a single sling
(The world goes round, the world goes round).
So high or low,
Let the world go,
The how-d'ye-do boy don't care for itnononono.
The how-d'ye-do boy is a boy of the night
(The world goes round, the world goes round)
It brings no cold, and it does not fright:
(The world goes round, the world goes round)
He buttons his coat and laughs at the shower,
(The world goes round, the world goes round)
And he has a song for the darkest hour
(The world goes round, the world goes round).
So high or low,
Let the world go
The how-d'ye-do boy don't care for itnononono.
The song gave no little delight to all parties
Tongs shouted, the pedler roared applause, and
such was the general satisfaction, that it was no
difficult thing to persuade Brooks to the
demolition
of a bumper, which Bunce adroitly proposed
to the singer's own health. It was while the hilarity
thus produced was at its loudest, that the pedler
seized the chance to pour a moderate portion of
the narcotic into the several glasses of his
companions
,
while a second time filling them; but
unfortunately
for himself, not less than the design in
view, just at this moment Brooks grew awkwardly
conscious of his own increasing weakness,
having
just reason enough left to feel that he had
already drank too much. With a considerable
show of resolution, therefore, he thrust away the
glass so drugged for his benefit, and declared his
determination to do no more of that business. He
withstood all the suggestions of the pedler on the
subject, and the affair began to look something less
than hopeless when he proceeded to the wakening
up of his son, who, overcome by the liquor, was
busily employed in a profound sleep, with his head
prone to the table. Tongs, who had lost nearly
all the powers of action, though retaining not a few
of his parts of speech, now came in fortunately to
the aid of the rather discomfited pedler. Pouring
forth a volley of oaths, in which his more
temperate
brother-in-law was denounced as a
mean-spirited
critter, who couldn't drink with his friend or
fight with his enemy, he made an ineffectual effort
to grapple furiously with the offender, while he
more effectually arrested his endeavour to waken
up his son. It is well, perhaps, that his animal man
lacked something of its accustomed efficiency, and
resolutely refused all co-operation with his mood;
or, it is more than probable, such was his wrath,
that his more staid brother-in-law would have been
subjected to some few personal tests of blow and
buffet. The proceedings throughout, suggested to
the mind of the pedler a mode of executing his
design, by proposing a bumper all round, with the
view to healing the breach between the parties,
and as a final draught preparatory to breaking-up.
A suggestion so reasonable could not well be
resisted
;
and with the best disposition in the world
towards sobriety, Brooks was persuaded to assent
to the measure. Unhappily, however, for the
pedler
,
the measure was so grateful to Tongs, that
before
the former could officiate, the latter, with a
desperate effort, reached forward, and possessing
himself of his own glass, he thrust another, which
happened to be the only undrugged one, and which
Bunce had filled for himself, into the grasp of the
jailer. The glass designed for Brooks was now in
the pedler's own hands, and no time was
permitted
him for reflection. With a doubt as to whether
he had not got hold of the posset meant for his
neighbour, Bunce was yet unable to avoid the
difficulty
,
and, in a moment, in good faith, the contents of
the several glasses were fairly emptied by their
holders
.
There was a pause of considerable duration;
the several parties, Tongs particularly, sunk back
quietly into their seats; and, supposing from
appearances
,
that the effect of the drug had been complete,
the pedler, though feeling excessively stupid and
strange, had yet recollection enough to give the
signal
to his comrade. A moment only elapsed, when
Munro entered the apartment, seemingly
unperceived
by all but the individual who had called him;
and, as an air of considerable vacancy and repose
overspread all the company, he naturally enough
concluded
the potion had taken due hold of the senses
of the one whom it was his chief object to
overcome
.
Without hesitation, therefore, and
certainly
asking no leave, he thrust one hand into
the bosom of the worthy jailer, while the other
was employed in taking a sure hold of his collar.
To his great surprise, however, he found that his
man had no lethargy, though severely bitten by the
drink. Brooks made fierce resistance, though
nothing
at such a time, or indeed at any time, in the
hands of one so powerfully built as Munro.
Hello! nowwho are you, I sayhands off
TongsTongshands off,Tongs, I say
But Tongs heard not, or heeded not, any of the
rapid exclamations of the jailer, who continued to
struggle. Munro gave a single glance to the
pedler
,
whose countenance singularly contrasted with
the expression which, in the performance of such
a duty, and at such a time, it might have been
supposed
proper for it to have worn. There was a
look from his eyes of most vacant and elevated
beatitudea simper sat upon his lips, whichparted
ineffectually with the speech that he endeavoured
to make. A still lingering consciousness of
something
to be done, prompted him to rise, however,
X 2
and stumble towards the landlord, who, while
scuffling with the jailer, thus addressed him:
Why, Bunce, it's but half doneyou've bungled.
See, he's too sober by half.
Soberno, noguess he's drunkdrunk as a
gentleman. I say nowwhat must I do?
Do, muttered the landlord, between his teeth,
and pointing to Tongs, who reeled and raved
in his seatdo as I do; and at the word, with
a single blow of his fist, he felled the still refractory
jailer with as much ease as if he had been an infant
in his hands. The pedler, only half conscious,
turned nevertheless to the half-sleeping Tongs, and
resolutely drove his fist into his face. It was at
that moment that the nostrum, having taken its full
effect, deprived him of the proper force which
alone could have made the blow available for the
design which he had manfully enough undertaken.
The only result of the effort was to precipitate him,
with an impetus not his own, though deriving much
of its effect from his own weight, upon the person
of the enfeebled Tongs; the toper clasped him
round with a corresponding spirit, and they both
rolled upon the floor in utter imbecility, carrying
with them the table around which they had been
seated, and tumbling into the general mass of
bottles
,
pipes, and glasses, the slumbering youth, who,
till that moment, lay altogether ignorant of the
catastrophe. Munro, in the meanwhile, had
possessed
himself of the desired keys; and throwing a
sack, with which he had taken care to provide
himself
,
over the head of the still struggling but yet
rather stupified jailer, he bound the mouth of it with
cords closely around his body, and left him rolling,
with more elasticity and far less comfort than the
rest of the party, around the floor of the
apartment
.
He now proceeded to look at the pedler,
and seeing his condition, though much wondering
at his falling so readily into his own
temptation
,never
dreaming of the mistake which he
had made,he did not waste time to get him up,
as he plainly saw he could get no further service
out of him. A moment's reflection taught him,
that, as the condition of Bunce himself would most
probably free him from any suspicion of design,
the affair told as well for his purpose as if the
original arrangement had succeeded. Without
more pause, therefore, he left the house, carefully
locking the doors on the outside so as to delay
egress, and hastened immediately to the release of
the prisoner.
CHAPTER XIX.
The chase we follow has no common price;
Gold may not buy itGold may not restore,
If once we lose it. Be your spirit strong,
Firm set each musclenever heed the stop
There is no hindrance which should catch your thought,
When thus we ride for life.
The
landlord lost no time in freeing the captive.
A few minutes sufficed to find and fit the keys;
and penetrating at once to the cell of Ralph
Colleton
,
he soon made the youth acquainted with as
much of the circumstances of his agency in the
escape
as might be thought necessary for the
satisfaction
of his immediate curiosity. He wondered
at the part taken by Munro in the affair, but
hesitated
not to accept his assistance. Though
scrupulous
,
and rigidly so, not to violate the laws, and
having a conscientious regard to all human and
social obligations, he saw no immorality in flying
from a sentence, however agreeable to law, in all
respects so greatly at variance with justice. A
second intimation was not wanting to his decision,
and without waiting until the landlord should
unlock
the chain which secured him, he was about to
dart forward into the passage, when the restraining
check which it gave to his forward movement,
warned him of the difficulty. Fortunately, the
obstruction
was small; the master key, not only of the
cells, but of the several locks to the fetters of the
prison, was among the bunch of which the jailer
had been dispossessed, and when found, it performed
its office. The youth was again free, and a few
moments only had elapsed, after the departure of
Munro from the house of the pedler, when both
Ralph and his deliverer were upon the high road,
and bending their unrestrained course towards the
Indian nation.
And now, young man, said the landlord,
you are free. I have performed my promise to
one, whose desire in this jumps full with my own.
I should have been troubled enough had you
perished for the death of Forrester, though, to
speak the truth, I should not have risked myself, as
I have done to-night, but for my promise to her.
Whoof whom do you speak? To whom do
I owe all this, if it comes not of your own head?
And you do not conjecture? Have you not a
thought on the subject? Was it likely, think you,
that the young woman, who did not fear to go to a
stranger's chamber at midnight, in order to save
him from his enemy, would forget him altogether
when a greater danger was before him?
And to Miss Munro again do I owe my life?
Noble girl! how shall I requitehow acknowledge
my deep responsibility to her?
You cannot!I have not looked on either of
you for nothing; and my observation has taught
me all your feelings and hers. You cannot reward
her as she deserves to be rewardedas, indeed,
she only can be rewarded by you, Mr. Colleton.
Better, therefore, that you seek to make no
acknowledgments
.
What mean you? Your words have a
signification
beyond my comprehension. I know that I
am unable to requite services such as hers, and
such an endeavour I surely should not attempt;
but that I feel gratitude for her interposition may
not well be questionedthe deepest gratitudefor
in this deed, with your aid, she relieves me, not
merely from death, but the worse agony of that
dreadful form of death. My acknowledgments for
this service were nothing, I am well aware; but
these she shall have, and what else I can, without
disrespect, offer.
There is, indeed, one thing, Mr. Colletonnow
that I reflect, which it may be in your power to
do, and which may relieve you of some of the
responsibilities
which her interposition here and
elsewhere
imposes on you.
The landlord paused for a moment, and looked
hesitatingly in Ralph's countenance. The youth
saw and understood the expression, and replied
readily.
Doubt not, Mr. Munro, that I shall do all
things consistent with propriety, in my power to
do, that may take the shape and character of
requital
for this service. Any thing for Miss Munro
for yourself or othersnot incompatible with
the character of the gentleman. Speak, sirif
you can suggest a labour of any description, not
under this head, which would be grateful to
yourself
or herfear not to speak, and rely upon my
gratitude to serve you both.
I thank you, Mr. Colletonyour frankness
relieves
me of some heavy thoughts, and I shall open
my mind freely to you on the subject which now
troubles it. I need not tell you what my course
of life has been. I need not tell you what it is
now. Bad enough, Mr. Colletonbad enough, as
you must know by this time. Life, sir, is
uncertain
with all persons, but far more uncertain with
him whose life is such as mine. I know not the
hour, sir, when I may be knocked on the head. I
have no confidence in the people whom I go with
I have nothing to hope from the sympathies of
society, or the protection of the laws; and I have
now arrived at that time of life, when my own
experience
is hourly repeating in my ears the words
of Scripturethe wages of sin is death. Mine has
been a life of sin, Mr. Colleton, and I must look
for its wages. These thoughts have been troubling
me much of late, and I feel them particularly heavy
now. But, don't think, sir, that fear for myself
makes up my suffering. I fear for that poor girl,
who has no protector, and may be doomed to the
control of one who would make a hell on earth
for all under his influence. He has made a hell of
it for me.
Who is hewhom do you mean?
You should know him well enough by this time,
for he has sought your life often enough already
GuyRivers. Well, as I sayI know not how long
I shall be able to take care of and provide for that poor
girl, whose wish has prompted me this night to
what I have undertaken. She was my brother's
child, Mr. Colleton, and a noble creature she is.
If I live, sir, she will have to become the wife of
Riversand though I love her as my ownas I
have never loved my ownyet she must abide
the sacrifice from which, while I live, there is no
escape. But something tells me, sir, I have not
long to live. I have a notion which makes me
gloomy, and which has troubled me ever since you
have been in prison. One dream comes to me
every nightwhenever I sleepand I wake all
over perspiration, and with a terror I'm ashamed
of. In this dream I see my brother always, and
always with the same expression. He looks at
me long and mournfully, and his finger is uplifted,
as if in warning. I hear no word from his lips,
but they are in motion as if he spoke, and
then he walks slowly away. Thus, for several
nights has my mind been haunted, and I'm sure it
is not for nothing. It warns me that the time is
not very far distant when I shall receive the wages
of a life like minethe wages of sinthe death
perhapswho knowsthe death of the felon.
These are fearful fancies, indeed, Mr. Munro;
and, whether we think on them or not, will have
their influence over the strongest minded of us all:
but the thoughts which they occasion to your
mind, while they must be painful enough, may
be the most useful, if they awaken regret of
the past, and incite to amendment in the future.
Without regarding them as the presentiments of
death, or of any fearful change, I look upon them
only as the result of your own calm reflections
upon the unprofitable nature of vice; its extreme
unproductiveness in the end, however enticing in
the beginning; and the painful privations of human
sympathy and society which are the inevitable
consequences of its indulgence. These fancies are
the sleepless thoughts, the fruit of an active memory,
which, at such a time, unrestrained by the
judgment
,
mingles up the counsels and the warnings of
your brother and the past, with all the images and
circumstances of the present time. Butgo on
with your suggestion. Let me do what I can for
the good of those in whom you are interested.
You are rightwhatever may be my
apprehensions
,
life is uncertain enough, and needs no
dreams to make it more so. Still, I cannot rid
myself
of this impression, which sticks to me like a
shadow. Night after night I have seen himjust
as I saw him a year before he died. But his looks
were full of meaning, and when his lips opened,
though I heard not a word, they seemed to me to
saythe hour is at hand. I am sure they spoke
the truth, and I must prepare for it. If I live, Mr.
Colleton, Lucy must marry Riversthere's no
hope for her escape. If I die, there's no reason for
the marriage, for I can then bid him defiance. She
is willing to marry him now merely on my account.
If I perish before the marriage takes place, it will
not take place, and she will then need a protector
Say no more, exclaimed the youth, as the
landlord
paused for an instantsay no more. It will
be as little as I can say, when I assure you, that all
that my family can do for her happiness, all that I
can doshall be done. Be at ease on this matter,
and believe me that I promise you nothing which
my heart would not strenuously insist upon my
performing
.
She shall be a sister to me.
As he spoke, the landlord warmly pressed his
hand, leaning forward from his saddle as he did so;
but without a single accompanying word. The
dialogue was continued, at intervals, in a desultory
form, and without sustaining, for any length of
time, any single topic. Munro seemed heavy with
gloomy thoughts, and the sky now becoming
lightened
with the glories of the ascending moon, seemed
to have no manner of influence over his sullen
temperament
.
Not so with the youth. He grew
elastic and buoyant as they proceededand his
spirit rose, bright and gentle, as if in accordance
with the pure lights which now disposed themselves,
like an atmosphere of sublimated silver, throughout
the forest. The thin clouds floating away from the
parent orb no longer obscuring her progress,
became
tributaries, and were clothed in their most
dazzling draperiesclustering around her pathway,
and contributing, not a little, to the loveliness of
that serene star from which they received so
much. But the contemplations of the youth were
not long permitted to run on in the gladness of his
newly found liberty. On a sudden, the action of
his companion became animatedhe drew up his
steed for an instant, then applying the rowel,
exclaimed
in a deep, but suppressed tone
We are pursuedride, now, for your life, Mr.
Colleton; it is three miles to the river, and our
horses will serve us well. They are chosengive
them the spurand follow close after me.
Let us return to the village. The situation of
the jailer, Brooks, and of his companions, as the
landlord left them, will be readily remembered by
the reader. It was not until the fugitives were
fairly on the road, that the former, who had been
pretty well stunned by the severe blow given him
by Munro, recovered from his stupor; and he
then laboured under the difficulty of freeing
himself
from the bag about his head and shoulders,
and his incarceration in the dwelling of the pedler.
The blow had come nigh to sobering him, and
his efforts, accordingly, were not without success.
He looked round in astonishment upon the
condition
of all things around him, ignorant of the
individual
who had wrested from him his charge,
besides
Vol. II.Y
subjecting his scull to the extravagant test
which it had been so little able to resist or he to
repel; and, almost ready to believe, from the
equally prostrate condition of the pedler and his
brother, that, in reality, the assailant by which he
himself was overthrown was no other than the
potent bottle-god of his brother's familiar
worship
.
Such certainly would have been his
impression
but for the sack in which he had been
enveloped
,
and the absence of his keys. The blow,
which he had not ceased to feel, might have been
got by a drunken man in a thousand ways, and
was no argument to show the presence of an
enemy; but the sack, and the keysthey brought
instant conviction, and a rapidly increasing
sobriety
,
which, as it duly provoked his capacity for
reflection, was only so much more unpleasant than
his drunkenness. But no time was to be lost, and
the first movement, having essayed, though
ineffectually
,
to kick his stupid guest and snoring
brother-in-law
into similar consciousness with himself,
was to rush headlong to the jail, where he soon
realized all the apprehensions which assailed him
when discovering the loss of his keys. The
prisoner was gone, and the riotous search which
he soon commenced about the village collected a
crowd, whose clamours, not less than his own, had
occasioned the uproar which concluded the
conference
between Miss Colleton and Guy Rivers, as
narrated in a previous chapter.
The mob, approaching the residence of Colonel
Colleton, as a place which might probably have
been resorted to by the fugitive, brought the noise
more imperiously to the ears of Rivers, and
compelled
his departure. He sallied forth, and in a
little while ascertained the cause of the disorder.
By this time the dwelling of Colonel Colleton had
undergone the closest scrutiny. It was evident
to the crowd, that, so far from harbouring the youth,
they were not conscious of the escape; but of this
Rivers was not so certain. He was satisfied in
his own mind that the stern refusal of Edith to
accept
his overtures for the rescue, arose only from
the belief that they could do without him. More
than ever irritated by this idea, the outlaw was
bold enough, relying upon his disguise, to come
forward
,
and while all was indecisive in the
multitude
,
to lay plans for a pursuit. He did not scruple
to instruct the jailer as to what course should be
taken for the recovery of the fugitive; and by
his strong good sense and confidence of expression,
he infused new hope into that heretofore much
bewildered
person. Nobody knew who he was, but
as the village was full of strangers, who had never
been seen there before, this fact occasioned neither
surprise nor inquiry. His advice was taken, and a
file of the Georgia Guard, which were on station in
the village, now making their appearance, he
suggested
the course which they should pursue, and in
few words gave the reasons which induced the
choice. Familiar himself with all the various routes
of the surrounding country, he did not doubt that
the fugitive, under whatever guidance, for as yet
he knew nothing of Munro's agency in the business,
would take the most direct course to the Indian
nation. All this was done, on his part, with
an excited spirit, the result of that malignant mood
which now began to apprehend the chance of being
deprived of all its victims. Had this not been the
casehad he not been present, the probability is,
that in the variety of counsel, there would have
been a far greater delay in the pursuit; but such
must always be the influence of a strong and
leading
mind in a time of trial and popular excitement.
Such a mind concentrates and makes effective the
power which otherwise would have been wasted
in air. His superiority of character was
immediately
manifesthis suggestions were adopted
without dissent; and in a few moments, the two
troopers, accompanied by the jailer, were in pursuit
upon the very road taken by the fugitives.
Rivers, in the meanwhile, though excessively
anxious about the result of the pursuit, was yet
too sensible of his own risk to remain much longer
in the village. Annoyed not a little by the
apprehended
loss of that revenge which he had described
as so delicious in contemplation to his mind, he
could not venture to linger where he was, at a time
of such general excitement and activity. With a
prudent caution, therefore, more the result of an
obvious necessity than of any accustomed habit of
his life, he withdrew himself as soon as possible
from the crowd, at the moment when Pippinwho
never lost a good opportunityhad mounted upon
a stump in order to address them. Breaking
away just as the lawyer was swelling with some
old truism, and perhaps no truth, about the rights
of man and so forth, he mounted his horse, which
he had concealed in the neighbourhood, and rode
off to the solitude and the shelter of his den. There
was one thing that troubled his mind along with its
other troubles, and that was to find out who were
the active parties in the escape of Colleton. In all
this time, he had not for a moment suspected
Munro of connexion with the affairhe had too
much overrated his own influence over the landlord
to permit of a thought in his mind detrimental to
his conscious superiority. He had no clue, the
guidance of which might bring him to the trail; for
the jailer, conscious of his own irregularity, was
cautious enough in suppressing every thing like
a detail of the particular circumstances attending
the escape; contenting himself, simply, with
representing
himself as having been knocked down by
some persons unknown, and rifled of the keys
while lying insensible. Rivers could only think of
the pedler, and yet such was his habitual contempt
for that person, that he dismissed the thought the
moment
it came into his mind. Troubled thus in spirit,
and filled with a thousand conflicting notions, he
had almost reached the rocks, when he was
surprised
to perceive, on a sudden, close at his elbow,
the dwarfish figure of our old friend Chub
Williams
.
Without exhibiting the slightest show of
apprehension, the urchin resolutely continued his
course along with the outlaw, unmoved by his
presence
,
and with a degree of cavalier indifference
which he had never ventured to manifest to that
dangerous personage before.
Why, how now, Chubdo you not see me?
was the first inquiry of Rivers.
Can the owl see?Chub is an owlhe can't
see in the moonlight.
Well, but, Chubwhy do you call yourself an
owl? You don't want to see me, boy, do you?
Chub wants to see nobody but his mother
there's Miss Lucy nowwhy don't you let me see
her? she talks jest like Chub's mother.
Why, you dog, didn't you help to steal her
away? Have you forgotten how you pulled away
the stones? I should have you whipped for it, sir
do you know that I can whipdon't the
hickories
grow here?
Yes, so Chub's mother saidbut you can't
whip Chub. Chub laughshe laughs at all your
whips.
That
for your hickories. Ha! ha! ha!
Chub don't mind the hickoriesyou can't catch
Chub, to whip him with your hickories. Try now,
Y 2
if you can. Try and as he spoke he darted
along with a rickety, waddling motion, half earnest
in his flight, yet seemingly, partly with the desire to
provoke pursuit. Something irritated with what
was so unusual in the habit of the boy, and what
he conceived only so much impertinence, the
outlaw
turned the horse's head down the hill after him,
but, as he soon perceived, without any chance of
overtaking him in so broken a region. The urchin
all the while, as if encouraged by the evident
hopelessness
of the chase on the part of the pursuer,
screeched out volley after volley of defiance and
laughterbreaking out at intervals into speeches
which he thought most likely to annoy and irritate.
Ha, ha, ha! Chub don't mind your hickories
Chub's fingers are longhe will pull away all the
stones of your house, and then you will have to
live in the tree top.
But on a sudden his tune was changed, as
Rivers
,
half-irritated by the pertinacity of the dwarf,
pulled out a pistol, and directed it at his head. In
a moment, the old influence was predominant, and
in undisguised terror he cried out
Now don'tdon't, Mr. Guydon't you shoot
ChubChub won't laugh againhe won't pull
away the stoneshe won't.
The outlaw now laughed himself at the terror
which he had inspired, and beckoning the boy near
him, he proceeded, if possible, to persuade him
into a feeling of amity. There was a strange
temper in him with reference to this outcast. His
deformityhis desolate conditionhis deficient
intellect, inspired, in the breast of the fierce man, a
feeling of sympathy, which he had not entertained
for the whole world of humanity beside. Such is
the contradictory character of the misled and the
erring spirit. Warped to enjoy crimeto love the
deformities of all moral thingsto seek after and
to surrender itself up to all manner of perversions,
yet, in the long tissue, returning, at some few
moments
,
to the original temper of that first nature not
yet utterly departed, and few and feeble though the
fibres be which still bind the heart to her worship,
still strong enough at times to remind it of the
true
, however it may be insufficient to restrain it
in its wanderings after the
false
. But the language
and effort of the outlaw, though singularly kind,
failed to have any of the desired effect upon the
dwarf. With an unscrupulous refusal to enter the
outlaw's dwelling-place in the rocks, he bounded
away into a hollow of the hills, and in a moment
was out of sight of his companion. Fatigued with
his recent exertions, and somewhat more sullen
than usual, Rivers entered the gloomy abode, into
which it is not our present design to follow him.
CHAPTER XX.
Oh, thou eternal Mover of the heavens,
Look with a gentle eye upon this wretch!
Oh, beat away the busy, meddling fiend
That lays strong siege unto this wretch's soul,
And from his bosom purge the black despair.
King Henry VI
.
The
fugitives, meanwhile, pursued their way,
with the additional speed of men conscious that
life and death hung upon their progress. There
needed no exhortations from his companion to
Ralph Colleton. More than life, with him, depended
upon his speed. The shame of such a death
as that to which he had been destined was for ever
before his eyes, and with a heart nerved to its
utmost
by a reference to the awful alternative of
flight, he grew reckless in the audacity with which
he drove his horse forward in defiance of all
obstacle
and over every impediment. Nor were the
present apprehensions of Munro much less than
those of his companion. To be overtaken, as the
participant of the flight of one whose life was
forfeit
,
would necessarily invite to such an
examination
of himself as must result in the
development
of his true character, and such a discovery
must only terminate in his conviction and sentence
to the same doom. His previously uttered
presentiment
grew more than ever strong with the
strengthening consciousness of his danger; and
with an animation, the fruit of an anxiety little
short of absolute fear, he stimulated the progress
of Colleton, while himself driving the rowel
ruthlessly
into the smoking sides of the animal he
bestrode.
On, siron, Mr. Colletonthis is no moment for
graceful attitude. Bend forwardfree reinforce
spur. We ride for lifefor life. They must not
take us aliveremember
that
. Let them shoot
strike, if they please, but they must put no hands
on us as living men. If we must die, whyany
death but a dog's. Are you prepared for such a
finish to your ride?
I ambut I trust it has not come to that.
How much have we yet to the river?
Two miles at the least, and a tough road.
They gain upon usdo you not hear themwe
are slowvery slow. These horseson, Syphax,
dull devilonon!
And at every incoherent and unconnected
syllable
,
the landlord struck his spurs into his animal,
and incited the youth to do the same.
There is an old mill upon the branch to our
left, where for a few hours we might lie in secret,
but daylight would find us out. Shall we try a
birth there, or push on for the river? inquired
Munro.
Push on, by all meanslet us stop nowhere
we shall be safe if we make the nation,was the
reply.
Ay, safe enough, but that's the rub. If we
could stretch a mile or two between us, so as to
cross before they heave in sight, I could take you
to a place where the whole United States would
never find us outbut they gain on usI hear
them every moment more and more near. The
echoes are very clear to-nightalways clearer and
more distinct by moonlight, and they must hear us,
as we hear them.
But I hear them notI hear no echoes but our
own replied the youth.
Ah, that's because you have not the ears of
an outlaw. There's a necessity for using our
ears, one of the first that we acquire, and I can
hear sounds farther, I believe, than any man I
ever met, unless it be Guy Rivers. He has the
ears of the devil, when his blood's up. Then he
hears further than I can, though I'm not much
behind him even then. Hark! they are now
winding the hill not more than half a mile off,
and we hear nothing of them now until they get
roundthe hill throws the echo to the rear, as it
is more abrupt on that side than on this. At this
time, if they heard us before, they cannot hear us.
We could now make the old mill with some
hope of their losing our track, as we strike into a
blind path to do so. What say you, Master
Colleton
shall
we turn aside or go forward?
Forward, I say. If we are to suffer, I would
suffer on the high road, in full motion, and not be
caught in a crevice like a lurking thief. Better be
shot downfar betterI think with youthan
risk recapture.
Wellit's the right spirit you have, and we
may clear them. We cease again to hear them.
They are driving through the close grove where
the trees hang so much over. Godit is but a
few moments since we went through it ourselves
they gain on usbut the river is not farspeed
onbend forward, and use the spura few
minutes
more close pushing, and the river is in sight.
Kill the beastsno matterbut make the river.
How do we cross? inquired the youth,
hurriedly
,
though with a confidence something
increased
by the manner of his companion.
Drive indrive inthere are two fords,
each within twenty yards of the other, and the
river is not high. You take the path and ford to
the right, as you come in sight of the water, and
I'll keep the left. Your horse swims well,so
don't mind the risk; and if there's any difficulty,
leave him, and take to the water yourself. The
side I give you is the easiest; though it don't
matter
what side I take. I've gone through worse
chances than this, and if we hold on for a few
moments
,
we are safe. The next turn, and we are on
the banks.
The riverthe river, exclaimed the youth,
involuntarily, as the broad and quiet stream wound
before his eyes, glittering like a polished mirror in
the moonlight.
Ay, there it isnow to the rightto the right.
Look not behind you. Let them shootlet them
shoot, but lose not an instant to look. Plunge
forward
and drive in. They are close upon us, and the
flat is on the other side. They can't pursue, unless
they do as we, and they have no such reason for
so desperate a course. They will stopthey will
not follow. Ininnot a moment is to be lost
and speaking, as they pursued their several ways,
he to the left, and Ralph Colleton to the right ford,
the obedient steeds plunged forward under the
application
of the rowel, and were fairly in the bosom
of the stream, as the pursuing party rode headlong
up the bank.
Struggling onwards, in the very centre of the
stream, with the steed, which, to do him all manner
of justice, swam nobly, Ralph Colleton could not
resist the temptation to look round upon his
pursuers
.
Writhing his body in the saddle, therefore,
a single glance was sufficient; and in the full glare
of the moonlight, unimpeded by any interposing
foliage, the prospect before his eyes was imposing
and terrible enough. The pursuers were four in
numberthe jailer, two of the Georgia Guard, and
another person unknown to him. As Munro had
predicted, they did not venture to plunge in as the
fugitives had donethey had no such fearful
motive
for the risk; and the few moments which they
consumed in deliberation as to what they should do,
contributed not a little to the successful experiment
of the swimmers. But the youth at length caught
a fearful signal of preparation,his ear noted the
sharp click of the lock, as the rifle was referred to
in the final resort; and his ready sense conceived
but of one, and the only mode of evading the
danger
so immediately at hand. Too conspicuous in
his present situation to hope for escape, short of a
miracle, so long as he remained upon the back of
the swimming horse, he relaxed his hold, carefully
drew his feet from the stirrups, resigned his seat, and
only a second before the discharge of the rifle was
deeply buried in the bosom of the Chestatee. The
steed received the bullet in his headplunged
forward
madly, to the no small danger of Ralph, who
had now got a little before himbut in a few
moments
lay supine upon the stream, and was borne
down by its current. The youth, practised in
such exercises, pressed forward under the surface
for a sufficient time to enable him to avoid the
present glance of the enemy, and at length, in
safety, rounding a jutting point of the shore, which
effectually concealed him from their eyes, he gained
the dry land, at the very moment in which Munro,
with more success, was clambering, still mounted,
up the steep sides of a neighbouring and slippery
bank. Familiar with such scenes, the landlord had
duly estimated the doubtful chances of his life in
swimming the river directly in sight of the
pursuers
.
He had therefore taken the precaution to
oblique considerably to the left from the direct
course, and did not, in consequence, appear in sight,
owing to the sinuous windings of the stream, until
he had actually gained the shore. The youth
beheld
him at this moment, and shouted aloud his own
situation and safety. In a voice indicative of
restored
confidence in himself, no less than in his fate,
the landlord, by a similar shout, recognised him,
and was bending forward to the spot where he
stood, when the sharp and joint report of three
rifles from the opposite banks attested the
discovery
of his person; and, in the same instant, the
rider tottered forward in his saddlehis grasp
was relaxed upon the rein, and without a word,
he toppled from his seat, and was borne for a few
paces by his horse, dragged forward by one of his
feet, which had not been released from the stirrup.
He fell at length, and the youth came up with him.
He heard the groans of the wounded man, and
though exposing himself to the same chance, he
could not determine upon flight. He might
possibly
have saved himself by taking the now freed
animal which the landlord had ridden, and at once
burying himself in the nation. But the noble
weakness of pity determined him otherwise; and
without scruple or fear, he resolutely advanced to
the spot where Munro lay, though full in the sight
of the pursuers, and prepared to render him what
assistance he could. One of the troopers, in the
mean time, had swum the river himself; and
freeing
the flat from its chains, had directed it across
the stream for the passage of his companions. It
was not long before they had surrounded the
fugitives
,
and Ralph Colleton was again a prisoner, and
once more made conscious of the dreadful doom
from which he had, at one moment, almost
conceived
himself to have escaped.
Munro had been shockingly wounded. One ball
had pierced his thigh, inflicting a severe, though
probably not a fatal wound. Another, and this
had been enough, had penetrated directly behind
the eyes, keeping its course so truly across, as to
tear and turn the bloody orbs completely out upon
the cheek beneath. The first words of the dying
man were
Is the moon gone downlightsbring lights!
No, Munrothe moon is still shining without
a cloud, and as brightly as if it were daywas
the reply of Ralph.
Who speaksspeak again, that I may know
how to believe him.
It is I, MunroI, Ralph Colleton.
Then it is trueand I am a dead man. It is
all over, and he came not to me for nothing. Yet,
can I have no lightsno lights?Ah!and the
half reluctant reason grew more terribly conscious
of his situation, as he thrust his fingers into the
Vol. II.Z
bleeding sockets from which the fine and delicate
conductor of light had been so suddenly driven.
He howled aloud for several moments in his agony
in the first agony which came with that
consciousness
but,
recovering at length, he spoke with
something of calm and coherence.
Well, Mr. Colletonwhat I said was true. I
knew it would be so; I had warning enough to
prepare
,
and I did try, but it's come over soon and
nothing is done. I have my wages, and the text
spoke nothing but the truth. I cannot stand this
pain longit is too muchand The pause in
his speech, from extreme agony, was filled up by a
shriek that rung fearfully amid the silence of such
a scene, but it lasted not long. The mind of the
landlord was not enfeebled by his weakness, even
at such a moment. He recovered and proceeded:
Yes, Mr. ColletonI am a dead man. I have
my wagesbut my death is your life. Let me
tell the storyand save you, and save Lucy,and
thus(oh, could I believe it for an instant)save
myself! But no matterwe must talk of other
things. Is that Brooksis that Brooks beside
me?
No, it is IColleton.
I knowI knowimpatientlywho else?
Mr. Brooks, the jailerEnsign Martin and
Brincle, of the Georgia Guard, was the reply of
the jailer.
Enough, then, for your safety, Mr. Colleton.
They can prove it all, and then remember Lucy
poor Lucy! You will be in timesave her from
Guy RiversGuy Riversthe wretchnot Guy
Riversnothere's a secret,there's a secret
for you, my men, shall bring you a handsome
reward
.
Stoopstoop, you three,where are you?
stoop, and hear what I have to say. It is my
dying wordand I swear it by all things, all
powers
,
all terrors that can make an oath solemn with
a wretch whose life is a long crime. Stoophear
meheed alllose not a wordnot a wordnot
a word. Where are you?
We are here, beside youwe hear all that you
say. Go on!
Guy Rivers is not his namehe is not Guy
Rivershear nowGuy Rivers is the outlaw for
whom the governor's proclamation gives a high
reward
a
thousand dollarsthe man who murdered
Judge Jessup. Edward Creighton, of Gwinnett
Court Househe is the murderer of Jessuphe is
the murderer of Forrester, for whose death the life
of Mr. Colleton here is forfeit. I saw him kill them
both,I saw more than that, but that is enough to
save the innocent man and punish the guilty. Take
down all that I have said. I, too, am guilty; would
make amends, but it is almost too latethe night
is very dark, and the earth swings about like a
cradle. Ahhave you taken down on paper what
I said!I will tell you nothing more till all is
written
write
it downon paperevery word
write that before I say any more.
They complied with his requisition. One of the
troopers, on a scrap of paper furnished by the
jailer, and placed upon the saddle of his horse,
standing by, in the pale light of the moon, recorded
word after word, with scrupulous exactness, of the
dying man's confession. He proceeded duly to the
narration of every particular of all past
occurrences
,
as we ourselves have already detailed them
to the reader, together with many more,
unnecessary
to our narrative, of which we had heretofore
no cognizance. When this was done, the landlord
required it to be read, commenting, during its
perusal
,
and dwelling, with more circumstantial
minuteness
,
upon many of its parts.
That will dothat will do. Now swear me,
Brooksyou are in the commission,lift my
hand and swear me, so that nothing be wanting to
the truth. What if there is no Biblehe
exclaimed
,
suddenly, as some one of the individuals
present suggested a difficulty on this subject.
Whatbecause there is no Bible, shall there be
no truth? I swearthough I have had no
communion
with GodI swear to the truth by him.
Write down my oathhe is presentthey say he
is always present. I believe it now,I only wish
I had always believed it. I swear by himhe will
not falsify the truthwrite down my oath, while I
lift my hand to him. Would it were a prayer
but I cannot prayI am more used to oaths than
prayers, and I cannot pray. Is it writtenis it
written? Look, Mr. Colleton, lookyou know the
law. If you are satisfied, I am. Will it do?
Colleton replied quickly in the affirmative, and
the dying man went on:Remember Lucythe
poor Lucy. You will take care of her. Say no
harsh words in her earsbut, why should I ask this
of you, whomAhit goes roundroundround
swimmingswimming. Very darkvery dark
night, and the trees danceLucy
The voice sunk into a faint whisper whose
sounds were unsyllabledan occasional murmur
escaped them once after, in which the name of his
niece was again apparent; exhibiting, at the last,
the affection, however latent, which he entertained
in reality for the orphan trust of his brother. In
a few moments, and the form stiffened before them
in all the rigid sullenness of death.
CHAPTER XXI.
Chafe as thou wilt, they have thee in their toils,
The hunter's spear is fixed upon thy throat,
And nothing now is left thee but to die.
The
cupidity of his captors had been
considerably
provoked by the dying words of Munro.
They were all of them familiar with the atrocious
murder which, putting a price upon his head, had
driven Creighton, then a distinguished member of
the bar in one of the more civilized portions of the
state, from the pale and consideration of society;
and their anxieties were now entirely addressed to
the new object which the recital they had just heard
had set before them. They had gathered from the
narrative of the dying man some idea of the place
in which they would most probably find him; and
though without a guide to the spot, and altogether
ignorant of its localities, they determined
without
reference to others, who might only subtract
from their own share of the promised reward,
without contributing much, if any aid, which they
might not easily dispense withat once to attempt
his capture. This was the joint understanding of
the whole party, Ralph Colleton excepted. In
substance
,
the youth was now free. The evidence
furnished by Munro only needed the recognition of
the proper authorities to make him so; and, until
this had been effected, he remained in a sort of
understood
restraint, but without any actual
limitations
.
Pledging himself that they should suffer
nothing from the indulgence, he mounted the horse
Z 2
of Munro, whose body was cared for, and took his
course back to the village; while, following the
directions
given them, the Guard and jailer pursued
their way to the Wolf's Neck in their search after
Guy Rivers.
The outlaw had been deserted by nearly all his
followers. The note of preparation and pursuit
sounded by the State authorities, had inspired the
depredators with a degree of terror, which the
near approximation of the Guard, in strong
numbers
,
to their most secluded places, had not a little
tended to increase; and accordingly, at the period
of which we now speak, the outlaw, deserted by all
but one or two of the most adventurouswho were,
however, careful enough of themselves to keep in
no one place long, and cautiously to avoid their
accustomed hauntsremained in his rock, in a
state of gloomy despondency, not usually his
characteristic
.
Had he been less stubbornless ready
to defy all chances and all persons, it is not
improbable
that Rivers would have taken counsel by
their flight, and removed himself, for a time at least,
from the scene of danger. But his native
obstinacy
,
and that madness of heart which, as we are
told, seizes first upon those whom God seeks to
destroy
,
determined him against the judgment of others,
and, in part, against his own, to remain where he
was; probably in the fallacious hope that the storm
would pass over, as, on so many previous
occasions
,
it had already done, and leave him again
free to his old practices in the same region. A
feeling
of pride which made him unwilling to take a
suggestion of fear and flight from the course of
others, had some share in this decision; and, if we
add the vague hungering of his heart towards the
lovely Edith, and possibly the influence of other
pledges, and the imposing consideration of other
duties, we shall not be greatly at a loss in
understanding
the injudicious indifference to the
contiguous
dangers, which appears to have distinguished
the conduct of the otherwise politic and
circumspect
ruffian.
That night, after his return from the village and
the brief dialogue with Chub Williams, as we have
already narrated it, he retired to the deepest cell of
his den, and throwing himself into a seat,
covering
his face with his hands, he gave himself up to a
meditation as true in its philosophy as it was
humiliating
throughout in its application to himself.
Dillon
,
his lieutenant, if such a title may be
permitted
,
in such a place and for such an adjunctcame
to him shortly after his arrival, and in brief terms
with a blunt readinesswhich, coming directly
to the point, did not offend the person to whom it
was addresseddemanded to know what he meant
to do with himself.
We can't stay here long, said he, the troops
are gathering all round us. The country's alive
with them, and in a few days we shouldn't be able
to stir from the hollow of a tree without popping
upon some of our hunters. In the Wolf's Neck
they will surely seek us, for, though a very fine
place for us while the country's thin, yet even its
old owners, the wolves, would fly from it when
the horn of the hunter rings through the wood. It
won't be very long before they pierce to the very
`nation,' and then we should have but small chance
of a long grace. Jack Ketch would make mighty
small work of our necks, in his hurry to go to
dinner.
And what of all this,what is all this to me?
was the strange and rather phlegmatic response
of the outlaw, who did not seem to take in the
full meaning of his officer's speech, and whose
mind, indeed, was at that moment wandering to
far other considerations. Dillon seemed not a little
astounded by this reply, and looked inquiringly into
the face of the speaker, doubting, for a moment,
his accustomed sanity. The stern look which his
glance encountered, directed its expression
elsewhere
,
and after a moment's pause, he replied
Why, captain, you can't have thought of what
I've been saying, or you wouldn't speak as you do.
I think it's a great deal to both you and me, what
I've been telling you; and the sooner you come to
think so too, the better. It's only yesterday
afternoon
that I narrowly missed being seen at the forks
by two of the Guard, well mounted, and with rifles.
I had but the crook of the fork in my favour, and
the hollow of the creek at the old ford where it's
been washed away. They're all round us, and I
don't think we're safe here another day. Indeed, I
only come to see if you wouldn't be off with me,
at once, into the `nation.'
You are considerate, but must go alone. I
have no apprehensions where I am, and shall not
stir for the present. For yourself, you must
determine
as you think proper. I have no further hold
on your service. I release you from the oath.
Make the best of your way into the `nation'ay, go
yet farther; and, hear me, Dillon, go where you
are unknowngo where you can enter society
seek for the fireside, where you can have those
who, in the dark hour, will have no wish to desert
you. I have no claim now upon you, and the
sooner you `take the range' the better.
And why not go along with me, captain? I
hate to go alone, and hate to leave you where you
are. I shan't think you out of danger while you
stay here; and don't see any reason for you to
do so.
Perhaps not, Dillon; but there is reason, or I
should not stay. We may not go together, even if
I were to flyour paths lie asunder. They may
never more be one. Go you, therefore, and heed
me not; and think of me no more. Make
yourself
a home in the Mississippi, or on the Red River,
and get yourself a fireside and family of your own.
These are the things that will keep your heart
warm within you, cheering you in hours that are
dark, like this.
And why, captain, replied the lieutenant,
much affectedwhy should you not take the
course which you advise for me? Why not, in
the Arkansas, make yourself a home, and with a
wife
Silence, sirnot a word of that. Why come
you to chafe me here, in my den? Am I to be
haunted for ever with such as you, and with words
like these?and the brow of the outlaw blackened
as he spoke, and his white teeth knit together,
fiercely gnashing for an instant, while the foam
worked its way through the occasional aperture
between them. The ebullition of passion,
however
,
lasted not long, and the outlaw, in a moment,
seemed conscious of its injustice.
I do you wrong, Dillonbut on this subject I
will have no one speak. I cannot be the man you
would have me; I have been schooled otherwise.
My mother has taught me a different lesson,her
teachings have doomed me, and these enjoyments
are now all beyond my hope.
Your mother! was the response of Dillon, in
unaffected astonishment.
Ay, manmy mother. Is there any thing
wonderful in that. She taught me this lesson with
her milkshe sung it in lullabies over my cradle
she gave it me in the playthings of my boyhood
her schoolings have made me the morbid, the fierce
criminal, from whose association all the gentler
virtues must always desire to fly. If, in the doom
which may finish my life of doom, I have any
one person to accuse of all, that person ismy
mother!
Is this possible?is it true?it is strange, very
strange.
It is not strangewe see it every dayin
almost every family. She did not
tell
me to lie
or to swindle, or to stabNo!Oh, no! she would
have told me that all these things were badbut
she
taught
me to perform them all. She roused
my
passions
, and not my
principles
, into activity.
She provoked the one, and suppressed the other.
Did my father reprove my improprieties, she
petted
me, and denounced him. She crossed his
better
purposes, and defeated all his designs, until, at
last, she made my passions too strong for my
government
,
not less than hers, and left me, knowing
the true, yet the victim of the false. What is
morewhile my intellect, in its calmer hours,
taught me that virtue was the only source of true
felicity, my ungovernable passions set the
otherwise
sovereign reason at defiance, and trampled it
under foot. Yesin that last hour of eternal
retribution
,
if called upon to denounce or to accuse, I
can point but to one as the author of allthe
weakly fond, misjudging, misguiding woman who
gave me birth. Within the last hour I have been
thinking over all these things. I have been
thinking
how I had been cursed in childhood by one
who surely loved me beyond all other things
beside
.
I can remember how sedulously she
encouraged
and prompted my infant passions,
uncontrolled
by her reason, and since utterly
unrestrainable
by my own. How she stimulated me to
artifices and set me the example herself, by
frequently
deceiving my father, and teaching me to
disobey and deceive him. She told me not to lie,
and she lied all day to him, on my account, and to
screen me from his anger. She taught me the
catechism, to say on Sunday, while during the
week she schooled me in almost every possible
form of ingenuity to violate all its precepts. She
bribed me to do my duty, and hence my duty could
only be done under the stimulating promise of a
reward
.
She taught me that God was superior to
all, and that he required obedience to certain laws,
yet, as she hourly violated those laws herself in my
behalf, I was taught to regard myself as far
superior
to him. Had she not done all this, I had not
been here and thus: I had been what now I dare
not think on.It is all her work. The greatest
enemy my life has ever known has been my
mother.
This is a horrible thought, captain, yet I
cannot
but think it true.
It is trueI have analyzed my own history,
and the causes of my character and fortunes now,
and I charge it all upon her. From one influence
I have traced another, until I have the sweeping
amount of twenty years of crime and sorrow, and a
life of hate, and probably a death of ignominy, all
owing to the first ten years of my infant
education
,
where the only teacher that I knew was the
woman who gave me birth. But this concerns not
you. In my calm mood, Dillon, you have the
fruit of my reasonto abide its dictate I should
fly with youbut I suffer from my mother's
teachings
even in this. My passionsmy pridemy
fierce hope, the creature of a maddening passion,
will not let me fly, and I stay, though I stay alone,
with a throat bare for the knife of the butcher, or
the halter of the hangman. I will not fly.
And I will stay with you. I can dare
something
too, captain, and you shall not say, that when
the worst comes to the worst, Tom Dillon was the
man to back out. I will not go either, and
whatever
is the chance, you shall not be alone.
Rivers, for a moment, seemed touched by the
devotion of his follower, and spoke not for a brief
interval; but suddenly the expression of his eye
was changed, and he spoke briefly and sternly.
You shall not stay with me, sir. What, am I
so low as this, that I may not be permitted to be
alone when I will? Will my subordinates fly in
my face, and presume to disobey my commands?
Go, Dillonhave I not said that you must fly
that I no longer need your services? Why linger
you, then, where you are no longer needed? I have
that to perform which requires me to be alone,
and I have no further time to spare you. Go
away!
Do you speak in earnest, captain? inquired
the lieutenant, doubtingly, and with an expression
of countenance of the most equivocal and
uncertain
character.
Am I so fond of trifling, that my officer asks
me such a question?was the stern response.
Then I am your officer stillyou will go with
me, or I shall remain.
Neither, Dillon. The time is past for such an
arrangement. You are discharged from my
service
,
and from your oath. The club has no further
existence. Gobe a happya better man, in
another
part of the world. You have some of the
weaknesses of your better nature still in you. You
had no mother to change them into scorn, and
strife, and bitterness. Goyou may be a better
man, and have something, therefore, for which to
live. I have notmy heart can know no change.
It is no longer under the guidance of reason. It
is quite ungovernable now. There was a time
whenbut why prate of this?it is too late to
think of, and only maddens the more. Besides, it
makes not any thing with you, and would detain
you without a purpose. Linger no longer, Dillon
speed to the west, and, at some future day,
perhaps
you shall see me when you least expect, and
perhaps least desire it.
The manner of the outlaw was firm and
commanding
,
and Dillon did not scruple long to
recognise
its requisitions. The parting was brief, though
the subordinate was truly affected. He would
have lingered still, but Rivers waved him off with
a farewell, whose emphasis was effectual, and, in
a few moments, the latter sat once more alone.
His mood was that of one disappointed in all
things, and, consequently, displeased and
discontented
with all thingsquerulously so. In
addition
to this temper, which was common to him, his
spirit, at this time, laboured under a heavy feeling
of despondency, and its gloomy sullenness was
perhaps something lighter to himself while Dillon
remained with him. We have seen the manner in
which he had hurried that personage away. He
had scarcely been gone, however, when the
inconsistent
and variable temper of the outlaw found
utterance in the following soliloquy.
Ay, thus it isthey all desert me; and this is
human feeling. They all fly the darkness, and this
is human courage. They love themselves only, or
you, only while you need no love; and this is
human
sympathy. I need all of these, yet I get
none; and when I most need, and most desire, and
most seek to obtain, I am the least provided. These
Vol. II.A a
are the fruits which I have sown, however
should I shrink to gather them? Yet, there is one
but one of all, whom no reproach of mine could
drive away, or make indifferent to my fate. But I
will see her no more. Strange madness! The
creature, who, of all the world, most loves me, and
is most deserving of my love, I banish from my soul
as from my sight.And this is another fruit of my
educationanother curse that came with a mother
this wilful love of the perilous and the passionate
this scorn of the gentle and the softthis
fondness
for the fierce contradictionthis indifference to
the thing easily wonthis thirst after the
forbidden
.
Poor Ellenso gentle, so resigned, and so
fond of her destroyerbut I will not see her again.
I must notshe must not stand in the way of my
anxiety to conquer that pride which had ventured
to hate or to despise me. I shall see Munro, and
he shall lose no time in this matter. Yet, what can
he be afterhe should have been here before this
it now wants but little to the morning, and yet I
have not slept.
Thus, striding to and fro in his apartment, the
outlaw soliloquized at intervals. Throwing
himself
at length upon a rude couch that stood in
the corner, he had disposed himself as it were
for slumber, when the noise as of a falling rock
attracted his attention, and without pausing, he
cautiously took his way to the entrance, with a
view to ascertaining the cause. He was not easily
surprised, and the knowledge of surrounding
danger
made him doubly observant, and more than
ever watchful.
Let us now return to the party which had
pursued
the fugitives, and which, after the death of
the landlord, had, as we have already narrated,
adopting the design suggested by his dying words,
had immediately set forth in search of the notorious
outlaw, and of the reward put upon his head.
Having already some general idea of the
whereabouts
of the fugitive, and the directions given by
Munro having been of the most specific character,
they found little difficulty, after a moderate ride of
some four or five miles, in striking upon the path
directly leading to the Wolf's Neck. At this time,
fortunately for their object, they were encountered
suddenly by our old acquaintance, Chub Williams,
whom, but a little before, we had seen separating
from the individual in whose pursuit they were
now engaged. The deformed, for a while, rode
alongside of the party, without seeming to
recognise
their existence, singing all the while a strange
woodland melody of the time and region,
probably
the production of some wayfaring village
wit:
Her frock it was a
yaller
,
And she was mighty sprigh,
And she bounced at many a
feller
,
Who came a-fighting shy.
Her eye was like a
sarpent's eye
,
Her cheek was like a flower,
But her tongue was like a pedler's clock,
Twas a-striking every hour.
And wasn't she the gal for me,
And wasn't she, I pray, sir,
And I'll be
drot
, if you say not,
We'll fight this very day, sir.
We'll fight this very day, sir.
'Spose you reckon I don't see you, riding
'longside
of me, and saying nothing, but listening to my
song. I'm singing for my own self, and you oughtn't
to listenI didn't ax you, and I'd like to know what
you're doing so nigh Chub's house.
Why, where's your house, Chub? asked one
of the party.
You aint looking for itis you? cause you
can't think to find it a-looking down. I lives in
the tree top when weather's good like to-night, and,
when it aint, I go into the hollow. I've a better
house than Guy Rivershe don't take the tree at
all, no how.
And where is his house, Chub? was the
common inquiry of all the party. The dwarf looked
at them for a few moments without speech, then
with a whisper and a gesture significant of caution,
replied
If you're looking for Guy'tain't so easy to
find him if he don't want to be found, and you
must speak softly if you hunt him whether or no.
He's a bad man, that Guymother said soand
he lives a long way under the ground.
And can't you show us where, Chub? We will
give you money for your service.
Hain't you got 'tatoes? Chub's hungryhain't
eat nothing to-night. Guy Rivers has plenty to
eat, but he cursed Chub's mother.
Well, show us where he is, and we'll give you
plenty to eat. Plenty of potatoes and corn, was
the promise of the party.
And build up Chub's house that the fire burnt?
Chub lives in the tree now. Guy Rivers' man
burnt Chub's house, 'cause he said Chub was
saucy.
Yes, my boy, we'll build up your house, and
give you a plenty to go upon for a year. You
shall have potatoes enough for your life time, if
you will show us how to come upon Guy Rivers
to-night. He is a bad fellow, as you say; and we
won't let him trouble you any more, if you'll only
show us where he is to be found.
WellI reckon I can, was the response,
something
more readily given than was the wont of the
speaker. Chub and Guy talked together to-night,
and Guy wanted Chub to go into his house in Wolf's
Neck; but it's a dark place, and Chub's afeared in
the dark.
But you mustn't be afraid now. We shall be
here and follow you closeso there will be no
danger. All that we ask you to do, is to find out
where he is, and let us know, and if we catch him,
we'll give you all we promised. We'll build the
house, and give you potatoes, and a jug of whiskey.
Whiskey tooand build the house again for
Chub's motherand potatoes? Chub's ready.
With a sagacity something inconsistent with his
general idiocy, he gave some instructions for the
party which indicated a perfect consciousness of
the somewhat dangerous undertaking which they
had in view; and, according to his directions,
the troopers having reached a certain point
contiguous
to Wolf's Neck, were made to dismount by
their idiot guide, and having fastened his, with
their horses, in the shade of a small clump of
brushwood, he bade them follow him with
cautious
tread along the margin of the road, studiously
avoiding, as they did so, the dry leaves and withered
branches and every movement productive of
unnecessary
noise. Sometimes, proceeding with the
singularly rapid motion which belonged to him,
they lost sight of him at moments, and preparing
for this, he had advised them of the route to follow,
by breaking a bush on such occasions, and leaving
it at every point in the path in which a difficulty
might be anticipated to occur. The great extent
of the rocky cavities generally styled the Wolf's
Neck, diverging, as some of its ramifications did, to
various and remote points from the centre, rendered
A a 2
such precaution necessary, since those on the
outside
could not well discover in many cases in
which cavities were below, any external
indications
of the fact. Having now brought them to
positions which gave them a commanding view of
various points at the same moment, Chub
instructed
them to place themselves out of sight, and
to await the result of the experiment he was about
to try, to determine, without any risk to himself,
the precise position of the outlaw at that moment.
Accordingly, arming himself with a rock, scarcely
smaller than his head, he contrived to secure it
about his person, while, with the rapidity of a
squirrel, he ascended a tree overlooking, like the
others, the dwelling of the fugitive. Having first
carefully ensconced himself within the sheltering
branches, which he had so chosen as effectually to
conceal him, he plunged the stone from his high
perch in such a manner as to determine for it a
rolling course down the declivity of the hill, even
after it had fairly struck the earth. The stone did
its duty precisely as required, and the pursuing
party had the satisfaction, as we have already
narrated, to behold the object of their aim emerge
from the cave, and closely scrutinize the scene
around him. As if satisfied that the cause of the
disturbance was purely occasional, and was not
the effect of design, Rivers returned to his den, and
again throwing himself upon the couch of his inner
apartment, appeared disposed to yield himself up
to sleep. Having allowed some little time to
elapse after the re-ingress of the outlaw, his
hunters
descended from their several points of
observation
,
and proceeded to arrange the circumstances
of his capture. In this matter Chub could help
them but little. He could describe, in some
particulars
,
such of the interior as he had, perforce,
been enabled to see on a former occasion, but
beyond
this he could do nothing; and he was
resolute
not to hazard himself in entering the dominion
of a personage, so fearful as Guy Rivers had been
represented by his mother to his uncouth
imagination
.
Accordingly, he staid without, closely
gathered up into a lump, behind a tree, while the
more determined Georgians penetrated with
cautious
pace into the dark avenue known in the
earlier days of the colony as a retreat for the
wolves when they infested that portion of the
country, and hence distinguished by the appellation
of the Wolf's Neck. For some time they groped
onward in great uncertainty as to their course,
but a crevice in the wall, at one point, gave them
a glimmer of the moonlight, which, falling obliquely
upon the side of the cavern, pointed out to their
eyes another passage, diverging from that in which
they were. They followed its course, until their
further progress was arrested by a solid wall,
encountering them directly in front. Here they
were at a stand, until one of the party, groping
along the obstruction, placed his hand upon
some drapery, which hung down and yielded to
the pressure, appearing to answer all the purposes
of a curtain. This discovery was importantit
led directly to the chamber of Rivers, in which he
then lay, not asleep, but weary with fatigue, and
exhausted from trying excitements. Heretofore
they had gone on in perfect secrecy. The
individual
who had discovered the curtain motioned
to his companions, and raising its folds from the
bottom, listened with suppressed respiration, while
he endeavoured to gather whatever sound of life
might be going on within. Rivers, half asleep, and
enfeebled by exhaustion of one kind or other,
breathed hard and quickoccasionally, a muttered
monosyllable breaking from his lips would indicate
the still restless mind, always at strife with the
weaker clay in which it was imprisoned. Words
might be distinguished, at moments, as his feverish
form was thrown from one side to the other upon
his couchbut such wordsthey were curses
imprecations upon himself, upon all, mingled too
with an occasional lamentingthe tribute which
vice invariably pays to virtuefor the high places
from which he had for ever fallen. The Georgian,
who was of powerful frame and great muscular
activity, with a cautious hand, lifting the curtain
sufficiently for that purpose, on hands and knees,
made his way fairly into the apartment. He was
followed in the same manner by one of his
companions
,
but the imprudent forwardness of the
third desiring admission, who was the jailer Brooks,
was productive of some interruption to their
onward
progress. Not stooping as they had done
sufficiently, yet at the same time pressing forward
with no small haste, his head struck the beam
which projected across the entrance and from
which the curtain hung, and he was precipitated
back into the passage through which he had come.
The noise aroused fully the half-dozing man, and
with the energy and decision which was a marked
feature of his character, he sprang forward with
his dirk, and, familiar with all the sinuosities of
his den, in darkness and in light, the chances would
have been, in any other circumstances, something
in his favour. But the very precipitation of the
jailer, while it occasioned the alarm, had the effect,
in one particular, of neutralizing its evil
consequences
.
The two who had already penetrated the
apartment, had not yet risen from their knees, and
having no thought of such an obstruction, the
impediment
,
which in that position they offered to
the step the outlaw was about to take, served
their purposes just as well, probably, as the
original
design would have done. As he leaped
forward
from his couch towards the passage way, his
feet were caught by the Georgian who first entered,
and so great was the impetus of his first
awakening
effort, that he was precipitated with a severe
fall over the second; and half stunned, yet still
striking
furiously, the dirk of Rivers found a bloodless
sheath in the earthen floor of the cell. In a moment
the two were upon him, and by the mere weight of
their bodies alone, they kept him down. Conscious
of the inutility of such an endeavour, the outlaw,
as soon as he could properly appreciate his
situation
,
ceased all further struggle; without difficulty
the captors bound him, and he was borne forth in
silent triumph to the entrance of the cave, where
Chub Williams came forward to meet them. The
dwarf now approached the captive with a new
confidence. He felt that his fangs were taken off,
and his survey of the person his mother had taught
him so to dread, was as curious as that which he
would have taken of some foreign monster. As he
continued this survey, Rivers, with a singular
degree
of calmness for such a time and such
circumstances
,
addressed him:
So, Chubthis is your work;you have
brought enemies to my home, and yet I gave bread
to yourself and your mother. Why have you done
this?
Guy Rivers cursed Chub's motherGuy
Rivers'
man burnt down Chub's house, and Guy
wanted to shoot Chub on the tree.
But didn't I keep the man from shooting you
when you run away from the caveI would have
been your friend, boyand I did not curse your
mother. But go and half muttering to himself,
and half in the hearing of the boy, he went on, as
it were, in soliloquyso wretched, yet so
revengeful
desolate,
I would have taken him to my
kindness
,
as of kin in desolation, and this is the reward.
He has had nothing but kindness from me, and yet
but I am your prisoner, gentlemenI am not
unwilling. Lead on.
Without interruption, they reached the village
of Chestatee at an early hour on the ensuing day,
and Guy Rivers, otherwise Creighton, the outlaw,
was safely locked up in the prison from which his
more fortunate rival Colleton had so recently
escaped
.
A better provision was now made for the
security of the prison, and a detachment of the
Georgia Guard marching that very day into the
village, totally destroyed any hope of rescue that
the captive might possibly have entertained.
CHAPTER XXII.
What boots it now, to tell the tale,
Of hapless love and hopeless wail
To chide the changeful fortune now,
That scorn'd the dream and stay'd the vow
Time, while it robs away each hope,
Can never well with memory cope;
And love, that scorns oblivion, yet
Can never, where it sigh'd, forget.
We
have already seen the return of Lucy
Munro to the village inn of Chestatee, where, to
her own and the surprise of all, her aunt had
been reinstated in her old department of
house-keeper
,
as she had held it in times past. The
reasons have been already narrated to the reader,
which had determined the landlord upon this
measure
,
and we are satisfied to say that all things, so
far as the law of householdery is concerned, now
went on with the accustomed economy; for the old
lady, having some reputation in her way, could
manage the cold baked meats with most
praiseworthy
capacity.
The indisposition of Lucy was not materially
diminished by the circumstances following the
successful
effort to persuade the landlord to the rescue of
Ralph Colleton. The feverish excitements natural
to that event, and even the fruit of its fortunate issue,
in the death of Munro, for whom she really had
much regard, were not greatly lessened, though
certainly something relieved, by the capture of
Rivers and his identification with the outlawed
Creighton. She was now secure from him: she
had nothing further to apprehend from the
prosecution
of his fearful suit; and the death of her uncle,
even if the situation of Rivers had left him free to
urge it further, would, of itself, have relieved her
from the only difficulty in the way of a resolute
denial. So far, then, she was at peace. But a
silent sorrow had made its way into her bosom,
gnawing there with the noiselessness and certainty
of the imperceptible worm, generated by the
sunlight
,
in the richness of the fresh leaf, and wound
up within its folds. She had no word of sorrow
in her speechshe had no tear of sorrow in her
eyebut there was a vacant sadness in the vague
and wan expression of her face, that needed neither
tears nor words for its perfect development. She
was the victim of a passion which, as hers was a
warm and impatient spirit, was doubly dangerous;
and the greater pang of that passion came with
the consciousness, which now she could no longer
doubt, that it was entirely unrequited. She had
beheld
the return of Ralph Colletonshe had heard
from other lips than his of his release, and of the
atoning particulars of her uncle's death, in which
he furnished all that was necessary in the way of
testimony to the youth's enlargement and security;
and though she rejoiced, fervently and deeply, at
the knowledge that so much had been done for
him, and so much by herself, she yet had no escape
from the deep sadness of mood which necessarily
came with her hopelessness. Busy tongues dwelt
upon the loveliness of the maiden who had sought
him in his prisonof her commanding statureher
elegance of formher dignity of manner and
expression
,
coupled with the warmth of a devoted love,
and a passionate admiration of the youth, who
had also so undesiringly made the conquest of
her heart. She heard all this in silence, but not
without thought. She thought of nothing beside.
The forms and images of the two happy lovers
were before her eyes at all moments, and her
active
fancy pictured the full enjoyments common to
their mutual feelings, in colours so rich and warm,
that, in utter despondency at last, she would throw
herself listlessly upon her couch, with sometimes
an unholy hope that she might not again rise
from it.
But she was not forgotten. The youth she had
so much served, and so truly saved, was neither
thoughtless nor ungrateful. Having just satisfied
those most near and dear to him of his safety, and
of the impunity which, after a few brief forms of
law, the dying confession of the landlord had given
him; and having taken, in the warm embrace of a
true love, the form of the no longer withheld
Edith, he felt that his next duty was to her, for
whom his sense of gratitude soon discovered that
every form of acknowledgment must necessarily
prove weak. At an early hour, therefore,these
several duties having been done,Ralph made his
appearance at the village inn, and the summons of
the youth soon brought Lucy from her chamber.
She came freely and without hesitation, though her
heart was tremulous with doubt and sorrow. She
had nothing now to learn of her utter
hopelessness
,
and her strength was gathered from her
despair. Ralph was shocked with the surprising
ravages which a few days of indisposition had
made upon that fine and delicate richness of
complexion
and expression, which had marked her
countenance before. He had no thought that she
was unhappy beyond the cure of time. On the
contrary, with a modesty almost coupled with
dulness, having had no idea of his own
influence
over the maiden, he was disposed to regard
the recent eventsthe death of Munro, capture of
Rivers, &c.as they relieved her from a
persecution
which had been cruelly afflictive, rather
calculated
to produce a degree of relief, to which she
had not for a long time been accustomed; and
which, though mingled up with events that
prevented
it from being considered matter for rejoicing,
was yet not a matter, for one in her situation, very
greatly to deplore. Her appearance, however,
only made him more assiduously gentle and
affectionate
in the duties he had undertaken to perform.
He approached her with the freedom of one
warranted
by circumstances in recognising in her
person
a relation next to the sweetest and the dearest
in life. With the familiar regard of a brother, he
took her hand, and placing her beside him on the
rude sofa of the humble parlour, he proceeded
to those little inquiries after her health and
of those about her, which usually form the initial
topics of all conversation. He proceeded then to
Vol. II.B b
remind her of that trying night, when, in defiance of
female fears, and laudably regardless of those staid
checks and restraints by which her sex would conceal
or defend its weaknesses, she had dared to save his
life. His manner, generally warm and precipitous,
dilated something beyond its wont; and if ever
gratitude had yet its expression from human lips
and in human language, it was poured forth at that
moment from his into the ears of Lucy Munro.
And she felt its truth, she relied upon the uttered
words of the speaker, and her eyes grew bright
with a momentary kindling, her cheek flushed under
his glance, while her heart, losing something of the
chillness which had so recently oppressed it, felt
lighter and less desolate in that abode of sadness
and sweetness, the bosom in which it dwelt. Yet,
after all, when thought came again under the old
aspectwhen she remembered his situation and her
own, she felt the shadow once more come over her
with an icy influence. It was not gratitude which
her heart craved from that of Ralph Colleton.
The praise and the approval and the thanks of
others might have given her pleasure, but these
were not enough from him; and she sighed that he
from whom alone love would be valuable, had
nothing less frigid than his gratitude to offer. But
even that was much, and she felt it deeply. His
approbation was not a little to a spirit whose
reference to him was perpetual; and whenher
hand in hishe recounted the adventures of that
nightwhen he dwelt upon her courageupon her
noble disregard of opinions which might have
chilled in many of her sex the fine natural currents
of that godlike humanity, which conventional
forms, it is well to think, cannot always fetter or
abridgewhen he expatiated upon all these things
with all the fervour of his temperament, while with
a due modesty, shrinking from the recital of its
own performances, she sought to restrain himshe
felt every moment additional pleasure in his speech
of praise. When, at length, relating the
particulars
of the escape and death of Munro, he
proceeded
,
with all the tender precaution of a
brother
,
softening the sorrow into sadness, and plucking
from grief as much of the sting as would else have
caused the wound to rankle, she felt that though
another might sway his heart and its richer
affections
,
she was not altogether destitute of its
consideration
and its care.
And now, Lucymy sweet sisterfor my
sister you are nowyou will accede to your
uncle's
prayer and mineyou will permit me to be
your brother, and to provide for you as such. In
this wild region it fits not that you should longer
abide. This wilderness is uncongenialit is
foreign to a nature like yours. You have been too
long its tenantmingling with creatures not made
for your association, and none altogether capable
of appreciating your worth. You must come with
us, and live with my unclewith my cousin
Edith
Edith?and she looked inquiringly, while a
slight flush of the cheek and kindling of the eye
in him, followed the utterance of the single word
by her, and accompanied his reply.
Yes, EdithEdith Colleton, Lucy, is the name
of my cousin, and the relationship will soon be
something closer than that between us. You will
love her, and she, I know, will love you as a sister,
and even as the preserver of one so very humble
as myself. It was a night of danger when you
first heard her name, and saw her features; and
when you and she will converse over that night
and its events, I feel satisfied that it will bring you
both only the closer to one another.
We will not talk of it farther, Mr. ColletonI
would not willingly hear of it again. It is enough
that you are now free from all such danger
enough that all things promise well for your
happiness
in the future. Let not any thought of past
evil or of risk successfully encountered, obscure
the prospectlet no thought of me produce an
emotion hostile, even for a moment, to your peace.
And why should you think, my sweet girl,
and with an air of such profound sorrow, that
such a thought must be productive of such an
emotion. Why should the circumstances so
happily
terminating, though perilous at first,
necessarily
bring sorrow with remembrance. Surely
you are now but exhibiting the sometimes coy
perversity which is ascribed to your sex. You
are now, in a moment of calm, but assuming
those winning playfulnesses of a sex, conscious of
charm and power, which, in a time of danger, your
more masculine thought had rejected as
unbecoming
.
You forget, Lucy, that I have you in charge
that you are now my sisterthat my promise to
your departed uncle, not less than my own desire
to that effect, makes me your guardian for the
futureand that I am now come, hopeful of success,
to take you with me to my own sweet country,
and to bring you acquainted with her(I must
keep no secret from you, who are my sister)who
has my heartwhobut you are sick, Lucy.
What means this emotion?
Nothing, nothing, Mr. Colleton. A momentary
weakness from my late indispositionit will soon
be over. Indeed, I am already well. Go on, sir
Go on!
Lucy, why these epithets? Surely I have
done nothing which should compel you to such
formality
.
Have I not spoken as one who would not
offendas one who would have you nearer to him
than the mere casualty, to whom you may, and
must, if only for repulsion's sake, say `Sir and Mr.'
Speak to me as if I were the new friend, at least,
if you will not behold in me an old one. I have
received
too much good service from you to permit
of this constraint. Call me Ralphor Colleton
orornay, look not so coldlywhy not call me
your brother?
Brotherbrother be it then, Ralph Colleton
brotherbrother. God knows, I need a brother,
now! and the ice of her manner was thawed
quickly by his appeal, in which her accurate sense,
sufficiently unclouded usually by her feelings,
though themselves at all times strong, discovered
only the earnestness of truth.
Ah, now, you lookand now you are indeed
my sister. Hear me then, Lucy, and listen to all
my plans. You have not seen Edithmy Edith
nowshe must be your sister too. She is now, or
will be soon, something nearer to me than a sister
she is something dearer already. We shall
immediately
return to Carolina, and you will go
along with us.
It may not be, RalphI have determined
otherwise
.
I will be your sisteras truly so as sister
possibly could bebut I will not go with you. I
have made other arrangements.
The youth looked up in astonishment. The
manner of the maiden was firm and conclusive,
and he knew not what to understand. She
proceeded
,
as she saw his amazement:
It may not be as you propose, Mr.Ralph
my brothercircumstances have decreed another
arrangementanother, and perhaps a less grateful,
destiny for me.
But why, Lucy, if a less pleasant, or at least
a doubtful arrangement, why yield to itwhy
reject
my solicitation? What is the plan to which, I
B b 2
am sad to see, you so unhesitatingly give the
preference
?
Not unhesitatinglynot unhesitatingly, I
assure
you. I have thought upon it deeply and long,
and the decision is that of my cooler thought and
calmer judgment. It is true as I have said it. It
may be in a thousand respects a less fortunate one
than that which you have made for me; but, at
least, it will want one circumstance which would
couple itself with your plan, and which would alone
prompt me to deny myself all of its other
advantages
.
And what is that one circumstance, dear Lucy,
which affrights you so much? Let me knowwhat
peculiarity of minewhat thoughtless impropriety
what association, which I may remove, thus
prevents your acceptance of my offer, and that of
Edith. Speakspare me not in what you shall say
but let your thoughts have their due language,
just as if you wereas indeed you aremy
sister.
Ask me not, Ralph. I may not utter it. It
must not be whispered to myself, though I
perpetually
hear it. It is no improprietyno
peculiarity
no
wrong thought or deed of yours, that
occasions it. The evil is in me; and hence you can
do nothing which can possibly change my
determination
.
Strange, strange girl! What mystery is this?
Where is now that feeling of affinity, of confidence,
which led you to comply with my prayer, and
consider me as your brother? Why keep this
matter from mewhy withhold a particular, the
knowledge of which might be productive of a
remedy for all the difficulty.
Nevernever. The knowledge of it would
be destructive of all beside. It would be fatal
seek not, therefore, to know itit would profit you
nothing, and me it would crush for ever to the earth.
Hear me, Ralphmy brother!hear me. Hitherto
you have known meI am proud to thinkas a
strong-minded woman, heedless of all things in her
desire for the goodfor the right. In a moment
of peril to you or to another, I would be the same
woman. But the strength which supports through
the trial, subsides with the difficulty. The ship
that battles with the storms and the seas, with
something like a kindred buoyancy,goes down with
the calm that follows their first violence. It is so
with me. I could do muchmuch more than
woman generally in the day of trial, but I am the
weakest of my sex when it is over. Would you
have the secret of these weaknesses in your
possession
,
when you must know that the very
consciousness
,
that it is beyond my own control, must
be fatal to that pride of sex which, perhaps, only
sustains me now. Ask me not, Ralph, further on
this subject. I can tell you nothing; I will tell you
nothing; and to press me farther must only be to
estrange me the more. It is sufficient that I call you
brotherthat I pledge myself to love you as a sister
as sister never loved brother before. Is not this
much, Ralph Colletonis it not enough?
The youth tried numberless other modes, but in
vain, to shake her purpose; and the sorrowful
expression
of his voice and manner, not less than of
his language, sufficiently assured her of the deep
mortification which he felt upon her denial. She
soothed the spirit with a gentleness peculiarly her
own, and as if she had satisfied herself that she
had done enough for the delicacy of her scruples
in one leading consideration, she took care that her
whole manner should be that of the most confiding
and sisterly regard. She even endeavoured to be
cheerful, seeing that her companion, with her
unlooked-for
denial, had lost all his elasticity; but
without doing much to efface from his countenance
the traces of dissatisfaction.
And what are your plans, Lucy? Let me know
them, at least. Let me see how far they are likely
to be grateful to your character, and to make you
happy.
Happy! happy!and she uttered but the two
words, with a brief interval between them, while
her voice trembled, and the gathering suffusion in
her large and thickly-fringed blue eyes attested,
more than any thing beside, the presence of that
prevailing weakness of which she had spoken.
Ay, happy, Lucy. That is the word. You
must not be permitted to choose a lot in life, in
which the chances are not in favour of your
happiness
.
I look not for that now, Ralph, was her reply,
and with such hopeless despondency visible in her
face as she spoke, that, with a deeper interest,
taking her hand, he again urged the request she
had already so recently denied.
And why not, my sweet sister? Why should
you not anticipate happiness as well as the rest of
us. Who has a better right to happiness than
the young, the gentle, the beautiful, the good?
And you are all of these, Lucy. You have the
charmsthe richer and more lasting charms,
which, in the reflective mind, must always awaken
admiration. You have animation, talent, various
and widesentiment, the growth of truth,
propriety
,
and a lofty aimno flippancy, no weak
homage of selfandnay, my sweet Lucy, shrink
not back, and look not so imploringly mortified
and a gentle beauty, that woos while it warms
having the purity of the cloudless moonlight, with
all the kindling richness of a star, when the eye
may single out but one, as if in defiance of the
tempest
,
shining down from the heavens, in place of
all the rest.
You mock meI pray you mock me not. I
have suffered much, Mr. Colletonvery much,
in the few last years of my life, from the sneer, and
the scorn, and the control of others. But I have
been taught to hope for different treatment, and a
far gentler estimate. It is ill in you to take up the
speech of smaller spirits, and when the sufferer is
one so weak, so poor, so very wretched as I am
now. I had not looked for this from you.
The words, the manner, were full of offended
pride, and of a dignity resolute to assert itself,
even upon the slightest suspicion of assault. Ralph
took her hand gently in his own, and looked
appealingly
in her face.
You do me wrong, Lucy; and your thought is
one, which, perhaps, explains your denial. You
estimate me by a standard so low, that you can
give me no confidence
Oh, no! nobelieve meany thing but that.
And do I look like one who could sneer at you,
Lucy. Have I been so idle usually in my speech
have I been, at all, the flippant trifler with your
sexthe self-assured fopling, to whom childish
flatteries, meant only for the silly ear, are the
cherished
familiarities? I have not surely striven for
such a character, and I would not have you so
esteem me. What I have said, I have said truly.
I think you what I have dared to say you are. I
have spoken of your beauty and your many
charms, not simply because of them, for, had you
not, at the same time, been securely possessed of a
high intelligence and strong sense, I had said
nothing, in your ears, of your own praise. I am
not used to this; and am sincerely honest when I
say, that I can see no reason why, with attractions
like yours, you should speak so doubtingly of your
chances of happiness. These chances will be
yours. Come with mecome with my Edith.
Let me not speak in praise of my own country,
when I promise that in Carolina, your various
merits will not long want for homage. They will
comebelieve me, Lucyalmost worthy of you
to bend before you. The young and the gallant
our noblesand nature's nobles too, will be glad
to love you, and will freely offer themselves for
your favour
No more, Ralph; no more of this. It may
not be. I have already determined. I shall still
remain with my aunt, who is now destitute like
myself. We have moneymy uncle has at least
left us well provided in that respect. We shall
therefore be at no loss, nor find it difficult to leave
this region for another. We shall go to a section
of the country more civilized in its aspect than this;
where indeed your regards will find nothing to
regret, and no reason to apprehend, for us. We
go among the relatives of my mother, and I shall
be there as perfectly at home, and as perfectly
happy, as I can be anywhere.
And will you not tell me, Lucy, where this
future and more favoured dwelling is to be?
Better that I should notbetter, far better.
The duties for which the high Providence brought
us together, have been, I think, fairly accomplished.
I have done my part, and you, Mr. Colleton
Ralph, I meanyou have done yours. There is
nothing more that we may not do apart. Here
then let our conference end. It is enough that you
have complied with the dying wish of my uncle
that I have not, is not your fault.
Not my fault, Lucy, but truly my misfortune.
But I give not up my hope so easily. I still trust
that you will think better of your determination,
and conclude to go with us. We have a sweet
home, and should not be altogether so happy in it,
with the thought of your absence for ever in our
minds.
Whatnot happy, and she with you?
Happyyesbut far happier with both of you.
You, my sister, and
Say no more
No more now, but I shall try other lips,
perhaps
more persuasive than mine. Edith shall
come
Let her not, I beg youbring her not here
I will not see herI would not look upon her for
the world and as she spoke these words with
a sudden energy, which had not before marked her
conversation, she started from her seat, and made
an effort to leave the room, but a sickness came
over her senses, her eyes closed, and she sank
back fainting in the arms of Ralph, which were
extended just in time to sustain her. In that last
speech, and the paroxysm which followed it, Ralph
Colleton had discovered her secret. He could be
blind no longer; and placing her gently, while yet
utterly unconscious, in the arms and charge of the
old lady, who just then entered the apartment, he
seized the opportunity to retire, with feelings of
sadness, highly honourable to that manliness and
straightforward honesty of character, of which,
indeed, he was a noble specimen. He entered the
temporary home of his betrothed, with a tearful
sorrow which awakened all her inquiries.
She will come, Ralph?exclaimed Edith, as he
entered the room. The sweet creatureshe will
come, will she not, and I may now see her, may I
not?
She will not come, Edithand, be not
surprised
,
my love, she declines seeing you. Edith,
my own Edithyou know me welland know
that I would not deceive you. Do you think that I
could have done or said any thing calculated to
deceive another, and to mislead them with a thought
not honestly my own? Tell me, dear Ediththus
much is necessary to free me from the doubt which
I now have, whether I have altogether pursued the
course of a gentleman with Lucy.
The maiden looked at him fixedly for an instant.
Then, as she observed the deep sentiment of
sadness
and doubt diffused over all his features,
when she saw how sincerely he felt the sorrow
which he had beheld preying upon the heart of the
poor desolate of love he had just lefther thought
at once freed him from the suspicion from which
his own thought had not altogether freed himself.
She at once replied:
No, Ralphafflict not yourselfdoubt not the
perfect propriety of your conduct. I have no
doubt of it. You are all nobleness, and I fear not
that you have been guilty of injustice in this
matter. I understand your meaning, and will
see Lucy myself. She shall know meshe shall
not avoid me. She may shrink from you, Ralph,
as from a brother; but me she shall know and
acknowledge
as a sister.
My own, my generous Edithit was ever thus
you are always the noble and the true. Go, then,
but go alone. Relieve me from this sorrow if you
can. I need not say to you, persuade her, if in your
power; for much I doubt whether her prospects
are altogether so good as she has represented
them to me. So fine a creature must not be
sacrificed.
She lost no time in proceeding to the dwelling
and into the chamber of Lucy Munro. She
regarded
none of the objections of the old lady, the
aunt of her she sought, who would have denied
her entrance. Edith's was a spirit of the firmest
mouldtenacious of its purpose, and influenced by
no consideration which would have jostled with
the intended good. She approached the sufferer,
who lay half conscious only on her couch. Lucy
could not be mistaken as to the person of her
visiter. The noble features, full of generous
beauty and a warm spirit, breathing affection for
all human things, and doubly expanded with
benevolent
sweetness when gazing down upon one
needing and deserving of so muchall told her
that the beloved and the betrothed of Ralph
Colleton
was before her. She looked, and sighing
deeply, turned her head upon the pillow, so as to
shut out a presence so dangerously beautiful. But
Edith was a woman whose thoughts, having deeply
examined the minute structure of her own heart,
could now readily understand that of another,
which so nearly resembled it. She perceived the
true course for adoption, and bending gently over
the despairing girl, she possessed herself of one of
her hands, while her lips, with the most playful
sweetness of manner, were fastened upon those of
the sufferer. The speech of such an action was
instantaneous in its effect.
Oh, why are you herewhy did you come?
was the murmured inquiry of the drooping
maiden.
To know youto love youto win you to
love me, Lucy. I would be worthy of your love,
dear girl. I know how worthy you are of all of
mine. I have heard all.
Nono! not allnot allor you never
would be here.
Vol. II.C c
I have heard much, Lucy, but know more,
and I love you the better because you love him.
A deep sigh burst from the lips of the maiden,
while her face was again averted.
Yes, Lucythe woman has discovered more
than the man, and wonder not, therefore, that
Edith Colleton knows more than her lover ever
dreamed of. I know all, my LucyRalph's sister
and mineand you must learn to love me for his
sake. I have come to win your love. I have
come to askto begto implore you, for him, not
less than for myself. You know not how he
suffers
from your denial. He had given a solemn
pledge, which your refusal has defeated. He
thinks you offended with himhe feels deeply the
debt you have conferred upon us all, and while
his feelings of affectionaffection as true and more
tender than that of a brotherprompt the same
thing, those of gratitude are no less strong and
urgent in the desire that you will accept his offer
my offer, for, indeed, dear Lucy, it is mine. But
I have another argument beyond all these. He
fears that a want of confidence in him, or a more
delicate scruple yet, or indifference, or some
other cause, inimical to his pride and character,
prompts you in all this. My reason for the
entreaty
is founded on a persuasion the reverse of
his. I know the true cause, and feel, that, but for
me and the feeling in your bosom which neither
of us may name, his proffer must have been
accepted
.
It is for this very reason that I come to
solicit. I would not that another should think as
I have thought, and hence I would have you, Lucy,
dwell with me as Ralph's sister and mine. Fear
not that I shall give up your secretcome with me
and be secure.
The manner of Edith was well calculated to
enforce her objectnever was the tender and
affectionate solicitude of a sister better exhibited,
and in sweeter colours, than by her on this
occasion
.
As she spoke, her arms were gently folded
around the form of the maiden she addressed; and
at one point of time, as Lucy was manifesting a
disposition to rise and procure a cup of water that
stood on an adjacent tableYou are sick and
faint, Lucy, and I will get it for youit is thus,
when we live together, that we shall serve one
another
.
We shall indeed be sisters was her
ready remark, as, gently pressing her down again
upon the couch, she rose hastily and procured it.
All that she had said and done in this brief
interview
had been full of effect, and the fluctuations of
Lucy's countenance during its progress would
have afforded a fine study for the dramatic painter.
She had conquered. Feebly, at the conclusion of
a dialogue much longer protracted, she signified
her assent.
Brotherbrother and sister. That is much,
very much for one like meone so desolate. It
is better too. Do with me then, dear sister, as
you please.
Now, indeed, Lucy, is Edith happy, and Ralph
too
Speak not of him nownot of himand oh,
Edith, my sister, remembermy life, my heart
all, all are in your hands.
The trust is to a sisterit is sacredmay she
lose the affection which she most values when it is
forgotten!
And the lips of the sisters met, and their arms
were linked together in the most affectionate
confidence
,
while the spirits of Lucy, if not more
buoyant and elastic, were at least something more
composed than before.
CHAPTER XXIII.
When Nero perish'd by the justest doom
Which ever the destroyer yet destroy'd,
Some hands unseen strewed flow'rs upon his tomb.
Byron
.
There
was no little stir in the village of
Chestatee
on the morning following that in which the
scene narrated in the preceding chapter had taken
place. It so happened that several of the worthy
villagers had determined to remove upon that
day; and Colonel Colleton and his family,
consisting
of his daughter, Lucy Munro, and his
future
son-in-law, having now no further reason for
delay, had also chosen it as their day of
departure
for Carolina. Nor did the already named
constitute the sum total of the cavalcade setting
out for that region. Carolina was about to receive
an accession in the person of the sagacious pedler,
Bunce, who, in a previous conversation with both
Colonel Colleton and Ralph, had made
arrangements
for future and large adventures in the way
of tradehaving determined, with the advice and
assistance of his newly-acquired friends, to
establish
one of those wonders of various combination,
called a country store, among the good people of
Sumter District. Under their direction, and
hopeful
of the Colleton patronage and influence, Bunce
never troubled himself to dream of unprofitable
speculations; but immediately drawing up letters
for his brother and some other of his kinsmen
engaged
in the manufacture, at Meriden and Berlin,
of one kind of
notion
or other, he detailed his new
designs, and furnished liberal orders for the articles
required and deemed necessary for the wants of
the free-handed backwoodsmen of the south. Lest
our readers should lack any information on the
subject and touching the nature of these wants, we
shall narrate a brief dialogue between the younger
Colleton and our worthy merchant, which took
place but a few hours before their departure.
Well, Bunce, are you ready? We shall be off
now in a couple of hours or so, and you must not
keep us in waiting. Pack up at once, man, and
make yourself ready.
I guess you're in a little bit of a small hurry,
Master Colleton, 'cause, you see, you've some
reason
to be so. You hain't had so easy a spell on
it, no how, and I don't wonder as how you're no
little airnest to get off. Wellyou won't have to
wait for me. I've jest got through mending my
little go-cart; though, to be sure, it don't look, no
how, like the thing it was. The riglators made
awful sad work of the box and body, and what
with patching and piecing, there's no two eends
on it alike.
Well, you're ready, however, and we shall have
no difficulty at the last hour?
None to speak on. Jared Bunce aint the chap
for burning daylight; and whenever you're ready
to say `go,' he's gone. But, I say, Master Ralph
there's one little matter I'd like you to look at.
What's that?Be quick now, for I've much to
see to.
Only a minute. Here, you see, is a letter I've
jest writ to my brother, Ichabod Bunce, down in
Meriden. He's a 'cute chap, and quite a Yankee,
now, I tell you; and, as I knows all his ways, I've
got to keep a sharp look out to see he don't come
C c 2
over me. Ah, Master Ralph, it's a hard thing to
say one's own flesh and blood aint the thing, but
the truth's the truth to be sure, and though it does
hurt in the telling, that's no reason it shouldn't be
told.
Certainly not!
Well, as I say, Ichabod Bunce is as close and
'cute in his dealings as any man in all Connetticut,
and that's no little say, I'm sartin. He's got the
trick, if anybody's got it, of knowing how to make
your pocket his, and squaring all things coming in
by double multiplication. If he puts a shilling
down, it's sure to stick to another; and if he picks
one up, it never comes by itselfthere's always
sure to be two on 'em.
A choice faculty for a tradesman.
How?
Just the man for business, I take it.
Jest soyou're right there, Master Colleton
there's no mistake about that. Well, as I tell'd you
now, though he's my own brother, I have to keep
a raal sharp look out over him in all our dealings.
If he says two and two makes four, I sets too to
calkilate, for when he says so, I'm sure
something's
coming not altogether right; and though
I knows, when the thing stands by itself, that two
and two does make four; yet, somehow, whenever
he says it, I begin to think it not altogether so
sartain
.
Ah, he's a main hand for trade, but there's
no knowing when he'll come over you.
But, Bunce, without making morals a party to
this question, as you are in copartnership with
your brother, you should rather rejoice that he
possesses so happy a faculty; it certainly should
not be a matter of regret with you.
Why, howyou wouldn't have me to be a
mean-spirited fellow, who would live all for money,
and not care how it comes. I can't, sir'tain't my
way, I assure you. I do feel that I wasn't born to
live nowhere except in the south, 'cause I feel rather
sort-a than not sort-a, with the people there;
and so I thought when I wrote Ichabod Bunce my
last letter. I told him every man on his own hook,
nowfor, you see, I couldn't stand his close-fisted
contrivances any longer. He wanted me to work
round the ring like himself, but I was quite too
up--and-down
for that, and so I squared off from
him soon as I could. We never did agree when
we were together, you see'cause naterally, being
brothers and partners, he couldn't shave me as he
shaved other folks, and so, 'cause he couldn't by
nature and partnership come 'cute over me, he
was always grumbling, and for every yard of
prints, he'd make out to send two yards of grunt
and growls, and that was too much, you know,
even for a pedler to stand; so we cut loose, and
now as the people say on the 'Hioevery man
paddle his own canoe.
And you are now alone in the way of trade,
and this store which you are about to establish is
entirely on your own account?
Guess it is, and so, you see, I must pull with
single oar up stream, and shan't quarrel with no
friend that helps me now and then to send the boat
ahead.
Rely upon us, Bunce. You have done too
much in my behalf to permit any of our family to
forget your services. We shall do all that we can
towards giving you a fair start in the stream, and
it will not be often that you shall require a
helping-hand
in paddling your canoe.
I know'd it, Master Colleton'Taint in
Carolina
,
nor in Georgy, nor Virginny, nonor down
in Alabam, that a man will look long for
provisions
,
and see none come. That's the people for
me. I guess I must ha' been born by nature in the
south, though I did see daylight in Connetticut.
Very likely, Buncebut what paper is that in
your hand?
Oh, that. That's jest what I was going now
to ax you about. That's my bill of particulars,
you see, that I'm going to send on by the post, to
Ichabod Bunce. He'll trade with me, now we're
off copartnership, and be as civil as a lawyer jest
afore court time. 'Cause, you see, he'll be trying to
come over me, and will throw as much dust in my
eyes as he can. But I guess he don't catch me
with mouth a-jar. I know his tricks, and he'll find
me up to them.
And what is it you require of me in this
matter?
Oh, nothing, but jest to look over this list, and
tell me how you 'spose the things will suit your
part of the country. You see I must try and larn
how to please my customers, that is to be. Now,
you see, here's, in the first placefor they're a
great article now in the country, and turn out well
in the way of salehere's and he proceeded
to unfold (dwelling with an emphatic and precise
description of each article in turn) the immense
inventory
of wares and merchandises with which he
was about to establish. The assortment was
various enough. There were pen-knives, and
jack-knives, and clasp-knives, and dirk-knives,
horn and wooden combs, calicoes and clocks, and
tinware and garden seeds: everything, indeed,
without regard to fitness of association, which it
was possible to sell in the region to which he was
going.
Ralph heard him through his list with tolerable
patience; but when the pedler, having given it a
first reading, proposed a second, with passing
comments
on the prospects of sale of each separate
article, by way of recapitulation, the youth could
stand it no longer. Apologizing to the
tradesman
,
therefore, in good set terms, he hurried away
to the completion of those preparations called for
by his approaching departure. Bunce,
having
no auditor, was compelled to do the same;
and, accordingly, a few hours after, the entire party
made its appearance in the court of the village inn,
where the carriages stood in waiting, and but few
more causes of delay could now be anticipated.
About this time another party left the village,
though in a different direction. It consisted of old
Walton, his wife, and daughter Kate. In their
company rode our old friend the lawyer Pippin,
who, hopeless now of elevation in his present
whereabouts, was solicitous of a fairer field for the
exhibition of his powers of law and logic than that
which he now left had ever afforded him. He
made but a small item in the caravan. His
goods and chattels required little compression for
the purposes of carriage, and a small
Jersey
a light
wagon in free use in that section, contained all his
wardrobe, books, papers, &c.the heirlooms of a
long and carefully chronicled genealogy. We
may not particularize his fortunes after his
removal
to the valley of the Mississippi. It does
not belong to the narrative; but, we may surely
say, to those in whom his appearance may have
provoked some interest, that subsequently he got
into fine practicewas notorious for his stump
speeches, and a random sheet of the Republican
Star and Banner of Independence which we now
have before us, published in the town of Modern
Ilium, under the head of the Triumph of Liberty
and Principle, records in the most glowing
language
the elevation of Peter Pippin, Esq., to the
State Legislature, by seven votes majority over
Colonel Hannibal Hopkins, the military candidate
Pippin 39, Hopkins 32. Such a fortunate result,
if we have rightly estimated the character of the
man, will have easily slaved over all the hurts
which, in his earlier history, his self-love may have
suffered.
But the hour of departure was at hand, and
assisting the fair Edith into the carriage, Ralph
had the satisfaction of placing her beside the
sweetly sad, the lovely, but still deeply suffering
girl, to whom he owed so much in the preservation
of his life; but who herself had fallen a victim to
the very interest which had inspired her to save
him. She was silent when he spoke, but she
looked her replies, and he felt that they were
sufficiently
expressive. The old lady had been easily
persuaded to go with her niece, and we find her
seated accordingly along with Colonel Colleton in
the same carriage with the young ladies. Ralph
rode, as his humour prompted, sometimes on
horse-back
,
and sometimes in a light giga practice
adopted with little difficulty, where a sufficient
number of servants enabled him to transfer the
trust of one or the other conveyance to the
liveried outriders who attended. Then came
the compact, boxy, buggy, buttoned-up vehicle of
our friend the pedlera thing for which the
unfertile
character of our language, as yet, has failed
to provide a fitting namebut which the
backwoodsman
of the west calls a go-cart; a title
which the proprietor does not always esteem as
significant of its manifold virtues and
accommodations
.
With a capacious stomach, it is wisely
estimated
for all possible purposes; and when opened
with a mysterious but highly becoming solemnity,
before the gaping and wondering woodsman, how
awful neat is the arrangementhow various and
costly are its treasures, of tape and toys, cottons
and calicoes, yarn and buttons, spotted silks and
hoseknives and thimblesscissors and needles
wooden clocks, and coffee-mills, &c.not to
specify a closely packed and various assortment
of tinware and japan, from the teakettle and
coffee-pot to the drinking mug for the pet boy and
the shotted rattle for the infant. A judicious
distribution
of the two latter, in the way of presents
to the young, and the worthy pedler drives a fine
bargain with the parents on the strength of it.
The party was now fairly ready, but just at the
moment of departure who should appear in sight
but our simple friend, Chub Williams. He had
never been a frequent visiter to the abodes of men,
and of course all things occasioned wonder. He
seemed fallen upon some strange planet, and was
only won to attention by the travellers, on hearing
the voice of Lucy Munro calling to him from the
carriage window. He could not be made to
understand the meaning of her words when she
told him where she was going, but contented
himself
with saying he would come for her, as soon as
they built up his house, to be his mother. It was
for this purpose he had come to the village, from
which, though surprised at all things he saw, he
was anxious to get away. He had been promised,
as we remember, the rebuilding of his cabin, by the
men who captured Rivers; together with sundry
other little acquisitions, which, as they were
associated
with his animal wants, the memory of the
urchin did not suffer to escape him. Ralph placed
in his hands a sum of money, trifling in itself,
but larger in amount than Chub had ever seen at
any one time before; and telling him it was all his
own, rejoined the party which had already driven
off. The pedler still lingered, until a bend in the
road put his company out of sight; when, driving
up to the idiot, who stood with open mouth
wondering
at his own wealth, he opened upon him the
preliminaries of trade, with a respectful address,
duly proportioned to the increased finances of the
boy.
I say, now, Chubseeing you have the raal
grit, if it aint axing too much, what do you think
to do with all that money? I guess you'd like to
lay out a little on't in the way of trade; and as I
aint particular where I sell, why, the sooner I
begin, I guess, the better. You aint in want of
nothing, eh? No knife to cut the saplings, and
pare the nails, nor nothing of no kind?Now I
has every thing from
Bunce would have gone on narrating, as we
have already heard them, in detail, the name
of every commodity in his wagon, but, at this
stage of his speech, one of the outriders
returned
under the orders of Master Ralph, to see
what delayed the worthy trafficker, and to render
assistance if any were needed. The blacky, who
was no other than our old friend Csar, was urgent
for the profession of peddling wins as little respect
from the southern slave as from the southern
freeman
and
did not hesitate to declaim against the
burning shame of the attempt of Mr. Bunce to
wheedle the poor boy out of the money Mass
Ralph been gib 'em.
The pedler was rebuked; and closing his box,
the cover of which he had temptingly thrown open
to the stupid admiration of Chub, he hastily
followed
the direction of the servant, and bidding the
now moneyed, and, therefore respectable, idiot
a hearty good-bye, he drove off after his fellow
wayfarers, with a free rein for Carolina; his head
filled with all the fancies, and many a fine vision, of
trade, which, after a certain period of life, when
the sons and daughters of his young patron had
grown into patrons too, he was happy enough, on
a moderate scale, to realize.
Let us now give our attention to another person
of our narrative. Let us go to the dungeon of
Guy Rivers, and behold him in a situation so
entirely
new to him. What a fine mind was here
ruined, and how melancholy the contemplation.
Well is it for mankind, that, under the distribution
of a liberal providence, when the bright stars fall
from their places, there is no dark void
corresponding
in degree with the splendours which have been
taken away. Happy for humanity, that, in the
eternal progress of change, the nature which is its
aliment no less than its element, restores not less
than its destiny removes. Yet, the knowledge
that we lose not, does not materially lessen the
pang when we behold the mighty fallwhen we
see the great mind, which, as a star, we have
almost
worshipped, shooting with headlong
precipitance
through the immense void from its
place of eminence, and defrauding the eye of all
the glorious presence and golden promise which
had become associated with its survey. The
intellect of Guy Rivers had been giganticthe
mistakea mistake quite too common to society
consisted in an education limited entirely to the
mind, and entirely neglectful of the morale of the
boy. He was taught, like thousands of others;
and the standards set up for his moral government,
for his passions, for his emotions, were all false
from the first. The capacities of his mind were
goodthey were greatbut they had been
restrained
,
while the passions had all been brought
Vol. II.D d
into active, and at length ungovernable exercise.
How was it possible that reason, thus taught to
be subordinate, could hold the strife long, when
passionfierce passionthe passion of the
querulous
infant, and the peevish boy, bribed to its duty
by the toy and the sugar-plumwas its
uncompromising
antagonist.
But let us visit him in his dungeonthe dungeon
so lately the abode of his originally destined, but
now happily safe, victim. What philosophy is
there to support him in his reversewhat
consolation
of faith, of reflection, or of a due
performance
of human duties. None! Every thought
every feelingevery dream was merged in one
word of appalling terror, and he heard muttered
for ever in his senses,despair, despair, and die!
He heard and felt the truth of the warning. There
was no hope leftno sunlight came into his
dungeon
,
and the difference in his strength and that of
Ralph Colleton would have been perceptible in this
single particular. The sun-glance through the
barred lattice, suddenly stealing, like a friendly
messenger, with a sweet and mellow smile upon his
lips, was so hailed by the enthusiastic nature of
the one, without guile in his own heartRivers
would have regarded such a visiter as an intruder,
the smile in his eyes would have been a sneer,
and he would have turned away from it in disgust.
The mind of the strong man is the medium
through which the eyes see, and from which life
takes all its colour. The heart is the prismatic
conductor, through which the affections show, and
that which is seared, or steeled or ossified
perverted
utterly from its original makecan exhibit
no rainbowsno arches of a sweet promise,
linking
the gloomy earth with the bright and the
beautiful
and the eternal heavens.
The mind of Guy Rivers had been one of the
strongest makeone of large and leading
tendencies
.
He could not have been one of the mere
numerals of society. He must have been
something
,
or he must have perished. His spirit would
have fed upon his heart otherwise, and, wanting a
field and due employment, his frame must have
been worn away in the morbid repinings of its
governing principle. Unhappily, he had not been
permitted a choice. The education of his youth had
given a fatal direction to his manhoodand we
find him accordingly, not satisfied with his pursuit,
yet resolutely inflexible and undeviating in the
pursuit
of error. Such are the contradictions of the
strong mind, to which, wondering as we gaze, with
unreasonable and unthinking astonishment, we daily
see it subject. Our philosophers are content with
declaiming upon effectsthey will not permit
themselves
or others to trace them up to their causes.
To heal the wound, the physician may probe
and find out its depth and extentthe same
privilege
is not often conceded to the physician of the
mind or of the morals, else numberless diseases, now
seemingly incurable, had been long since brought
within the healing scope of philosophical analysis.
The popular cant would have us forbear even to
look at the history of the criminal. Hang the wretch,
say they, but say nothing about him. Why trace
his progress?what good can come out of the
knowledge of those influences and tendencies,
which have made him a criminal? Let them
answer
the question for themselves!
The outlaw beheld the departing cavalcade from
the grated window. He saw the last of all
those in whose fortunes he might be supposed to
have an interest. He turned from the sight with a
bitter pang at his heart, and to his surprise,
discovered
that he was not alone in the solitude of
his prison. One ministering spirit sat before him
upon the long bench, the only article of furniture
afforded to his dungeon. The reader has not
forgotten
the young woman to whose relief, from fire,
Ralph Colleton so opportunely came while making
his escape from his pursuers. We remember the
resignationthe yielding weakness of her broken
spirit to the will of her destroyer. We have seen her
left desolate by the death of her only relative, and
only not utterly discarded by him, to whose fatal
influence
over her heart at an earlier period we may
ascribe all her desolation. She then yielded
without
a struggle to his will, and having prepared
her a new abiding-place, he had not seen her
after, until, unannounced and utterly unlooked-for
certainly uninvitedshe appeared before him in
the cell of his dungeon. Certainly, none are
utterly
forgotten! There are some who remember
some who feel with the sufferer, however lowly
in his sufferingsome who cannot forget. No
one perishes without a tearful memory becoming
active when informed of his fate; and though the
world scorns and despises, some one heart keeps a
warm sympathy, that gives a sigh over the ruin,
and perhaps plants a flower upon its grave.
Rivers had not surely looked for the forsaken
and the defrauded girl, for whom he had shown so
little love. He knew not at first how to receive
her. What offices could she do for himwhat
influence
exercisehow lighten the burden of his
doomhow release him from his chains? Nothing
of this could she perform, and what did she there?
For sympathy, at such a moment, he cared little
for such sympathy, at least, as he could command.
His pride and ambition, heretofore, had led him to
despise and undervalue the easy of attainment.
He was always grasping after the impossible. The
fame which he had lost for ever grew doubly
attractive
to his mind's eye from the knowledge of
this fact. The society, which had expelled him from
its circle and its privileges, was an Eden in his
imagination, simply on that account. The love of
Edith Colleton grew more desirable from her
scorn;and the defeat of hopes so daring, made
his fierce spirit writhe within him, in all the pangs
of disappointment, only neutralized by his hope of
revenge. And that hope was now gonethe
dungeon
and the doom were all that met his eyes; and
what had she to do in his prison-cell and with his
prison feelings, whom Providence, even in her own
despite, was now about to avenge. No wonder he
turned away from her in the bitterness of the
thought which her appearance must necessarily
have inspired.
Turn not awayspeak to me, Guyspeak to
me if you have pity in your soul. You shall not
drive me from youyou shall not dismiss me now.
I should have obeyed you at another time, though
you had sent me to my deathbut I cannot obey
you now. I am strong now, strongvery strong
since I can say so much. I am come to be with
you to the last, and, if it be possible, to die with
you; and you shall not refuse me. You shall not
oh, you will notyou cannot And as she
spoke, she clung to him as one pleading herself for
life to the unrelenting executioner. He replied, in
a sarcasm, true to his general course of life.
Yes, Ellenyour revenge for your wrongs
would not be well complete, unless your own
eyes witnessed it; and you insist upon the
privilege as if you duly estimated the luxury.
Well!you may stay. It needed but this, if any
D d 2
thing had been needed, to show me my own
impotence
.
Cruel to the last, Guycruel to the last. Surely
the few hours between this and that of death, are
too precious to be employed in bitterness. Were
not prayer betterif you will not pray, Guy, let
me. My prayer shall be for you; and in the
forgiveness
which my heart shall truly send to my
lips for the wrongs you have done me and mine,
I shall not altogether despair, so that you join with
me, of winning a forgiveness far more important
and precious. Guywill you join with me in
prayer?
My knees are stiff, Ellen. I have not been
taught to kneel.
But it is not too late to learn.Bend, bow with
me, Guyif you have ever loved the poor Ellen,
bow with her now. It is her prayer; and oh,
think, how weak is the vanity of this pride in a
situation like yours. How idle the stern and
stubborn spirit, when men can place you in bonds,
when men can take away life and namewhen
men can hoot and hiss and defile your fettered and
enfeebled person. It was for a season and a trial
like this, Guy, that humility was given us. It was
in order to such an example that the Saviour died
for us.
He died not for me. I have gained nothing by
his death. Men are as bad as ever, and wrong
the wrong which deprived me of my right in
society
has
been as active and prevailing a
principle
of human action as before he died. It is in his
name now that they do the wrong, and in his name,
since his death, they have contrived to find a
sanction
for all manner of crime. Speak no more of
this, Ellen; you know nothing about it. It is all
folly.
To you, Guy, it may be. To the wise all
things are folly. But to the humble heart there is a
word even in what are thought follies which brings
us the best of teachings. That is no folly which
keeps down, in the even posture of humility, the spirit
which circumstances would only bind and crush
in every effort to rise. That is no folly which
prepares us for reverses, and fortifies us against
change and vicissitude. That is no folly which
takes away the sting from afflictionwhich has
kept me, Guy, as once before you said, from driving
a knife into your heart, while it lay beating against
the one to which yours had brought all manner of
affliction. Oh, believe me, the faith and the feeling
and the hope, not less than the fear, which has made
me what I am nowwhich has taught me to rely
only on the onewhich has made me independent
of all things and all loves,ay, even of yours,
when I refer to itis no idle folly. It is the only
medicine by which the heart may live. It is that
which I bring to you now. Hear me then, Guy
hear the prayer of the poor Ellen, who surely has
some right to be heard by you. Kneel for me,
and with me, on this dungeon floor, and prayonly
pray.
And what should I pray for, and what should I
sayand whom should I curse?
Oh, curse nonesay any thing you please, so
that it have the form of a prayer. Say, though
but a single sentence, but say it in the spirit which
is right.
Say what?
Saythe Lord's will be doneif nothing
more; but say it in the true feelingthe feeling of
humble reliance upon God.
And wherefore say this? His will must be
done, and will be done, whether I say it or not.
This is all idlevery idle,and to my mind
excessively
ridiculous, Ellen.
Not so, Guy, as your own sense will inform
you. True, his will must be done, but there is a
vast difference between desiring that it be done,
and in endeavouring to resist its doing. It is one
thing to pray that his will have its way without
stop, but quite another to have a vain wish in one's
heart to arrest its progress. But I am a poor
scholar, and have no words to prove this to your
mind if you are not willing to think upon the
subject
.
If the danger is not great enough in your
thoughtif the happiness of that hope of
immortality
be not sufficiently impressive to youhow
can I make it seem different. The great
misfortune
of the learned and the wise is, that they will
not regard the necessity. If they didif they
could be less self-confident, how much more readily
would all these lights from God shine out to them,
than to us who want the far sense so quickly to
perceive and to trace them out in the thick
darkness
.
But it is my prayer, Guy, that you kneel
with me in prayer; that you implore the feeling
of preparedness for all chances which can only
come from Heaven. Do this for me, GuyGuy,
my belovedthe destroyer of my youth, of all
my hope, and of all of mine, making me the poor
destitute and outcast that you find me nowdo
this one, one small service for the Ellen you have
so much wronged, and she forgives you all. I
have no other prayer than thisI have no other
wish in life.
As she spoke she threw herself before him and
clasped his knees firmly with her hands. He
lifted her gently from the floor, and for a few
moments
maintained her in silence in his arms. At
length, releasing her from his grasp, and placing
her upon the bench, on which, until that moment,
he had continued to sit, he replied:
The prayer is smallvery small, Ellenwhich
you make, and I know no good reason why I should
not grant it. I have been to you all that you
describe
me. You have called me truly your
destroyer
,
and the forgiveness you promise in return
for this prayer is desirable even to one so callous
as myself. I will do as you require.
Oh, will you? then I shall be so happy was
her exclamation of rejoicing. He replied gravely
We shall see. I will, Ellen, do you as you
require
,
but you must turn away your eyesgo to
the window and look out. I would not be seen in
such a position, nor while uttering such a prayer.
Oh, be not ashamed, Guy Rivers. Give over
that false sentiment of pride which is now a
weakness
.
Be the man, the
Be content, Ellen, with my terms. Either as
I please, or not at all. Go to the window.
She did as he directed, and a few moments had
elapsed only when he called her to him. He had
resumed his seat upon the bench, and his features
were singularly composed and quiet.
I have done something more than you
required
,
Ellen, for which you will also have to
forgive
me. Give me your hand, now.
She did so, and he placed it upon his bosom, which
was now streaming with his blood. He had taken
the momentary opportunity afforded him by her
absence at the window to stab himself to the heart
with a penknife which he had contrived to conceal
upon his person. Horror-struck, the affrighted
woman would have called out for assistance, but he
sternly stayed her speech and action.
Not for your life, Ellennot for your life.
It is all useless. I first carefully felt for the
beatings
of my heart, and then struck where they were
strongest. The stream flows now which will soon
cease to flow, and but one thing can stop it.
Oh, what is that, Guylet me
Death,which is at hand! Now, Ellen, do
you forgive me? I ask no forgiveness from others.
From my heart I do, believe me.
It is well. I am weak. Let me place my
head upon your bosom. It is some time, Ellen,
since it has been there. How wildly does it
struggle
.
Pray, Ellen, that it beat not long. It has a
sad office! Nowlipsgive me your lips, Ellen.
You have forgiven meallevery thing?
All, all!
It grows darkbut I care not. Yet, throw
open the windowI will not restI will pursue.
He shall not escape meEdithEdith! He was
silentin the last moment his mind had wandered
to the scene, in which, but a few hours before, he
had witnessed the departure of Edith with his
rival, Colleton. The jailer, alarmed by the first
fearful cry of Ellen succeeding this event, rushed
with his assistants into the cell, but too late. The
spirit had departed; and they found but the now
silent mourner, with folded arms, and a
countenance
that had in it volumes of unutterable wo,
bending over the inanimate form of one, whose life
and misnamed love had been the bane of hers.
THE END.